Every morning for the past year, a group of British civil servants, diplomats, police officers and spies have woken up, logged onto a slick website and offered their best guess as to whether China will invade Taiwan by a particular date. Or whether Arctic sea ice will retrench by a certain amount. Or how far covid-19 infection rates will fall. These imponderables are part of Cosmic Bazaar, a forecasting tournament created by the British government to improve its intelligence analysis.


Since the website was launched in April 2020, more than 10,000 forecasts have been made by 1,300 forecasters, from 41 government departments and several allied countries. The site has around 200 regular forecasters, who must use only publicly available information to tackle the 30-40 questions that are live at any time. Cosmic Bazaar represents the gamification of intelligence. Users are ranked by a single, brutally simple measure: the accuracy of their predictions.


Forecasting tournaments like Cosmic Bazaar draw on a handful of basic ideas. One of them, as seen in this case, is the “wisdom of crowds”, a concept first illustrated by Francis Galton, a statistician, in 1907. Galton observed that in a contest to estimate the weight of an ox at a county fair, the median guess of nearly 800 people was accurate within 1% of the true figure.


Crowdsourcing, as this idea is now called, has been augmented by more recent research into whether and how people make good judgments. Experiments by Philip Tetlock of the University of Pennsylvania, and others, show that experts’ predictions are often no better than chance. Yet some people, dubbed “superforecasters”, often do make accurate predictions, largely because of the way they form judgments—such as having a commitment to revising predictions in light of new data, and being aware of typical human biases. Dr Tetlock’s ideas received publicity last year when Dominic Cummings, then an adviser to Boris Johnson, Britain’s prime minister, endorsed his book and hired a controversial superforecaster to work at Mr Johnson’s office in Downing Street.


America’s sprawling intelligence establishment was the first to apply these principles. Over the past decade, it has carried out more than a dozen forecasting projects, including prediction markets, in which people can bet money or points on the outcome, and prediction polls, like Cosmic Bazaar. The most prominent tournament was the Aggregative Contingent Estimation (ace) programme, run from 2010 to 2015 by the Intelligence Advanced Research Projects Activity (iarpa), a blue-sky research body for American spooks. A curated team of superforecasters from the Good Judgment Project, a scheme led by Dr Tetlock, were found to be at least one-third more accurate than other research teams.


ace and similar programmes inspired Britain to create Cosmic Bazaar. One of its purposes is to identify a group of persistently successful forecasters who could help answer difficult questions in a crisis. The top 20 or so competitors are “incredibly accurate”, says Charlie Edwards, who trains British intelligence analysts. They are obsessed with their Brier scores, a measure of accuracy over time, and, in common with findings from the Good Judgment Project, share sources of data and news enthusiastically. The only rewards are virtual badges and branded notebooks. But for analysts accustomed to working with secret intelligence, where success remains in the shadows, a high score here—and the merchandise to prove it—is a “badge of honour”, says Mr Edwards.


The game’s afoot
Yet the point is not just to pick star performers. It is also to encourage “cognitive diversity” by ensuring that intelligence draws on talent beyond Britain’s smallish pool of full-time analysts. Cosmic Bazaar’s anonymity produces an egalitarian backdrop: a junior data scientist can contest the predictions of a veteran ambassador, and the reasoning behind them, without the shadow of rank. The site encourages debate and discussion. Users can “upvote” perceptive comments by others, and questions are supplemented with seminars by experts. Moreover, since the system is unclassified (unlike most of its American-government counterparts), officials can log in from home, or abroad.


The programme is also intended to identify blind spots in analysis. Officials say that so much government attention is spent on covid-19 that slower-burning or more distant matters tend to be missed. In October, for instance, Cosmic Bazaar asked users a question on Mozambique, responses to which suggested that the risk of jihadist activity was greater than thought (as would later prove true), prompting others to look more closely at the matter.


At the moment, Cosmic Bazaar is the largest forecasting tournament in Europe. But others are getting interested. Britain hopes to draw European allies into the contest. Adam Siegel, a co-founder of Cultivate Labs, the firm which wrote the software for Cosmic Bazaar, says that the Czech Republic is using his company’s platform for public tournaments involving several government agencies, and that another European government has run a classified version. Regina Joseph of Sibylink, a consultancy, has run tournaments for the Dutch government and the Organisation for Security and Co-operation in Europe.


Yet America’s experience with forecasting is a cautionary tale. Despite the attention attracted by ace, American tournaments and prediction markets have struggled for money and mainstream acceptance. There are no active forecasting tournaments in American intelligence agencies today, though some remain in the Pentagon and elsewhere.


One reason for this, suggests “Keeping Score: A New Approach to Geopolitical Forecasting”, a recent paper by Perry World House, a research group at the University of Pennsylvania, is that such platforms threaten to expose poor analysts and up-end existing hierarchies. “Established employees”, the paper’s authors write, “may view the potential disruption wrought by a mechanism that outperforms many traditional analysts with a sense of impending doom, as a factory worker might view a new assembly robot.”


However, the larger issue may simply be that the feature which makes precise forecasting possible also limits its appeal. A basic requirement is that questions be falsifiable, so that it is unequivocal, after the fact, who got it right and who wrong. This means there is no room for what psychologists have called “clairvoyance”, or the post hoc claim that a vague prediction came true. Yet policymakers are often drawn to bigger and vaguer questions that resist such score-keeping, such as: “what does Russia want?” or “will China become more aggressive?” Dr Tetlock calls this the “rigour-relevance trade-off”.


One way to approach this problem, says Steven Rieber, who oversees forecasting at iarpa, is to draw on an advanced statistical technique known as Bayesian networking, which uses conditional probabilities. Forecasters can be asked to judge, for example, the probability that China would seize an island in the South China Sea by a particular date if it were becoming more aggressive—and also the probability of it doing so even if it were not. A big and elusive question can thus be broken down into several smaller and more tractable ones, known as “Bayesian question clusters”. Foretell, a project run by the Centre for Security and Emerging Technology (cset) at Georgetown University, which also uses the Cultivate platform, employs this methodology to predict the course of technological competition between America and China. It is not yet clear whether that approach will be successful.


For now, forecasters are enjoying a moment in the sun. In Britain, Cosmic Bazaar’s insights are trickling into policy teams that work on covid-19 and counter-terrorism. In America, President Joe Biden, one day after his inauguration, announced his intention to establish a National Centre for Epidemic Forecasting and Outbreak Analytics. In March the administration hired Jason Matheny, a former chief of iarpa and the founder of cset, as an adviser on technology and national security.


The long-term viability of forecasting will depend, though, not just on accuracy, but also explainability. “It's not enough to learn that there’s a 70% chance of war breaking out between these two countries in the next year, and not the 30% you thought,” says Dr Rieber. “You need to understand what leads to that higher probability judgment.” An assessment paired with a colourful psychological profile of Xi Jinping is more likely to resonate with a prime minister or president than a percentage figure. “You have to build up a trust relationship with these decision-makers,” says Mr Siegel. “You need to put a story together alongside the numbers.”


Fried in butter with a light flour batter and some dried herbs, cod tongue is a delicacy in Norway and beyond. Around 80 tonnes are harvested every year from fish caught in Norway’s northern waters. Softer in texture than the flesh of the fish, cod tongue dissolves in the mouth with a hint of saltiness. It is the “angels’ share” of the fish, says Jan-Erik Indrestrand of Fiskarlaget, the Norwegian fishermen’s association.


Liv Eva Kirkesæther, a 35-year-old who works for a marine research institute, says that when she was a girl, men and boys dominated the cod-tongue-cutting trade on Lofoten, a Norwegian archipelago. This year, she was happy to see a grandmother and granddaughter selling tongues from a car boot.


In other ways, however, the art of tungeskjæring has changed little over the centuries. Most controversially, to modern sensibilities, the fiddly work of removing the tongue from an already-beheaded fish is reserved mainly for children. The practice serves as a kind of apprenticeship for would-be fisherfolk, and it pays handsomely. The tongues are valuable, so an hour’s work can pay 1,200 kronor ($143); not bad if you’re six. Modesty guides attitudes in Lofoten and other northern parts, so it would be frowned upon to splash the cash on something frivolous, says Ms Kirkesæther. Youngsters tend to save up for a fishing boat, a car or a deposit on a home.


Not everyone gets involved. Those with bourgeois aspirations keep their distance; tongue-cutting smacks of a fisherman’s rough life. And urbanites in Oslo were unsettled by a recent documentary showing the youngsters at work in their blood-spattered oilskins. “Child labour!” they cried. The government looked into the issue, then backed off, out of respect for culture and heritage. A bigger threat to the industry is that stocks are low. From April 27th, Norwegian cod caught in coastal waters will lose its sustainability rating from the Marine Stewardship Council, a global fish watchdog.
“My place is in Bavaria.” When asked if he hoped to succeed Angela Merkel, who will step down as Germany’s chancellor after an election in September, Markus Söder repeated his not-quite-denial so often that it became a running joke. As head of Bavaria’s centre-right Christian Social Union (csu), sister party to Mrs Merkel’s Christian Democrats (cdu), Mr Söder (pictured above, right), a cocky, self-assured type, has ruled Germany’s brashest, and second most populous, state since 2018. Many thought his ambitions ended there.


Yet April 13th found Mr Söder seated in the Bundestag explaining why his place might be in Berlin after all. The cdu/csu choose a joint chancellor-candidate to lead them into national elections. Appearing before the parties’ mps, Mr Söder laid out his pitch for the job. Armin Laschet, the mild-mannered cdu leader (pictured, left), made his own case from three socially distanced seats away. Johann Wadephul, a cdu mp who backs Mr Söder, says the four-hour debate was the most intense parliamentary session he can recall.


Two days earlier, in a show of faux-magnanimity, Mr Söder had finally made his ambitions clear, declaring that he would accept the cdu/csu, or Union, nomination if the larger party asked. If not, no hard feelings. The next day the cdu’s leadership committee unanimously backed Mr Laschet. Yet rather than step back, Mr Söder doubled down. The cdu’s top brass was out of touch, he implied; better to consult more broadly. The drama was on.


Shifting the duel to parliament bolstered Mr Söder’s argument that his appeal extends beyond his own state and party. His pitch—that his huge polling lead over Mr Laschet, cemented in the course of the pandemic, was good for the Union’s electoral prospects—found receptive ears among cdu mps who fear for their seats. Some read out letters from constituency workers concerned that Mr Laschet would spell electoral doom. But with the cdu leader showing no inclination to yield and mps enjoying no formal role in the process, the Union was left in stalemate. The two men pledged to reach a deal by the end of the week. How they would do so remained unclear as The Economist went to press.




The rivals have been careful to avoid full-frontal warfare, and no doubt the runner-up will offer the victor unequivocal backing. But this week’s episode will leave scars. If Mr Laschet prevails, as seems more likely, he will begin the campaign as damaged goods. True, he is responsible for his own policy flip-flops and faltering communication style. But Mr Söder has shone a harsh light on Mr Laschet’s pitiful polling—69% of voters in North Rhine-Westphalia, the state he runs, are unhappy with him—and forced cdu mps publicly to oppose his candidacy. Mr Söder’s late push for the job has harmed the relationship between the sister parties, and exposed splits between the cdu leadership and base.


Were Mr Söder to secure the candidacy he would have to deal with a bruised cdu leadership that might not find the will to offer him full-throated support. And the sympathetic coverage he has so far enjoyed from journalists who love to mock the hapless Mr Laschet would fade once he was confronted with the Greens, the Union’s main adversary, argues Ursula Münch of the Tutzing Academy for Political Education. Mr Söder, one of Germany’s more opportunistic politicians, would see conveniently jettisoned conservative positions on matters like immigration or the European Union exhumed for scrutiny.


For the cdu/csu, Europe’s most important political alliance, to rely on an informal process for such a crucial decision is “ridiculous”, acknowledges Mr Wadephul. But this is also the first time in German history that a governing party will campaign without an incumbent chancellor, and it shows. “There is no blueprint for this,” says Christian Wohlrabe, a cdu candidate in Berlin’s city election, also due in September. The long reign of Mrs Merkel, who herself was forced to yield to the csu in 2002 before winning office three years later, has left the party out of ideas at the moment it needs them most. “We have new candidates and new issues,” says Mr Wadephul. “It will be a completely different race.” But Mr Söder’s long refusal to rule himself in or out made a contest for the candidacy based on competing visions impossible.


Then there is covid-19. As Germany’s third wave accelerates, the pandemic seems likely to dominate politics well into the summer. The government is legislating to increase its powers over renegade states; among other things, Germany looks set for its first widespread curfew. The seemingly endless lockdown will make it harder for the Union candidate to pull off the already-tricky task of creating a political vision for post-Merkel Germany without disowning the popular chancellor. (Wisely, she has vowed to stay out of the contest.)


The woes of the Union are thrown into sharper relief by the discipline of their political rivals. On April 19th the Greens will announce their first-ever candidate for the chancellery (expected to be Annalena Baerbock, the party’s young co-leader). The party hopes the contrast between its well-managed process and the drawn-out psychodrama of the Union’s will not be lost on voters. Under either Mr Laschet or Mr Söder, the conservatives will remain odds-on to run the first post-Merkel government. But that the notion of a Green chancellor no longer seems outlandish is testament not only to that party’s acumen, but to the agonies of its opponent. 
Last summer it was impossible to discuss the eu without someone mentioning Alexander Hamilton. The decision to issue €750bn ($895bn) in collective debt sent wonks scurrying to history books (or the musical). A lively debate followed over whether this indeed amounted to a Hamiltonian moment, as in 1790 when the young American founding father persuaded the new country to assume the debts of its states. Time might have been better spent boning up on another figure from the republic’s early history, John C. Calhoun. At first glance, an antebellum vice-president and supporter of slavery has few lessons for the eu. But he was also the main advocate of nullification: the right for states to strike down federal laws they deemed unconstitutional. This fight over legal supremacy began with a refusal to enforce tariffs in South Carolina in the 1830s and ended three decades later in civil war.


Two centuries on, a similar debate is throwing the eu’s legal order into question. Last month, Germany’s constitutional court paused ratification of the debt plan until the court had examined it. The decision could just be legal housekeeping, but some fear it may be more. Last year, the German court declared that the European Court of Justice in Luxembourg had overstepped its mandate in the way it allowed a quantitative easing programme by the European Central Bank. Poland’s top court has taken to ignoring the ecj’s rulings. In France, officials discuss ways of circumventing an ecj decision that struck down a data-retention law, claiming that it clashes with the country’s constitution. However much Europeans may resist the idea, they face a “Calhounian moment”.


Disagreements over who has the final say in any legal order are manageable, if handled carefully by judges. In any quasi-federal system, conflict between the centre (ecj judges) and periphery (their German counterparts) is inevitable, argues Holger Hestermeyer of King’s College London. The key is for judges to be able to disagree without wrecking the whole system. In British politics, “Good Chap theory” still holds sway: there may not be many checks in the British system, but it does not matter so long as the actors do not overstep the invisible mark. In the eu, this becomes Good Judge theory. Despite their caricature as frothing federalists, ecj judges are not lunatics bent on bulldozing the constitutional arrangements of eu countries willy-nilly.


Likewise, it does not matter if German judges play chicken with their counterparts in Luxembourg, so long as they swerve out of the way at the last moment. Another option is to slow down to the point where any collision is a gentle bump. Last year, when the German court accused the ecj of going too far, it carefully offered an easy way for the disagreement to be solved: central bankers had to explain their decision more clearly. In principle, it was a big deal; in practice, it was easily fixed.


Yet problems lurk in this approach. A flaw of Good Judge theory is that not all judges within the eu are good. Poland’s constitutional court has been stacked, with regime-curbing members removed and replaced by cronies. The outgoing president of the German court dismissed the top Polish court as a “puppet”. Yet Polish jurists are keen to cite German legal thinking on constitutional pluralism, in which the authority of courts overlaps. “Constitutional pluralism is a bit like nuclear power. It has beneficial peacetime uses, but it is inherently dangerous and can easily be weaponised in times of war,” write Laurent Pech of Middlesex University and R. Daniel Kelemen of Rutgers University. If Poland elects to ignore judgments of the eu’s top court then it amounts to de facto “Polexit”. The country would be in the bloc but unbound by its rules.


Such a situation would leave the eu in a tough spot. It has no military power to enforce its will, nor enough spare cash to bribe naysayers into compliance. All it has is its legal order. If that is undermined, then so is the project. That the ecj’s rulings are final and binding on all national courts is what makes the eu unique, explains Mr Kelemen. Strip this out and the eu becomes like any other weak international organisation—an oecd with a flag and an affection for the “Ode To Joy”. There is a good reason why the “caveats” sections of analysts’ reports often mention the possibility that a German judge might upend the euro zone.


Antebellum Europe
As the eu tiptoes in a Hamiltonian direction, it will have to deal with the Calhounian tendency. There are two main theories as to how to do this. Some think the problem will solve itself over time. Though the eu has been around in some form since the 1950s, the thorniest topics, such as monetary union, were only placed on the European level in the 1990s. In this view, these are teething issues that can be settled via judicial dialogue rather than conflict. For others, only overhauling the eu’s treaties, and spelling out directly who has the final say, can fix the problem.


Both approaches are right. Treaty change would clarify the boundaries of eu law, making life easier for judges. Big breakthroughs such as issuing hundreds of billions in collective debt fly in the face of rules that, at first glance, forbid the eu from borrowing to finance its spending. That such measures can be justified with complicated legal gymnastics does little to solve the impression that the rules are being bent. At the same time, a legal system can only prosper with good-faith actors. Theeu must rein in countries that stack their courts, such as Poland, while relying on independent courts, such as Germany’s, not to overstep the new mark.


Rather than bury fundamental disagreements, treaty change would dig them up. But politics is supposed to be difficult. In recent years, Europe’s politicians have developed an unhealthy habit of ducking problems and hoping that the unelected parts of the system, such as central bankers and judges, will work out how to fix them. That is not sustainable. But at least this problem, unlike America’s at the time of Calhoun, can be solved without a war. Europe has had enough of those. 
BY LOCKING Alexei Navalny up in a harsh penal colony, Vladmir Putin has condemned his main political opponent to acute physical and mental torment and the risk of imminent death. But he has not quelled the threat that Mr Navalny poses to his rule. An open letter sent to The Economist today from nearly 80 eminent writers, actors, artists, historians and public intellectuals from around the world highlights the ignominy Mr Putin is bringing upon himself and his regime.


The signatories report that Mr Navalny, who last August survived poisoning with Novichok, a nerve agent, that many blame on Mr Putin, has symptoms of a severe neurological disorder—constant back pain and the loss of sensation in his legs and hands, as well as a severe cough and fever. “As a Russian citizen, he has the lawful right to be examined and treated by a doctor of his choice,” note the signatories of the letter. “Having been denied this right, on March 30th, he began a hunger strike in protest.” His wife says that, in his cell in Pokrov, some 100km (60 miles) east of Moscow, he has lost some 16kg in weight.


He is now being threatened with forcefeeding that would amount to torture. Mr Navalny’s doctors have demanded immediate access to him, saying his health is now approaching a critical state.


Instead of a doctor, the Kremlin has sent a television propaganda team, led by Maria Butina, a celebrity Putin supporter who was jailed in America for infiltrating American political circles as part of Russia’s attempt to influence the presidential election of 2016. Swaggering into Mr Navalny’s barrack with a TV crew, she yelled that the prison was more comfortable than a hotel in the small Siberian town where she grew up. (No matter that it has no hotel at all.) When Mr Navalny’s doctor and political ally, Anastasia Vasilyeva, arrived at the prison gates to demand access a few days later, she was detained, along with several journalists, including one from CNN.


Few things illustrate the pettiness of Mr Putin’s regime as clearly as its treatment of political prisoners. Mr Navalny asked for a family photo album; it was denied. While he is on hunger strike, he says, the prison governor had sweets planted in his clothes and gave his cellmates an electric stove on which they grill chicken and bread. “This is the essence of this regime’s [belief]: why would anyone want to defend his principles or fight for his rights if there is tasty grilled chicken nearby,” Mr Navalny said in an Instagram post via his lawyers.


While the Kremlin tries to crush Mr Navalny’s morale, his team has mounted a campaign to free him. It has called for a 500,000 strong street protest demanding Mr Navalny’s release and has already persuaded nearly 450,000 to sign up for it. And it continues to needle Mr Putin with revelations of alleged corruption in his regime, including, most recently a new revelation about one of Mr Putin’s lavish residences with massage rooms, a swimming pool, and an extreme-cold cryotherapy chamber.


Faced with the possibility of the largest protest in modern Russia’s history and the prospect of suffering a crushing defeat in the parliamentary elections in September, the Kremlin has responded with drastic threats. On April 16th Russian prosecutors demanded that Mr Navalny’s anti-corruption foundation and all his regional branches should be banned as extremist organisations. This would mean that anyone working or even volunteering for Mr Navalny could face criminal charges.


A statement, issued by Mr Navalny’s team, says this amounts to mass political repression. “The darkest times for any freethinking people and for the civil society in Russia are coming. Effectively the Kremlin has just demanded that anyone who disagrees with it, who disagrees with [Mr Putin’s] palaces...with corruption...is recognised as an extremist.” The Kremlin’s move has solidified Mr Navalny’s reputation as Mr Putin’s number-one opponent.


Even in his torment, Mr Navalny can subject Mr Putin, too, to an agonising dilemma. On the one hand, giving in to the hunger striker’s demand would look like a political defeat, and a moral victory for his hated critic. But to let him die would make Mr Putin even more like “the killer” President Joe Biden has called him. Facing new American sanctions imposed this week for a range of Russian behaviour, Mr Putin must know that Mr Navalny’s death would make any hope of international rehabilitation even more remote.
Enrico letta, a former prime minister who returned from the political wilderness to lead Italy’s centre-left Democratic Party (pd), is one of Italy’s more courteous politicians. Yet in one respect he has acted ruthlessly since being elected leader on March 14th. Having named a woman as one of his two deputies and given women eight of the 16 seats in the pd’s executive, he forced out its male chief whips in both houses of parliament so that women could be appointed to replace them.


Mr Letta’s uncharacteristic purge came as a well-judged response to an outcry that followed his predecessor’s decision to put men into all three of the ministerial places allotted to the pd in Mario Draghi’s coalition government. The indignant clamour was a sign of changed expectations in a country that, back in the 1970s, had one of Europe’s most militant and successful feminist movements, but which then lost ground dramatically in terms of equality for women.


Giusi Marchetta, a feminist writer, blames among other factors the influence of Silvio Berlusconi’s television channels, with their lascivious portrayal of women. Born in 1982, Ms Marchetta says: “I grew up in an atmosphere in which the notion of women was constantly sexualised.”


A turning-point was the nationwide demonstration in 2011 against the hosting by Mr Berlusconi, then Italy’s prime minister, of so-called “Bunga Bunga” parties, whose many female guests included a 16-year-old. The subsequent rise of social media has eroded the influence of television, and of Mr Berlusconi’s network. Recent years have also seen a sharpened focus on practical issues, from the levying of vat on tampons to violence against women and sexual harassment.


Between 2010 and 2018, Italy’s gender-equality rating, as measured by the European Institute for Gender Equality, increased by more than ten points out of 100—the biggest rise for any eu state. Last year the institute’s index ranked Italy 13th out of the eu’s 27 countries, ahead of Portugal but well behind Spain and France. Italy has seen an increase in the number of women in top jobs, largely thanks to the introduction of quotas for female company directors (33%) and national lawmakers (40%). And the pay gap between men and women in Italy is nowadays no wider than in many other European countries.


Still, these advances mask what Francesca Bettio of the University of Siena fears is a larger problem: the limited participation of women in the labour market. Italy has the lowest female employment rate of any eu country, at 57%; and the worst in the industrialised world bar Mexico and Turkey. Italian women are also far more likely than Italian men to be employed part-time or on short-term contracts.


To some extent this reflects social attitudes, notably the view, especially prevalent in the south, that women should give up work when they first become pregnant. But such attitudes are both cause and effect of things that politicians could change, including a strikingly low level of formal child care. In Italy there are public and private places available for only 26% of children below the age of three, against more than half in both France and Spain. Mr Draghi’s government is currently debating whether to earmark part of its share of the eu’s €750bn ($895bn) post-pandemic recovery fund to increase that figure. 
The last time that Russia gathered so many troops on Ukraine’s borders, it went on to invade the country and annex Crimea. A deployment in recent weeks “mirrors the size and scope and scale” of Russian activity in 2014, noted General Todd Wolters, America’s senior commander for Europe, on April 13th.


A public acknowledgement that same day by Sergei Shoigu, Russia’s defence minister, that the country had indeed built up two armies and three airborne units, but only for “combat training exercises”, was hardly reassuring—the invasion seven years ago was also preceded by similarly ambiguous manoeuvres.


The aim of the Russian build-up remains unclear. It is certainly not a routine exercise. For instance, a long-range military communication system deployed near Voronezh, some 200km (125 miles) from the border with Ukraine (see map), is only used for very large units and thus “indicative of the scale of the deployment”, notes Janes, a defence-intelligence company. Some units have travelled from thousands of kilometres away. Tom Bullock, an analyst at Janes, says that troops still appear to be moving towards the border.


For all this, notes Michael Kofman of cna, a think-tank in Washington, the movements are both “decidedly visible”, thus precluding a surprise attack, and organised in a way that points against a major military operation. Units are staging near training grounds, rather than moving to assembly areas or dispersing, making them easier to find and see. Nor is it clear what Russia would actually seize. “I don't think there is any objective important enough that would necessitate a ground invasion—with all of the repercussions that would follow,” says Rob Lee of King’s College London.


What is more likely is that Vladimir Putin, Russia’s president, is using his armed forces as an instrument of coercive diplomacy. A ceasefire between Russia and Ukraine over Donbas, a breakaway region of eastern Ukraine, is under strain. The killing of a Ukrainian soldier on April 10th was the 28th this year. Moreover, in February Ukraine enraged the Kremlin by imposing sanctions on Viktor Medvedchuk, a pro-Russian politician and businessman.


Dmitry Trenin of the Carnegie Moscow Centre, a think-tank, argues that Volodymyr Zelensky, Ukraine’s president, began the current cycle of escalation by moving heavy weapons towards the border in February (though the evidence for that is “inconclusive at best”, says Mr Bullock) and cracking down on Ukraine’s Russian-speaking opposition to “provoke Russia” and draw Western support.


In this telling, Russia’s mobilisation is intended to “cool the fervour of Ukrainian leaders”. Mr Putin may hope to frighten Mr Zelensky into offering concessions, such as greater autonomy for pro-Russian rebels in the Donbas.


Yet Mr Putin’s domestic circumstances might also have encouraged his muscle-flexing. His government arrested over 10,000 protesters in January who came out in support of Alexei Navalny, an opposition leader who is languishing in a Siberian prison. Mr Putin’s political ratings have slumped, ahead of parliamentary elections in September. Over two-fifths of Russians say that the country is moving in the wrong direction and the economy is stagnating.


Thus far, Mr Putin has failed to extract anything from Mr Zelensky, who has received vocal support from the West. On April 2nd President Joe Biden phoned his Ukrainian counterpart for the first time. American backing for Ukraine—which is not a member of nato—will go only so far, warns Oleksandr Danylyuk, who briefly served as the director of Mr Zelensky’s national security council. Mr Biden is wary of the former comic’s lack of experience and his initial effort to make peace with Russia, says Mr Danylyuk.


Yet Ukraine is not without other friends. A week after speaking to Mr Biden, Mr Zelensky visited Turkey, which is selling Ukraine the same sort of low-cost drones which helped Azerbaijan thrash Armenia in a war last year.


Mr Putin, increasingly estranged from the West and eager for recognition, can claim at least one diplomatic victory. On March 22nd Russia said that Mr Biden had rejected the offer of a video conference. Three weeks later, on April 13th, with Russian armour massed, Mr Biden offered a summit meeting “in the coming months”. Mr Zelensky will be watching nervously. 
THE HYDRA was a fearsome beast. Lop off one of the legendary monster’s many heads and two would grow in its place.


So it is scarcely reassuring that the EU’s police agency, Europol, should pick the Hydra to symbolise the threat Europe faces from organised crime. In its latest Serious and Organised Crime Threat Assessment, published on April 12th, in a passage that exudes fatalism, the authors write: "The experience of law enforcement authorities has shown that even successful and far-reaching disruption of criminal networks has little long-term consequence for the overall activities of organised crime…removing one head does not kill the monster."


The threat assessment, published once every four years, is a corrective to the perhaps naive view that, as Europe becomes more prosperous, serious crime will fade away. Some forms of reliably measurable crime are indeed diminishing. The murder rates in all but four of the EU’s member states were lower in 2018 than in 2009. On average, they were down by more than a quarter. But organised crime, which covers a wide range of activities from the smuggling of narcotics, arms and human beings to counterfeiting and various forms of fraud and cybercrime, is largely clandestine and invisible. Changes in the volume of organised crime are far harder to assess. But what evidence there is suggests it is an EU growth industry (drug seizures, for example, indicate that cocaine is entering Europe in what the report calls "unprecedented quantities").


That is of concern to more than just the police, because, as the report points out, organised crime undermines society. It leads to the corruption of politicians and officials. It can be used to finance terrorism. And it distorts markets in numerous ways: companies that are infiltrated or acquired by organised criminals often enjoy unfair advantages not only because of access to zero-cost financing but also, in some cases, through the ability to win contracts by means of intimidation.


Two developments in the past 30-odd years have made this a golden age for mobsters. One is globalisation. People, including criminals, and money, including the profits of crime, can move across borders with unprecedented ease (though less so since the start of the pandemic). In the EU, according to Europol, about half the mobsters are from elsewhere and around 70% of criminal networks are active in more than three countries. Money laundering has become more widespread and sophisticated in Europe than had previously been realised, says the report: “professional money launderers have established a parallel underground financial system…isolated from any oversight mechanisms.”


The other development is digitalisation. The darknet and cybercurrencies in particular allow organised criminals to trade undisturbed in the shadows. Digitalisation has also created entirely new forms of crime, from exploiting children sexually online to “smishing” (using text messages to elicit sensitive personal information such as bank-account passwords).


Cybercrime networks often turn out to involve geeks and hackers very different from the popular stereotype of organised criminals. But there is still plenty of room for gangsters of the old school. Last June police discovered a fully equipped torture chamber. It consisted of converted shipping containers that had been soundproofed. Inside the containers were devices that could be used to inflict unbearable pain. One had a dentist’s chair with straps for arms and feet. All had handcuffs attached to the floors and ceilings. Yet this grisly complex was not in some low-life district of Palermo. It was found by Dutch police at Wouwse Plantage, near the border with Belgium and less than 100km (60 miles) from the headquarters of the European Commission and the European Parliament in Brussels.
With their unique language, unrelated to all other European tongues, the continent’s oldest cave paintings, and their seafaring, gastronomic and choral traditions, the Basques have long had a strong sense of identity. Nationalist propagandists have gone further, claiming that the Basques form an ancient and superior race, the first Europeans. In some versions they descend directly from the biblical Noah.


A new study of the genes of Basques and their neighbours brings mixed news for nationalists. The study, by a team at Pompeu Fabra University in Barcelona and published in Current Biology, shows that Basques are indeed genetically different from their neighbours. But those differences seem to be relatively recent, dating from the end of the Iron Age (around 2,500 years ago). And they are greater in the core Basque-speaking areas than in the Basque periphery.


A key finding is that Basques and other Spaniards all descend from the same Stone Age migrants from Europe’s eastern steppes. The ancient Iberians, too, spoke a non-Indo-European language (like Basque, Finnish and Hungarian). The differences only began when the Romans turned up in Iberia. Recent research has found evidence that, contrary to myth, the Romans did conquer the Basque Country. But few seem to have settled in the core Basque-speaking areas. And the Arab-Berber invaders who occupied much of Iberia for seven centuries scarcely got there. Impenetrable mountains and an incomprehensible language discouraged genetic mingling, the researchers surmise.


These findings should scotch the idea of a separate Basque race, as asserted by Sabino Arana, the founder of the Basque Nationalist Party (pnv). Arana was an anti-Semite who proclaimed the racial and religious purity of the Basques. When industrialisation brought a flood of migrants from the rest of the country, he warned against “the rubbing shoulders of our children with the children of the Spanish nation”.


The Basque language, a clutch of dialects that were codified in 1968, has replaced race as the focus of Basque nationalism. The pnv, which has successfully governed the autonomous Basque region for most of the past 40 years, vigorously supports the language. Having long distanced itself from Arana, it is a broadly Christian democratic party. But all nationalists, including the former terrorists of eta, might usefully acknowledge that Basques have much in common with other Spaniards.
Vladimir putin may have hoped that locking up his main political opponent in a harsh penal colony would finally put him out of sight and out of mind. Instead, Alexei Navalny continues to torment the Russian president, exposing the cruelty and lies of his regime.


Deprived of his freedom and of any public platform, Mr Navalny is fighting back with the only instruments he has left: his body and his life. Since March 31st he has been on a hunger strike in his cell in Pokrov, some 100km (60 miles) east of Moscow. He is protesting against the appalling conditions of his confinement—he is being deprived both of sleep and of medical care. He has a fever and breathing problems. Three men in his barrack have been diagnosed with tuberculosis, which is common in Russian prisons.


Mr Navalny, who survived after being poisoned with Novichok, a nerve agent, last August, is also suffering severe back pain and numbness in both legs. Nonetheless, he has been denied access to a doctor of his choice, to which he is entitled under Russian law. Russia’s prison service has labelled him an escape risk, even though he voluntarily returned to Russia to face Mr Putin. This label means he can be woken every hour during the night by a prison guard shining a torch in his face.


“There is a real prospect that Russia is subjecting him to a slow death,” tweeted Agnès Callamard, the incoming head of Amnesty International, a human-rights group. She has written to Mr Putin calling for his release, noting that he is in jail only because he is “an outspoken critic of the Russian authorities”. She also demanded that Mr Navalny be granted access to a doctor he trusts.


Instead of a doctor, the Kremlin sent a television propaganda team to taunt Mr Navalny. For the assignment it chose Maria Butina, a celebrity Putin supporter who was jailed in America for infiltrating American political circles as part of Russia’s attempt to influence the election of 2016. Swaggering into Mr Navalny’s barrack with a tv crew, she yelled that the prison was more comfortable than a hotel in the small Siberian town where she grew up. (No matter that it has no hotel at all.) When Mr Navalny’s doctor and political ally, Anastasia Vasilyeva, arrived at the prison gates to demand access a few days later, she was detained, along with several journalists, including one from cnn.


Few things illustrate the pettiness of Mr Putin’s regime as clearly as its treatment of political prisoners. Mr Navalny asked for a family photo album; it was denied. While he is on hunger strike, he says, the prison governor had sweets planted in his clothes and gave his cellmates an electric stove on which they grill chicken and bread. “This is the essence of this regime’s [belief]: why would anyone want to defend his principles or fight for his rights if there is tasty grilled chicken nearby,” Mr Navalny said in an Instagram post via his lawyers.


While the Kremlin tries to crush Mr Navalny’s morale, his team has mounted a campaign to free him. It hopes to persuade at least 500,000 people to sign a protest against his imprisonment; as The Economist went to press, it had already gathered over 400,000 signatures. Various artists, scientists and journalists have sent messages of support. Every day that Mr Navalny spends in prison, he risks losing his health or worse. But he is gaining moral and political weight. 
“You won’t make it on your own…let’s unite,” said Boyko Borisov, Bulgaria’s prime minister, standing forlornly in the snow soon after the polls had closed on April 4th. Opinion pollsters had predicted that the man who has dominated Bulgarian politics for more than a decade would lose some of his once-stellar support, but they did not foresee that he would do nearly as badly as he actually did. Now Mr Borisov is busy suggesting the formation of a technocratic government, which he would presumably control, though from behind the scenes.


Mr Borisov is clinging to power by his fingernails, and will remain dangling for weeks as the shocked leaders of the parties that have made it into parliament see if they can form a government. With 26% of the vote, his party will be the largest, but the vast majority of deputies from other parties have nothing in common—except that they loathe him.


Bulgaria is the poorest country in the eu, although its economy is a quarter bigger than it was when Mr Borisov became prime minister for the first time, in 2009. Then unemployment was a problem; now labour is scarce, not least because so many Bulgarians have emigrated. Last year the country was shaken by months of protest by people fed up with decades of ingrained corruption, political meddling in the judiciary and arrogant oligarchs.


Mr Borisov, a burly former bodyguard, came to power promising to stamp out corruption. Now, says Dimitar Bechev, a political scientist, his “tough guy, man-of-the-people act has worn out and he has come to symbolise all that is wrong with the country”. As scandal swirled around him and his party last year, photographs were leaked that appeared to show him in bed with a pistol on his bedside table and wodges of €500 ($595) notes in its half-open drawer. Mr Borisov said that the pictures had been manipulated.


Although those protests eventually fizzled out, the anger of the demonstrators has now been translated into parliament in the shape of three anti-Borisov parties. The biggest is led by Slavi Trifonov, a talk-show host and the frontman of the Ku-Ku Band, a musical combo whose albums include “Rip off the head of the duck”. He refused to campaign in the election. This strategy was successful, says Marin Lessenski, an analyst, because “it allowed everyone to project their own expectations onto him.”


Claiming to have symptoms of covid-19, Mr Trifonov has said nothing since his party came second with 18%. His preferred political mode is criticism and protest, says Boriana Dimitrova, a sociologist; he has presumably been shocked by the realisation that his unexpected success means he will now have to take some responsibility for the future of the country.


Ms Dimitrova predicts that either forming a new government will prove impossible, in which case a new poll is likely to be held in July, or that a short-lived technocratic government with a limited mandate supported by the anti-Borisov parties will take the helm until a new vote is held alongside a presidential election that is planned for October.


Mr Lessenski is less certain. Mr Borisov has been written off before, he says, and previously “proved a master tactician”. He thinks Mr Borisov will try to secure support in parliament from a party that represents Bulgaria’s Turkish minority, plus others that may somehow be persuaded to part with their anti-Borisov principles.


In the coming seven years up to €29bn of eu funds are available to be disbursed. Having a hand in how that is spent, legitimately or not, could act as “a huge incentive” to join a government. 
Marion anne perrine le pen never really meant to go into politics. It was her eldest sister, Marie-Caroline, who was thought destined to follow in the footsteps of their father, Jean-Marie, co-founder in 1972 of France’s far-right National Front. Marine, as she became known in childhood, was the baby of the family, the third blonde daughter, who set out to make a career as a lawyer. Yet for the past ten years, for reasons of chance and guile, it is Marine Le Pen who has run the party she renamed National Rally. And in 12 months’ time it is her name that will appear on the ballot paper at the next French presidential election, for the third consecutive contest. Is it time to think the unthinkable?


To dwell on the possibility, however slim, that Ms Le Pen might seize the presidency unsettles the liberal-minded. The very discussion of it offers her oxygen and confers legitimacy on a candidate who once compared Muslims praying in the street in France to the Nazi occupation. Yet the odds of a Ms Le Pen victory are no longer close to zero. With covid-19 infections soaring again and a vaccination campaign only now taking off, Emmanuel Macron’s rating is slipping. After a president on the right (Nicolas Sarkozy), the left (François Hollande) and the centre (Mr Macron), a disenchanted electorate may be tempted to try something different. The main reason voters tend to back her party is that they are fed up with all the others.


Moreover, Ms Le Pen is now a veteran campaigner, who knows the toll a two-round presidential election takes, and the scars defeat leaves. She has mastered the crushing one-liner, mocking Mr Macron’s decision on March 31st to put France into a national lockdown after all as his “Waterloo vaccinal”. “Confinement, déconfinement, reconfinement,” chants Ms Le Pen, taunting the government’s shifting strategy. Polls suggest that, were a run-off to be held today, she might score 47-48% to Mr Macron’s 52-53%, a chillingly narrow margin. Once, it was assumed that moderate voters of the left and right would rise in shock and shame across the land to keep a Le Pen from the highest office. Today, voters disillusioned with Mr Macron, particularly on the left, vow simply to abstain.


If Mr Macron’s troubles open up space for Ms Le Pen, however, they also bring greater scrutiny. Some unsavoury types still lurk in her shadow. There will be questions about her approach to the democratic exercise of power. Closer inspection will also involve what might be called the competence challenge. In the past, when the National Front was a party of protest, this mattered little. Her father sought to howl, not to rule. She seeks power.


Four years ago, her policy pitch was distinctive. She was a Frexiteer, who vowed to take France out of the euro, close its borders to immigrants, clamp down on Islamism and force factories to make stuff and keep jobs at home. She contrasted her “patriotic” approach with what she called Mr Macron’s “mondialiste” vision: of deregulation and post-national Europeanism.


Today, however, Ms Le Pen has ditched Frexit, would keep the euro and promises to forge a “Europe of nations” by reforming from within. The candidate no longer has a monopoly on questions of national sovereignty; all parties vow to make more masks, vaccines and medicines in France. Mr Macron’s “republican values” bill, meanwhile, which his critics see as a hunt for Ms Le Pen’s far-right vote, is also designed to curb Islamism. Indeed Gérald Darmanin, his interior minister, startled her in a debate by accusing her of being too soft on such matters. Today Ms Le Pen, popular among anti-vaxxers, backs vaccination.


Many voters will still see the family name, disregard the fresh packaging and reject the underlying message as divisive and toxic. Roughly a quarter say they would back Ms Le Pen in the first round, but this is no more than it was a year before the previous presidential vote. Yet there is scope for her to grab more. Some of her policies are now hard to distinguish from those of the mainstream conservative or nationalist right. Indeed her pledges to restrict citizenship rights and cut immigration are espoused by conservative parties across Europe, including in Britain. When Ms Le Pen promises to manage things better, it may come down to whether voters think she is competent enough to do so.


Which, paradoxically, offers macronistas some comfort. Nobody has forgotten Ms Le Pen’s wild-eyed second-round debate against Mr Macron in 2017, when he calmly reminded her that she had confused a firm that makes telephones with one that makes industrial turbines. He may be damaged by his handling of the third covid-19 wave. But, as vaccinations pick up, Mr Macron could yet recover. He is less disliked than either Mr Sarkozy or Mr Hollande at this point in their terms. If the next election hinges on technical expertise, Mr Macron will have a sizeable advantage.


Come one, come all
However, worries about Ms Le Pen’s fitness to govern could help potential rivals on the right, too. One, Xavier Bertrand, head of the Hauts-de-France region, has already said he will run. Another, Valérie Pécresse, head of the Paris region, may yet do so. Yet another, Edouard Philippe, Mr Macron’s ex-prime minister, is sitting it out as mayor of Le Havre, describing himself in a publicity tour for a new book as “loyal” but also “free”. For which, probably, read: I won’t run against Mr Macron, but won’t hesitate to declare should the president decide he can’t. Even Michel Barnier, the eu’s former Brexit negotiator, could give it a go.


Ultimately, Ms Le Pen may still be judged, at least in the first round, not on cerebral calculations about expertise, but on identity, emotion and anti-elite anger in rural and industrial France. The competence challenge will apply more to the run-off. Which, at this point, is still most likely to see Mr Macron take on, and narrowly beat, Ms Le Pen. But politics remains highly fluid. Traditional parties are hollow. The rebellious French like to spring a surprise. No one is better placed to know that than Mr Macron. 
Every self-respecting European country needs a public broadcaster. So after Slovenia seceded from Yugoslavia in 1991, it gave Radio-Television of Slovenia (rtv-slo) a mandate to report independently, unlike the state propaganda that passed for news under communism. Indeed, rtv-slo has proved too independent for Slovenia’s current prime minister, Janez Jansa. For more than a year he has been browbeating the network’s journalists on social media. Wags have consequently dubbed Mr Jansa “Marshal Twito”, a nod to Josip Tito, Yugoslavia’s longtime dictator. His government wants to pass a new media law that will make RTV-SLO easier to control.


The Netherlands’ national public news broadcaster, the nos, also has its roots in a reaction against authoritarian propaganda, that of the Nazi occupiers during the second world war. The nos has an independent board and a guaranteed multi-year budget. But lately Dutch public broadcasters have faced intimidation, too. Reporters have been physically attacked at protests and while reporting on covid-19 measures. In October the nos removed its logo from its satellite vans after they were repeatedly harassed in traffic.


The problems in Slovenia and the Netherlands are typical of those that are increasingly facing public broadcasters all over Europe. In some countries, such as Hungary and Poland, illiberal governments are turning them into mouthpieces for the ruling party. In others, such as Germany and Sweden, populist movements accuse them of bias in favour of the establishment and the left. Modelled on Britain’s bbc (now facing political pressures of its own), Europe’s public media were set up to anchor democracy by providing citizens with objective reporting. But in an age of polarisation and disinformation, that is getting harder to do.


The recent reversal of public broadcasters’ independence started in Russia after Vladimir Putin came to power in 1999. By the mid-2000s Russian news shows’ agendas were being set at government-led meetings. When Viktor Orban won power in Hungary in 2010 he adapted Mr Putin’s blueprint, transforming the state media agency mtva into a propaganda organ. Outrageously, the group was restructured into a shell company in a fashion that exempts it from the law governing public media. During the European Parliament elections in 2019, editors at mtva were recorded instructing reporters to favour Mr Orban’s Fidesz party.


Poland’s Law and Justice (pis) party followed Mr Orban’s example when it won power in 2015. It quickly turned tvp, the public tv network, into a bullhorn. The network championed campaigns against gay rights and demonised the opposition mayor of Gdansk. After he was assassinated by an extremist in 2019 a court told tvp to pay damages, but it has not complied.


If in eastern Europe the pressure on public media comes from government, in western Europe it comes from the populist opposition. During the migrant crisis in Germany in 2016, anti-immigrant protesters began attacking the big public broadcasters, zdf and ard, as Lügenpresse (“lying press”), a Nazi-era slur. Such open hostility has abated, says Peter Frey, zdf’s editor-in-chief, and reporters no longer worry about their safety at demonstrations. But the sense that the public media are biased towards the left has taken root in conservative areas, especially the formerly communist East.


The greatest risk may be to broadcasters’ finances. Most of the budget of zdf and ard comes from a dedicated tax that must be renewed every four years. But each of Germany’s states must sign off, and a proposed rate rise was blocked by the eastern state of Saxony-Anhalt. Critics there complained that the broadcasters focus too much on big cities and on themes such as gay rights and gender that appeal to educated urbanites. Populist parties in Sweden and the Netherlands want to cut their state broadcasters’ budgets, too.


Public broadcasters have tried to win over critics. In Germany, zdf has acknowledged its failure to cover rural areas and the east. For the past three years it has broadcast periodic town-hall discussions from smaller towns around the country. The Dutch system has a built-in safety-valve: anyone who can sign up 50,000 paying subscribers gets the right to a public tv station of their own, with designated time slots on the national channels. Since 2009 three stations with right-leaning agendas have been launched. But that has scarcely calmed things: the newest station, Ongehoord Nederland (“Unheard Netherlands”), attacks the nos as fake news.


A better ally has been covid-19. Last year the appetite for rapid, accurate news about the pandemic and government social-distancing measures boosted state media’s ratings after years of decline. Traffic on European public broadcasters’ websites more than doubled. News shows even won over some young viewers (see chart).




Overall trust in public broadcasters has risen over the past few years, according to the European Broadcasting Union, the groups’ umbrella organisation. But that conceals a widening split, one that mirrors sharpening political polarisation. In most countries where public broadcasters remain independent, the public has confidence in them. But a disaffected minority has grown increasingly hostile.


Public broadcasters are especially vital in European countries where not enough people speak the local language to support diverse private broadcasting. In the Baltic states, populist attacks on the state-owned channels by groups like Estonia’s far-right ekre party have failed to catch on: they are simply too important. Yet there are worries there, too. Reporters at Latvia’s public broadcaster have faced more threats of violence over the past six months, says Rita Rudusa, the group’s head of strategy, mainly from covid-19 deniers.


In Latvia, too, the chief risk is the legal and financing structure. The country’s new public-media law fails to include a set-aside tax like the television licence fee that funds the bbc. That leaves it vulnerable to political pressure. And it is not clear that the supervisory board will be protected from political appointments.


In Slovenia such political control over the budget and supervisory board threatens the public broadcaster’s independence. The proposed new public-media law would give some of its revenues to other news agencies, including ones that serve up propaganda for Mr Jansa. Journalists at rtv-slo feared for their jobs. “Only a few of us left are still being critical, but we’re being silenced,” says a senior reporter. But on March 30th the defection of several mps left Mr Jansa’s government without a majority in parliament. If he cannot pass his media law, Mr Orban’s model of public broadcasting may lose a new recruit.


Corrections (April 10th and 12th):This article initially stated that the Slovenian government is refusing to pay RTV-SLO’s budget and that the law would allow politicians to appoint more of RTV-SLO's board members. Both statements were untrue. The government has withheld payments this year to STA, the state-backed news agency, and the law would allow the government to directly appoint board members of STA. The Economist regrets the errors.
Acommunist-era joke, in updated form, has been doing the rounds on German social media. “Are there no vaccines here?” someone asks, to be told: “No, there are no vaccines over there. There are no tests here.” The gag captures the dismay many Germans feel about their state’s inability to fend off the third wave of the pandemic, even as other countries vaccinate their way towards freedom.


Two factors explain the descent into misery. The first is that much of the lockdown armoury is already deployed. In October, politicians could close restaurants, bars and museums to battle the second wave. But most restrictions have only tightened since, leaving Germany to countenance hitherto untried options like compulsory testing and curfews. Meanwhile, an ever changing tangle of rules leaves citizens confused and businesses in despair.


The second is a fraying of Germany’s federal model. Throughout the pandemic, national and state leaders have thrashed out lockdown rules at regular summits, ensuring decisions that could be implemented consistently by local leaders. The system had its flaws, not least in sidelining parliament. But now it is creaking. Meetings run late into the night, as ill-considered ideas are batted around in the hunt for compromise. (Last week Angela Merkel had to apologise for one, a short-lived plan to tighten restrictions over Easter.) Politicians are briefing against each other via leaks. Now several states, including North Rhine-Westphalia, the largest, have ignored a national agreement to pull an “emergency brake” when covid numbers exceed a certain threshold, preferring instead to expand testing capacity or limit restrictions to the hardest-hit areas.


On March 28th Mrs Merkel attacked the freelancing state leaders, hinting that their intransigence would be met with changes to federal law. She extended her rebuke to Armin Laschet, the premier of North Rhine-Westphalia who hopes to succeed her as chancellor after an election in September. Yet he and others vowed to stick to their guns. As authority drains from Mrs Merkel a vacuum has developed at the heart of German decision-making. Add sluggish vaccinations, and pandemic policy has never known such disarray.


The fallout is visible not only in soaring caseloads and dwindling beds for intensive-care units. The polling lead enjoyed by Mrs Merkel’s Christian Democratic Union (cdu) and its Bavarian ally, the Christian Social Union (csu), is evaporating. Soon after Easter the two parties must pick a single candidate to lead them into the election. The main rival of Mr Laschet, who was recently anointed as the cdu leader, is Markus Söder, his csu counterpart. Straight after Mrs Merkel’s interview, Mr Söder backed her tougher line. Voters find him the more appealing candidate. 


Serbia may not have had such glowing press coverage since the first world war. A poor country by European standards, and plagued by corruption, it nonetheless has one of the world’s fastest covid-19 vaccination campaigns—third in Europe in total doses delivered per person. Thousands of Bosnians, Macedonians and Montenegrins have crossed the border for free jabs. President Aleksandar Vucic has been having a good pandemic.








On the government’s health website Serbs can sign up to receive a Chinese vaccine, a Russian one, a Western one or whatever is available. About three-quarters of the shots given so far are Chinese. To obtain the sought-after Pfizer vaccine, you may need contacts. Foreigners get AstraZeneca, possibly because many locals do not want it. By March 27th 20% of Serbs had had at least one dose. Mr Vucic crowed that 30-year-olds in Germany would have to wait for ages to get their first jab.


Nevertheless, rates of infection and death are rising fast. Many Serbs do not bother to take precautions, says Ivan Kostic, a surgeon in the central town of Cacak, particularly those who have had their first shot. Unlike elsewhere in Europe, there have been no long lockdowns. The health-care system is run-down: Serbian hospitals have a quarter fewer staff than western European ones, estimates Dr Kostic, partly because so many have emigrated.




Worse, conspiracy theories are starting to undermine the vaccination drive. One study found 70% of Serbs believe in at least one covid-19 conspiracy theory, such as that it is a bioweapon or is spread by drug makers; in western Europe the rate is about a quarter. Since the 1980s, says Vedran Dzihic of Vienna University, Serbia has engaged in “hyper-production” of conspiracy theories, mostly xenophobic ones directed at Albanians, Bosnians, Croats or the Vatican. Now citizens have difficulty discerning crackpot tales from reality.


Yet Mr Vucic’s strategy of not putting his foreign-policy eggs in one basket has paid off. He has bought vaccines in Europe, Russia and China, and signed deals to produce the Russian and Chinese ones in Serbia. Both countries hope to use vaccine politics to undermine faith in the eu. Polls show it is working, though some Serbs think that China expects commercial favours in return.


The eu has promised Serbia recovery funds, but has yet to donate any vaccine. Meanwhile, Mr Vucic’s success at getting vaccine elsewhere lets him pose as a regional leader. Serbia’s neighbours have few illusions about his benevolence, says Florian Bieber of Graz University. But his prowess at “street-wise, gangster-style” politics, domestic and international, makes him a force to be reckoned with. 
TO THOSE who saw him at the Elysée Palace on January 29th, President Emmanuel Macron appeared more tense than usual. The number of new covid-19 cases had been steadily rising again in France, and the announcement of a fresh lockdown was expected that evening. “Imminent reconfinement” ran the headline of the Journal du Dimanche, a Sunday paper which, presumably, had been briefed in advance. That evening, Jean Castex, the prime minister, was sent out to face the cameras. He surprised the country with measures that left the existing rules almost untouched. “Our duty,” he declared, “is to do everything to avoid a new lockdown.”


Two months later, on March 31st, covid-19 decided otherwise. In a televised address to the nation watched by 31m people, or nearly half the population, Mr Macron announced that he was putting the country into a third national lockdown, this time for a month. The new rules will come into effect on April 3rd. They will restrict all movement to within 10 kilometres (6 miles) of the home. Schools will be closed for 3-4 weeks from Monday. A national evening curfew, already in place, will continue to apply countrywide. Non-essential shops will shut, and home-working be made compulsory where possible.


It is hard not to see this as a personal defeat for the French president. Mr Macron has made liberal use of all the centralised powers afforded him by the Fifth Republic’s constitution to run the country’s health policy during the pandemic, more or less, from the Elysée. His decision in January went against explicit scientific advice given to him that day by a group of epidemiologists including Jean-François Delfraissy, the head of his scientific advisory council. They warned that, with the “le variant britannique” (B.1.1.7, a strain first found in Britain) beginning to circulate, the number of new daily hospital admissions would start to take off again in February, and accelerate exponentially in March.


Yet Mr Macron, who had by then taken to poring over medical journals late into the night, was not convinced. The previous year, also against scientific advice, he had re-opened schools before the summer holidays. Studies of performance by primary pupils, says a presidential aide, show that during the two months of home-schooling that took place last year, children fell badly behind, especially those from families in poorer areas. Keeping classrooms open became a totem of Mr Macron’s health policy. As did the mental health of the young. In January he ordered universities to give students one day a week of contact teaching. Besides which, Bruno Le Maire, the finance minister, and others urged him not to lockdown again in order to keep jobs and firms going.


Faced with these trade-offs, Mr Macron took a bet that, he hoped, would steer a narrow path to avoid lockdown. On the one hand, he imposed less drastic measures to control infection—notably the national evening curfew—while keeping schools and most businesses open. On the other, he vowed to accelerate the country’s glacial vaccination campaign.


For two months, it looked superficially promising. From mid-January to mid-March, the number of new daily cases was high, at around 20,000, but remained on a plateau. Several opposition politicians, too, resisted talk of stricter measures. On March 1st Anne Hidalgo, Socialist mayor of Paris, called the rumour of an imminent weekend confinement in the Paris region “inhumane”. By the time Mr Macron introduced on March 18th what he called “braking” measures, or local restrictions in the worst-hit areas, however, it was too late. Hospitals, as the models had predicted, were already overwhelmed. New daily cases soared to 57,897 on April 1st.


In his address this week, Mr Macron conceded “errors”, but defended his decision not to lockdown earlier, declaring “we have won precious days of liberty”. The opposition, however, has been merciless. Far from saving time, say many, the president has wasted precious days, and lives. Marine Le Pen, nationalist leader of the National Rally, called his about-turn a “Waterloo vaccinal”. Olivier Faure, leader of the Socialist Party, said that Mr Macron had taken a gamble “and the French have lost”. On April 1st France recorded a cumulative total of about 96,000 deaths from covid-19.


The broader question, 12 months ahead of the next presidential election, is how far all this will have enfeebled Mr Macron politically. Even before the president announced a new lockdown, a poll recorded a monthly slide of two points in his popularity rating, to 39% in March. There has been much confusion over the merits, or otherwise, of the AstraZeneca vaccine, which Mr Macron once bizarrely called “quasi-inefficace” for the over 65s, before changing his mind. There have been repeated delays to the delivery of that vaccine, a spat over exports of it from the European Union, and a messy vaccination roll-out within France. A recent poll suggested that, were the second round of the presidential election to be a re-run of 2017, Ms Le Pen would score 48% to Mr Macron’s 52%—a far closer outcome than the result four years ago. It is a measure of the current mood that Ms Le Pen is challenging Mr Macron on, of all things, competence.


Whether this is enough to damage Mr Macron fatally, however, will depend on how things look not only during April, but by the summer. French intensive-care units are under extreme pressure. But the country has not yet witnessed the desperate scenes of triage seen in Italy at the start of the pandemic. Indeed, France has recorded fewer excess deaths per head of population than Britain, America, Spain or Italy, although more than Germany.


The broader picture will count, too. Throughout this school year, many parents have been able to work from home while their children have been in the classroom. A generous furlough scheme and support for small businesses have kept people in jobs and firms afloat. Vaccine-delivery bottlenecks are expected to clear this month, and the roll-out to improve. Despite the grumbling, seven out of ten French people say they approve of the new lockdown.


In short, Mr Macron is in trouble, for sure. He has just lost his gamble. This month promises to be difficult, and criticism of him will be fierce. But the unpublished novelist that he is will know that it is the ending that counts. And it may, just, not be too late to shape that.
Over the years, Swedes, Germans and Russians have all had a go at conquering Latvia and imposing their flavours of Christianity on it. Today Lutherans worship mainly in the country’s west, and Russian Orthodox in the east. But Latvia’s deepest rituals are still inspired by its home-grown brand of paganism. They include wild summer-solstice parties and a national song-and-dance festival every five years.








The hymns of this prehistoric faith are folk poems, typically four lines long, called dainas. Thanks to Krisjanis Barons, a folklorist who encouraged Latvians to note down such quatrains in the 19th and early 20th centuries, over a million of them are on file at the national library in Riga, the capital. Some have musical notation, but since dainas follow predictable schemes the tunes tend to be repeated, as in Celtic jigs and reels.


For the past 22 years, Ieva Szentivanyi has been rendering dainas into English. Her first volume was published in 2018 and the second is ready for the press. The rhythm of Latvian is hard to translate, but more difficult is conveying the affection of the language’s diminutive suffixes. The English diminutive of “book” is “booklet”; in Latvian, she explains, it more like a “dearest, sweetest, most beloved book”. Dainas are short, but rich in metaphor and symbolism:


Birch tree, dear, thou art so ample All the way to the ground; Dearest wife, thou art so lovely All the way to deep old age.


Aficionados say this canon of folk poems is as significant as any body of classical literature. Ms Szenivanyi calls them Latvia’s wisdom to share with the world. Some scholars claim a few could date from the Bronze Age: in one a warrior duelling with his sister’s abuser breaks his sword against a gatepost, something an iron weapon would be unlikely to do.


There is one class of daina that Mrs Szentivanyi dares not touch, mythical ones that speak of melting seas and waves of sunshine, which are confusing enough in the original Latvian. She aims to finish 2,000 of them. It is a daunting challenge: as one of her favourite dainas has it, “the words go on and on”.
“Barbarians”, a netflix drama set 2,000 years ago in ancient Germania, inverts some modern stereotypes. In it, sexy, impulsive, proto-German tribesmen take on an oppressive superstate led by cold, rational Latin-speakers from Rome. Produced in Germany, it has all the hallmarks of a glossy American drama (gratuitous violence and prestige nudity) while remaining unmistakably German (in one episode someone swims through a ditch full of scheisse). It is a popular mix: on a Sunday in October, it was the most-watched show on Netflix not just in Germany, but also in France, Italy and 14 other European countries.








Moments when Europeans sit down and watch the same thing at roughly the same time used to be rare. They included the Eurovision Song Contest and the Champions League football, with not much in between. Now they are more common, thanks to the growth of streaming platforms such as Netflix, which has 58m subscribers on the continent. For most of its existence, television was a national affair. Broadcasters stuck rigidly to national borders, pumping out French programmes for the French and Danish ones for the Danes. Streaming services, however, treat Europe as one large market rather than 27 individual ones, with the same content available in each. Jean Monnet, one of the eu’s founding fathers, who came up with the idea of mangling together national economies to stop Europeans from killing each other, was once reputed to have said: “If I were to do it again from scratch, I would start with culture.” Seven decades on from the era of Monnet, cultural integration is beginning to happen.


Umberto Eco, an Italian writer, was right when he said the language of Europe is translation. Netflix and other deep-pocketed global firms speak it well. Just as the eu employs a small army of translators and interpreters to turn intricate laws or impassioned speeches of Romanian meps into the eu’s 24 official languages, so do the likes of Netflix. It now offers dubbing in 34 languages and subtitling in a few more. The result is that “Capitani”, a cop drama written in Luxembourgish, a language so modest it is not even recognised by the eu, can be watched in any of English, French or Portuguese (or with Polish subtitles). Before, a top French show could be expected to be translated into English, and perhaps German, only if it was successful. Now it is the norm for any release.


The economics of European productions are more appealing, too. American audiences are more willing than before to give dubbed or subtitled viewing a chance. This means shows such as “Lupin”, a French crime caper on Netflix, can become global hits. It is worth taking a punt on an expensive retelling of an early-20th-century detective series about a gentleman jewel thief in Paris, if it has the potential to explode beyond France. In 2015, about 75% of Netflix’s original content was American; now the figure is half, according to Ampere, a media-analysis company. Netflix has about 100 productions under way in Europe, which is more than big public broadcasters in France or Germany.


And European officials wield a stick to encourage investment. European film-makers rival farmers in the ranking of cosseted European industries. To operate in the eu, streaming companies are required to ensure at least 30% of their catalogue hails from the bloc—and to promote it. Buying a back catalogue of 1990s Belgian soap operas and hiding them in a digital cupboard does not count. France compels big media firms to kick back revenues into domestic production. If European governments are intent on shaking down big American firms, it is better for everyone that the money is spent on something watchable.


Not everything works across borders. Comedy sometimes struggles. Whodunits and bloodthirsty maelstroms between arch Romans and uppity tribesmen have a more universal appeal. Some do it better than others. Barbarians aside, German television is not always built for export, says one executive, being polite. A bigger problem is that national broadcasters still dominate. Streaming services, such as Netflix or Disney+, account for about a third of all viewing hours, even in markets where they are well-established. Europe is an ageing continent. The generation of teens staring at phones is outnumbered by their elders who prefer to gawp at the box.


Actually, I want to direct
In Brussels and national capitals, the prospect of Netflix as a cultural hegemon is seen as a threat. “Cultural sovereignty” is the watchword of European executives worried that the Americans will eat their lunch. To be fair, Netflix content sometimes seems stuck in an uncanny valley somewhere in the mid-Atlantic, with local quirks stripped out. Netflix originals tend to have fewer specific cultural references than shows produced by domestic rivals, according to Enders, a market analyst. The company used to have an imperial model of commissioning, with executives in Los Angeles cooking up ideas French people might like. Now Netflix has offices across Europe. But ultimately the big decisions rest with American executives. This makes European politicians nervous.


They should not be. An irony of European integration is that it is often American companies that facilitate it. Google Translate makes European newspapers comprehensible, even if a little clunky, for the continent’s non-polyglots. American social-media companies make it easier for Europeans to talk politics across borders. (That they do not always like to hear what they say about each other is another matter.) Now Netflix and friends pump the same content into homes across a continent, making culture a cross-border endeavour, too. If Europeans are to share a currency, bail each other out in times of financial need and share vaccines in a pandemic, then they need to have something in common—even if it is just bingeing on the same series. Watching fictitious northern and southern Europeans tear each other apart 2,000 years ago beats doing so in reality. 
In the forests and plains of the Champagne-Ardenne region, where once the great powers went into battle, the French armed forces are beginning to prepare for the return of a major conflict. Planned for 2023, Exercise Orion is a full-scale divisional exercise that will last several days, based probably out of camps at Suippes, Mailly and Mourmelon. It will involve the full range of French military capacity on a scale not tested for decades. The drill will include command-post exercises, hybrid scenarios, simulation and live-fire drills. Around 10,000 soldiers could take part, as well as the air force and, in a separate maritime sequence, the navy. Belgian, British and American forces may join in.








There are other signs that the French armed forces are in the midst of a generational transformation. In January the general staff quietly established ten working groups to examine the country’s readiness for high-intensity war. French generals reckon that they have a decade or so to prepare for it. The groups cover everything from munition shortages to the resilience of society, including whether citizens are “ready to accept the level of casualties we have never seen since world war two”, says one participant. The spectre of high-end war is now so widespread in French military thinking that the scenario has its own acronym: hem, or hypothèse d'engagement majeur (hypothesis of major engagement). The presumed opponents are unnamed, but analysts point not only to Russia, but also Turkey or a North African country.


That represents a seismic shift for French forces. Thirty years ago they mostly did peacekeeping. Over the past decade, they have turned to counter-insurgency and counter-terrorism, whether abroad (Opération Barkhane in the Sahel) or at home (Opération Sentinelle). But in his strategic vision for 2030 published last year, General Thierry Burkhard, the head of the French army, called for preparing for high-intensity, state-on-state conflict.


“We absolutely have to prepare for a more dangerous world,” General Burkhard recently told The Economist. This requires what he calls a “hardening” of the land army. Currently France keeps 5,100 troops in the Sahel as part of Barkhane. Future operations “could involve brigades, or a division”, meaning 8,000-25,000 soldiers. The need to change scale over the next decade, says the general, will require a mix of reforms: more demanding recruitment; investment in modern equipment; simpler organisational structures to make the army more nimble; and toughened training for a major conflict. “We will be tested more and more brutally,” he says. “We need to realise this.”


When Emmanuel Macron was elected president in 2017, the armed forces initially doubted his commitment to military spending. After imposing a round of short-term cuts, he rowed publicly with General Pierre de Villiers, then head of the joint chiefs of staff, prompting the general to resign. Since then, however, Mr Macron has kept a campaign promise to invest heavily in France’s soldiers.


The defence budget for 2019-25 got a big boost, taking annual spending to €50bn ($59bn) by the end of the period, by which time it will be 46% up on its level of 2018. Weighted towards the later years, the budget allows military planners to think ahead, buy kit and reorganise. “It’s the first time in memory that we have a reasonable fit between the planning documents and the budget allocated,” says François Heisbourg of the Foundation for Strategic Research in Paris. It also means that France now meets its nato commitment to spend at least 2% of its gdp on defence.


The core of French military modernisation is the Scorpion programme, a $6.8bn project to replace virtually every front-line motorised and armoured vehicle in the army, upgrade the 1990s-era Leclerc tank and connect all these together over a new digital network. The idea is that a first fully-equipped Scorpion brigade should be ready by 2023. Rémy Hémez, a French officer and researcher, says that in the 15 years between 2010 and 2025 the army’s equipment will have changed more than it did in the four decades between 1970 and 2010.


Marchons, marchons
In many respects, France’s approach to future war differs from the tech-heavy vision recently unveiled by Britain. Whereas Britain is cutting troops and armour, France is keeping 60% more soldiers than Britain plans to, and 50% more tanks. It has been relatively slow to acquire and arm drones. “There is a great risk of falling behind as automation on the battlefield accelerates,” warned a report by the Institut Montaigne, a think-tank. Indeed, French officers tend to be more sceptical than British or American ones that technology will transform the battlefield. “Technology is never 100% effective,” warns General Burkhard. “Soldiers must always be able to fight in a degraded way…when the technology does not work any more.”




That does not mean France is ignoring new domains of war; space, in particular, is a priority. In September last year France’s air force became the “Air and Space Force”, having earlier set up a new military space command in Toulouse. The French armed forces are also expanding their information warfare and cyber capabilities. In December 2020 Facebook and Instagram removed a network of 100 fake accounts linked to the French armed forces after they sparred with Russian-backed ones over the Central African Republic and Mali, among other African battlegrounds where the two countries vie for influence.


As France starts to gear up its armed forces for all these new forms of warfare, however, there are a number of serious challenges. The Sahel experience, says General Burkhard, is “undeniably a real strength”. Over a vast area of semi-arid scrub, soldiers and special forces take part in high-risk combat operations, which are both technically and tactically challenging. The French army has reported 57 deaths since 2013. Yet Barkhane is a highly asymmetric conflict, in which the French enjoy air supremacy, with no communications interference or threat from drones, missiles or cyber-attacks.


The other problem is that French forces are being pulled in several directions at once. In mid-March a dozen French tanks, 160 armoured vehicles and 300 troops arrived in Tapa, in Estonia. They were the latest French contribution to the nato battlegroups stationed in Poland and the Baltic states to deter Russian attack. Indeed military staff assume future engagements would be alongside allies—if not nato, then at least America, or a coalition of the willing. These modernisation efforts are consistent both with nato’s priorities and with Mr Macron’s desire for Europe to bolster its indigenous defences, though France and others remain reliant on American support for key enabling assets, like airlift and air defence.


In addition to eastern Europe, France is increasingly preoccupied to the south. In the eastern Mediterranean, France and Turkey have quarrelled over Libya, Syria and Cyprus, prompting Mr Macron to dispatch two warplanes and a frigate to Greek waters last August. France is also deeply involved in the Indo-Pacific, where its overseas territories contain 1.6m French citizens and 7,000 soldiers. France has sustained a steady naval presence in the area.


The catch is that the navy has just 15 major surface ships to deal with all these issues, points out Admiral Pierre Vandier, France’s chief of naval staff. “All of us Europeans are on thin ice. We may stretch our forces between doing well in the Atlantic, doing well in the Med, doing well in the Gulf and doing well in the Indo-Pacific.” Prioritising between these is no longer a job for the armed forces, he says, but “a political decision” for Mr Macron, or for his successor. “We will have choices to make, for sure.” 
Trouble has been brewed on Mount Circeo, south of Rome, ever since it was home to Circe, a legendary sorceress who turned Odysseus’s shipmates into pigs. The latest tribulation arrived in envelopes that plopped onto doormats in and around the modern town of San Felice Circeo in recent weeks, and demanded that the occupants stump up five years’ back payments of a levy some had no idea they owed. The demands are the latest twist in a dispute with its origins in the Middle Ages.








Several years ago, says their lawyer, Bianca Maria Menichelli, the heirs of Baron Giovanpaolo James Aguet got together to delegate one of their number to register what they say is their right to ownership of the land in the area. Their claim is based on possession of a fief—a right granted by a feudal overlord in exchange for allegiance or services. In this case, the overlord was a pope. Not even Ms Menichelli knows which one, though she says a document shows the arrangement was already in place by the 13th century.


After the new kingdom of Italy conquered the popes’ domain in the late 19th century, the fief passed to the government of the nascent state. Strapped for cash, the government sold it to a buyer who, in 1898, sold it to Baron Aguet. The fief brought with it not only the ownership of the land, but the right to levy an annual fee on any properties on it.


Mario Montalbano, a local surveyor, says the baron’s descendants stopped collecting the levy at least 60 years ago and most people on Mount Circeo came to believe that they were just like homeowners elsewhere in Italy. But in 2019 those descendants’ descendants began to exercise their rights again. Residents who want to sell face having to buy their freeholds, for around 30% of the value of the property, though Mr Montalbano says it can be much more. And now they are being asked for arrears of the levy, in some cases amounting to as much as €35,000 ($40,000). A toxic brew that is worthy of Circe herself.
Romantic gestures are difficult in a pandemic. But America and the European Union are trying to rekindle their old passion. Like many people struggling to maintain a long-distance relationship in lockdown, Joe Biden was planning to settle for a video call with eu leaders on March 25th to lay out his vision of their life together. It was intended as a make-up session after what has been a tricky patch. The Biden camp had naively thought not being Donald Trump would make European leaders swoon. Instead, Mr Biden’s election in November was swiftly followed by the eu signing an investment agreement with China, a move America saw as neither friendly nor helpful. Things started to improve only a few days ago, after the eu joined forces with America to launch sanctions against Chinese figures involved in persecuting Uyghurs.








Teaming up to confront China is likely to be more effective than doing so separately. It might also be safer, if China’s retaliation is diluted. Indeed, the episode has reminded America and the eu why they work together in the first place. The brief period of history in which America was unchallenged is over. Mr Biden is on the hunt for allies because he needs them. For its part, the eu’s geopolitical power depends on its economic size. Its market of 450m rich people is enough to dictate standards for such things as cars and phones; companies sometimes make all their products to Europe’s high standards to avoid the cost of having different versions for different regions. But this so-called “Brussels effect” will fade as the eu’s share of the global economy declines. A strong bond between America and the eu would help both.


Yet the same problems that strained the transatlantic relationship under Mr Trump remain under Mr Biden. Mr Trump’s harrumphing that Europe should spend 2% of gdp on defence was not a personal whim but a longstanding American demand that its allies must honour their promises. The “America first” rhetoric may have gone, but many of its policies are still there, as European grumbling about the country’s failure to export vaccines attests. Anyone who these days suggests the revival of a comprehensive free-trade deal between America and the eu is laughed out of the room, with eu leaders now focused on protecting the bloc’s market rather than opening it up.


Besides that, it is difficult for the eu to have a common front with America on Russia when the bloc cannot manage a common policy on the topic with itself. German business will plough on with Nord Stream 2, a pipeline across the Baltic sea from Russia to Germany, ignoring wails from its neighbours and sanctions from America. Smaller differences can still strain the relationship. Though they share a commitment to liberal capitalism, the two sides still find the time to row about everything from subsidies to aeroplanes to tech regulation. America and the eu may both now have the same goals on, say, climate change. But different means of achieving them will end up causing friction. For the eu, a carbon border tax, which would slap levies on imports from polluting countries, is a key part of its plans; for John Kerry, America’s climate envoy, the policy is a “last resort”.


European politicians are still wary of America, despite the overtures of Mr Biden’s White House. The brush with Mr Trump left some leaders arguing that the eu should keep the geopolitical equivalent of a bag packed, ready to flee like a spouse in an unhappy marriage. An unreliable America triggered a hard look at the eu’s capabilities and a quest for “strategic autonomy”, led by Emmanuel Macron, the French president. In this view, European countries have belatedly realised that they have outsourced existential questions to a larger partner that cannot be relied on. For some in Europe, America is the question. For others, though, it is still the answer. French ideas of European autonomy provoke howls in Poland and its Baltic neighbours, for whom America is the only credible bulwark against Russia. But in areas beyond traditional security policy, the search for autonomy is still popular. eu officials wonder aloud about the euro becoming a proper reserve currency, if not replacing the dollar then at least weakening America’s ability to use its currency to bully European business.


It’s not EU, it’s US
Tight ties with America were easier to justify during the cold war, when the Soviet Union scared nearly everyone. Now voters see the relationship as optional, argues Ivan Krastev, a Bulgarian writer, in a paper for the European Council on Foreign Relations (ecfr). Although a chunk of European voters always bridled at American influence on the continent, ultimately Europeans knew there was no other option. Today, a transatlantic gap has emerged. For America, China ranks at the top of the list of security concerns, whereas for the eu it is but one of many. In a survey of 11 European countries by the ecfr, most voters would prefer to stay neutral in any conflict between America and China or Russia. In this way, Europe has taken on the role once enjoyed by Japan during the cold war, argues Mr Krastev: an ally, but ultimately a long way from the main theatre of action. In this view, the eu’s quest for more geopolitical clout is not the entry of the eu into great-power politics but an escape from it.


A happier relationship than under Mr Trump is almost inevitable. But it will still be bumpy with Mr Biden, just as it sometimes was under his predecessors even before Mr Trump. What has changed is that the eu wants to be able to make its own decisions on fundamental topics, an ability that becomes especially cherished now eu leaders know that someone like Mr Trump can end up in the White House. Often the eu’s independent aims will be compatible with America’s. Their histories are deeply entwined and they have a fundamentally similar world-view. But they will not be identical and they will increasingly diverge, whether on matters small or big. And if two lovers want different things, they often end up drifting apart. 
Antonio machado, a Spanish poet, once referred to Madrid as “the breakwater of all the Spains”. That is the effect a snap election for the capital’s regional government on May 4th is having on national politics. A polarised campaign has roiled both right and left. The contest has prompted Pablo Iglesias, the leader of Podemos, a hard-left party, to step down as Spain’s deputy prime minister to stand in the election himself because, he said, of the risk of “an extreme right-wing government” in the capital. For Isabel Díaz Ayuso, the conservative regional president, it is a battle between “freedom and communism”. In fact the election may be followed by calmer water for Pedro Sánchez, the prime minister, and for Spain itself.








The election is the indirect consequence of a bungled attempt by Ciudadanos, a declining centrist party, to bring down the conservative regional government in Murcia in which it was the junior partner. Rather than run a similar risk, Ms Ayuso dissolved her own coalition with Ciudadanos and appealed to the voters.


Home to 6.6m people, the Madrid region is a flagship for the People’s Party (pp), led by Pablo Casado, which has governed it since 1995. Its policies of low taxes and light regulation have helped give Madrid one of the fastest economic growth rates in the country. Critics say that the price has been cuts in health care that covid-19 has exposed. Ms Ayuso, a 42-year-old former press officer on the pp’s right wing, has been determined to keep Madrid’s bars and restaurants open. That may have worsened the pandemic in the capital, but it has also turned her into Mr Sánchez’s most visible opponent. Early opinion polls suggest the pp will win around 39% of the vote, up from 22% in 2019. Its gains will come largely at the expense of Ciudadanos, which may be in terminal decline. But Ms Ayuso may need the support of Vox, a hard-right party polling around 11%, to form a government. Its entry into a large regional government for the first time would be a big problem for Mr Casado.


Mr Iglesias’s candidacy is a defensive move. Podemos grew swiftly through alliances, which have unravelled. “Podemos’s main challenge is to strengthen its organisation on the ground to have something to go back to” when it leaves government, according to Sandra León, a political scientist at Carlos III University in Madrid. Mr Iglesias’s past ruthless sidelining of rivals in Podemos makes that harder. His appeal to join forces with a regional party led by Íñigo Errejón, his former deputy, was rebuffed. The left-wing vote will be split between them as well as the Socialists.


Mr Iglesias is a better campaigner than administrator. His coalition with Mr Sánchez has been an uneasy one. He has called for interventionist policies on the labour market and housing, and aligned with Catalan separatists and Basque former terrorists. After the government managed to approve a budget in December, the prime minister has increasingly ignored his deputy. Yolanda Díaz, the labour minister who will take Mr Iglesias’s place in the government, is a less disruptive figure. In choosing to devote himself to leading his party, Mr Iglesias will have more freedom to snipe at the government. But he will almost certainly have less power. Many Spaniards, including Mr Sánchez, will breathe more easily as a result. 
Aweek ago Turkey seemed poised to become this year’s emerging-market success story. Foreign investors were pouring back, lured by high interest rates. The central bank sounded serious about taming inflation. The lira was outperforming most of its peers. The economy could look forward to a year of strong growth.








Then Recep Tayyip Erdogan stepped in. The Turkish president’s shocking decision to sack Naci Agbal, the central-bank governor, in the small hours of March 20th set off an earthquake. The lira plunged by 15% against the dollar as soon as markets opened, before regaining some of its losses. The yield on ten-year lira bonds rose by nearly five percentage points in a day, a new record. The main stockmarket sank by 10%, reversing all the gains it had made so far this year. Investors, who had bought some $19bn in Turkish assets since Mr Agbal’s appointment last November, began fleeing in droves. During his four months in office, Mr Agbal helped to rebuild the central bank’s reputation. Mr Erdogan demolished it with a stroke of his pen.


Mr Erdogan has now fired three central-bank governors in under two years. Mr Agbal’s departure is the most dramatic to date. With a series of overdue interest-rate rises, including a two-percentage-point increase on March 18th, the governor had offered investors a glimmer of hope that the central bank was something other than an extension of Mr Erdogan’s government. That hope is now gone. The lira, which had surged back to life after losing half of its dollar value in under four years, is once again on the ropes. Foreign investors feel betrayed. “These are the worst moments any emerging market has experienced in a quarter of a century,” wrote Charles Robertson of Renaissance Capital.






Mr Agbal had already been under some pressure. Rumours had been swirling that one of his rivals, Berat Albayrak, who resigned as finance minister a day after Mr Agbal’s appointment, might be returning to government. Mr Erdogan, an opponent of high interest rates, must also have been uneasy with the governor’s most recent rate rises. But few people expected him to remove Mr Agbal so unceremoniously and so quickly. “Even if another orthodox candidate will be put in, who knows how long they will stay in charge?” says Robin Brooks, chief economist at the Institute of International Finance. “This was basically the final straw.”


The new head of the bank, Sahap Kavcioglu, a former ruling-party parliamentarian who is thought to be close to Mr Albayrak, is a relative unknown. Between 2005 and 2015 he was deputy manager at Halkbank, a Turkish state lender which is currently under indictment in America on money-laundering charges. He has sought to contain the damage from his own appointment, saying he would continue efforts to tackle inflation, which reached 15.6% last month. Investors are unimpressed. Only last month, the new governor echoed Mr Erdogan’s view that the key to fighting inflation was lowering rates, a theory widely ridiculed by economists.




The brutal market reaction may give Mr Erdogan pause for thought. “My guess is that it’s going to get through to Erdogan that a country with so much foreign debt does not have the freedom to set interest rates as low as it likes,” says Paul McNamara, investment director at gam, an asset-management firm. Turkey’s president and the central bank may grudgingly surrender to the markets, he says. “There needs to be a realisation they’ve bitten off more than they can chew.” Turkey's short-term foreign debt reached $140bn in January, around a fifth of gdp.


That realisation may take time to sink in. Turkey’s government may again decide to use stopgap measures, getting state banks to prop up the lira by selling billions of dollars and preventing foreigners from shorting the currency, to pave the way for a rate cut. There are signs this is already happening. Interest rates on overnight swaps for the lira touched 1,400% on March 23rd, making it hard for investors to dump Turkish assets. But this will be a losing battle, says Phoenix Kalen of Société Générale. Having wasted $130bn in precious foreign reserves to stem the lira’s slide since 2019, the bank lacks firepower. Net reserves have dwindled to $10.9bn. They are closer to a negative $40bn when currency swaps with local banks are excluded.


Mr Erdogan now faces an unenviable choice; to keep rates high and defend the currency, or cut them to boost the economy and risk a currency crash. A more distant risk is capital controls. Turkey’s finance minister ruled those out on March 22nd, though some analysts have not. In a country that relies heavily on capital inflows, such controls would bring the economy to a halt. That makes them unlikely, but no longer unthinkable.


The tragedy is that all this is happening to an economy brimming with potential. Turkey has handled the covid-19 pandemic better than most big European countries. The economy expanded by 1.8% last year, no mean feat for a country whose tourism sector, which generates upwards of $30bn in annual revenues, was devastated. Before the central bank earthquake, the imf predicted that growth would reach 6% this year. That figure will surely have to be revised downward. Turkey’s economy is resilient and dynamic. But as long as it is micromanaged by a strongman whose economic theories give investors the creeps, it will continue to take two steps back for every step forward. Turkey’s president was once a semi-professional football player. He may have just scored the worst own goal of his career. 
Even before cases of covid-19 started to surge again, the slow supply of vaccines in the European Union was a political problem. Companies based in the EU have produced plenty of vaccines; unfortunately for the bloc’s citizens, they have often ended up elsewhere. By the end of this week the EU will have distributed 88m doses of vaccines within the bloc since December. It has so far exported 77m doses. On March 25th European leaders gave qualified support for stricter controls on anyone trying to send vaccines out of the bloc. The plan will let the EU halt exports to countries that are not exporting any to the EU in return, such as Britain or America, or block deliveries to places that have vaccinated proportionally more people than the EU has.








It beefs up rules agreed on in January, under which firms wishing to export vaccines from the EU must seek permission, resulting in extra paperwork, missed flights and delays. The move triggered ripples of concern around the world. Ngozi Okonjo-Iweala, head of the World Trade Organisation, expressed dismay. The new controls were applied for the first time earlier this month, when Italy blocked the export of 250,000 doses of AstraZeneca’s vaccine that were destined for Australia. Even the Netherlands, usually among the bloc’s staunchest free-traders and a hub for vaccine manufacturing, says it is ready to prevent the export of the same vaccine to Britain if required. About two-thirds of all vaccines used in Britain so far have been produced in the EU—a statistic that Ursula von der Leyen, the under-fire president of the European Commission, hammered home to leaders during a video summit.


Although the fight with Britain has drawn much of the attention, the eu is also cross with America, which is not letting drug firms export vaccines at all. Furthermore, it has imposed controls on the export of various parts and materials needed to make the vaccines. These controls are already delaying the arrival of crucial items needed in Europe (and elsewhere) to make jabs. Merck, in Germany, must now expand the production of specialist bags that are used to manufacture vaccines and which are running short. America has aggravated matters by not (so far) giving the eu any supplies from a large stockpile of the AstraZeneca vaccine that it has not yet authorised for use. It has, though, sent doses to Canada and Mexico.


If the eu were to get tough with America over vaccine exports, any retaliation would be likely to have grim consequences for global vaccine production. Little wonder, perhaps, that Germany’s chancellor, Angela Merkel, issued a warning on March 23rd that the eu needed to be “very careful” with export bans. Even Britain has the power to gum up production of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine by withholding an essential raw ingredient, a specialist fat that is needed to make the shot and which is supplied by a firm in Yorkshire. Whether it would take such a drastic step is another matter.






At the moment, only AstraZeneca is in the EU’s crosshairs when it comes to export controls. The Anglo-Swedish pharmaceutical company has fallen markedly behind its planned production. It had agreed to supply 300m doses in the first half of the year, but will manage only 100m. After the meeting, Mrs von der Leyen was blunt: “Companies have to honour their contract to the European Union before they export to other regions in the world.” It was, she added, simply a matter of Europeans getting their “fair share”.


Deploying export controls could damage the eu’s reputation. Last year pharmaceutical firms invested in new vaccine-production capacity around the world in order to improve the global supply. A lot of that investment went to Europe. Koen Berden, a trade expert at Vaccines Europe, which represents the industry across the continent, says it was made on the assumption that the bloc was a champion of the open trading system. Firms felt secure knowing that their factories could be used to make vaccines for the whole world.


Richard Hatchett, head of the Coalition for Epidemic Preparedness Innovations, a group that finances vaccine r&d, also warns of the dangers of trying to win any vaccine trade war. He says it is hard for political leaders to see every part of a complex supply chain. So the consequences of tit-for-tat exchanges are hard to predict. The knock-on effects of Europe’s threats are already being felt. Britain has sent an envoy to India to hunt for additional doses of vaccine from the Serum Institute. But any success will delay the supply of vaccines to the poorest countries that are waiting for supplies from the same source. Both Britain and the eu have given a great deal of financial support to the Covax initiative, which is shipping vaccine from the Serum Institute to poor countries.


Mrs von der Leyen promised last year to keep the world united against the coronavirus and even helped create a group to promote global collaboration on items such as vaccines. Reality is now biting. But many Europeans look enviously at much higher vaccination rates in America, Britain, Israel and elsewhere, or at the sight of vaccines being exported to countries, such as Australia, that are not facing serious waves of the virus. The temptation to hold on to just a few extra vaccines, if only to fend off political pressure at home, may prove hard to resist. 
Life in brussels has become all too exciting for British diplomats. Before Brexit, they needed the patience to haggle over boring, intricate policy. Now they find a knack for bellicosity more useful. Since completing its departure from the eu at the start of the year, the British government has launched into scraps with its erstwhile colleagues. It began by refusing to offer ambassadorial status to the eu’s man in London. It then unilaterally overrode parts of its agreement on Northern Ireland, sparking apoplexy at the European Commission, which accused it of breaking international law. As a backdrop, British mps accuse their European peers of vaccine nationalism, after the eu brought in export controls on jabs made in the bloc. Allegations of hypocrisy and even malevolence zip between London and Brussels like a grumpy Eurostar.








On leaving the eu, Britain was always going to face a choice: should it be more like Switzerland or Turkey? Countries that are neighbours to the world’s largest economic bloc must either accept its supremacy or try to fight it. Switzerland and Turkey best represent these two options. The Swiss, who have a complicated tangle of agreements with the eu, may grumble about the eu’s dominance over their affairs, but ultimately accept the intrusion. Turkey has a far simpler relationship: a customs union that allows goods to move relatively freely. Yet President Recep Tayyip Erdogan’s government wrestles the Europeans at any opportunity.


Britain could have gone either way. Theresa May, prime minister from 2016-19, enjoyed walking in the Alps and viewed the eu with Swiss realism. Once outside the bloc, she reckoned, Britain would still seek to influence it, roping itself into everything from foreign policy to data-protection laws in the same way that Switzerland ties itself to various eu rules. The plan was to make friends and influence people, with diligent diplomacy compensating for the loss of a seat at the table. However, Mrs May’s successor, Boris Johnson, the proud descendant of an Ottoman politician, has taken a far more Turkish approach. He led Britain out of the eu and into a loose and rather shallow free-trade deal with it. He sees Europe as a sovereign rival, and his diplomats follow his lead. Private deliberation is out. Public confrontation is in. Brussels is there to be bashed, especially when it does outrageous things, like threaten to block vaccine exports to Britain.


Britain discovered its rebellious streak rather late in the day. After it voted to leave in 2016, it continued to abide by the bloc’s rules. British officials diligently attended meetings on eu youth policy and the like, even while politics at home was a four-year screaming match. But now a spikier tone emits from them. During the difficult talks as a stand-still transition period came to an end on December 31st, officials wore Union Jack lanyards. They were told to be “leaders” not “mice” by David Frost, the peer leading the British side. Then and subsequently, threats to rip up already agreed deals were frequent. It is a tactic that eu officials who negotiate with Turkey will recognise, given Mr Erdogan’s repeated threats to terminate an agreement with the eu over refugees. Turkey has been playing this game for a long time. Britain, by contrast, is still experimenting. “It’s like a teenager questioning their identity,” says a slightly patronising Eurocrat.


An element of nihilism hangs over the relationship. Neither side particularly wants or expects a deeper partnership any time soon. Britain is happy to scrap with the eu because not much is at stake. Fresh infringement proceedings, which can result in fines, carry little threat. (There are already dozens of such proceedings open against Britain.) Other sanctions are similarly blunt. The eu can withhold valuable baubles such as a decision on financial equivalence, which would allow British insurers and asset managers to operate in the eu. But British officials already put the chance of such a concession at close to zero. The threat to withdraw an offer one never intended to make is not very potent, as the Turkish government can attest. Turkey launched its application to join the eu in 1987, yet the path turned out to be a treadmill rather than a travelator. It knows its prospects of joining the bloc are non-existent and it behaves accordingly.


Toblerone to Turkish delight
In Europe geography is destiny. All parties are stuck with each other, whether or not their governments accept it. Switzerland smooths over its disagreements via constant negotiation with the eu, haggling over everything from the free movement of people to banking secrecy in a never-ending cycle of talks. Being a small landlocked country at the heart of the European continent lends itself to grumpy compromise. Turkey is in a far more awkward place. Considered not quite European by those in Brussels, it is simultaneously too small to pose a challenge but too large to push around. In short, it is in a position to which Britain can relate. This poses a conundrum to the eu, too. Unlike Switzerland, both Britain and Turkey are military partners, not just economic ones. Both are members of nato. The eu’s most pressing strategic problems, including an unstable north Africa and an interfering Russia, will be solved more easily if Turkey and Britain are onside.


Yet it may prove even harder for the eu to build a constructive relationship with Britain than with Turkey. Ultimately, the eu does not much care about the fate of Turkey as long as it remains stable. In the case of Britain and the eu, each side needs the other to struggle (even if neither side will admit this). For Europe, Britain must be demonstrably worse off as a result of leaving the bloc. In exchange for following all its strictures, the eu promises prosperity. The prospect of a large, successful economy with a different worldview just off its north-west coast is an uncomfortable one. For the British government, the pain of leaving the eu must be seen to be worth it. This is easier to claim if the eu fails to become a beacon of transnational bliss. Friction is inevitable. Those hoping for a boring relationship are out of luck. 


ditor’s note (March 20th 2021): President Tayyip Recep Erdogan today dismissed Naci Agbal, his third central-bank governor in under two years. This article from the print edition published on March 18th foreshadowed Mr Agbal’s downfall. His successor, Sahap Kavcioglu, a former banker and ex-lawmaker, opposes high interest rates—as does Mr Erdogan.


Naci agbal deserves a pat on the back. In only a few months as Turkey’s central-bank governor, he has breathed new life into his country’s currency, bolstered the bank’s reputation and started to replenish its coffers.








The lira had a terrible 2020, losing nearly 20% of its dollar value. Among emerging-market currencies, only the Argentine peso and the Brazilian real fared worse. This year it was by far the strongest of the bunch until late February, when a spike in us treasury yields, a possible harbinger of higher borrowing costs in America, prompted a sell-off of Turkish assets.


Mr Agbal has come up with the right remedy. When he took over last November, the former finance minister inherited a currency crisis and a central bank that had wasted an estimated $130bn of its foreign reserves in a hare-brained defence of the lira. Since then he has raised interest rates by a cumulative 675 points, pledged to rebuild the bank’s reserves, and improved communication with financial markets in Turkey and abroad. “He adopted a more predictable and transparent framework, which helped him manage expectations,” says Hakan Kara, the bank’s former chief economist. “The central bank has done a tremendous job restoring some of its credibility,” says Piotr Matys of Rabobank, a Dutch financial-services giant.




But things are not about to get easier for Mr Agbal. The credit bonanza that helped Turkey cope with the pandemic (the economy grew by 1.8% in 2020, defying most forecasts) also put pressure on the lira and on prices. Inflation in Turkey has been creeping up for over a year. In February it reached 15.6%. Another interest-rate rise may now be on the cards. On March 18th, as The Economist went to press, the bank was expected to increase the benchmark rate by a percentage point.


Mr Agbal says he will keep policy tight to smother inflation, which he wants to bring down to 5% in under three years. But there is no telling whether he can stay the course, or even remain at his post. Turkey’s president, Recep Tayyip Erdogan, who promised to give Mr Agbal a free hand when he took up his post, seems so far to have lived up to his word. But the governor continues to serve at the president’s mercy.


Turkey does not have to hold a general election until 2023. But there are rumours of a possible snap vote. The louder these grow, the more pressure Mr Agbal will face to trade monetary discipline for economic growth. Mr Erdogan has already signalled his unease with the recent rate rises. Turkey’s president sacked two of Mr Agbal’s predecessors in less than two years. If his political future is at stake, he may not hesitate to ditch a third.


Just as worrying is the spectre of Berat Albayrak, who succeeded Mr Agbal as finance minister in 2018 and who resigned in a huff when his rival got the central-bank job. Mr Albayrak, who is married to one of Mr Erdogan’s daughters, and who was once believed to be the second most powerful person in Turkey, has not made a single public appearance since his exit.


But he may be plotting a comeback. A recent sign came in late February, when Mr Erdogan publicly defended his son-in-law’s record and the decision to use up so much of the central bank’s foreign reserves during his tenure. Markets saw this as a sign that Mr Albayrak may be returning to politics. The lira suffered a mild heart attack and fell by 2% in a day.


Mr Agbal may have missed a chance by not raising rates since December. With the lira rattled again, this time by the news from America, he may now have to do it anyway. And Mr Erdogan’s patience could soon start to wear thin. 
Dutch politics are absurdly complicated. The Netherlands has a proportional representation system with no minimum threshold (most eu countries have one at 5%), ensuring a large number of parties and a constant churn of new ones. Voters are more evenly divided than ever between them. The prime minister, Mark Rutte, a brilliant and imperturbably cheerful tactician, has nonetheless managed to stay atop the heap for ten years, through three ruling coalitions. Last year he was hit with the covid-19 pandemic and with a child-benefits scandal that forced his government to resign just two months before an election. Yet there was never much doubt that when the votes were counted, he and his centre-right Liberal (vvd) party would again come in first. Preliminary results after the ballot on March 17th showed that the vvd had won 23%, well ahead of any other party.








Second place, however, was a big surprise: d66, a left-leaning, liberal pro-European party. Its leader Sigrid Kaag, the current trade minister, is a former un diplomat who presented herself as a candidate to become the Netherlands’ first female prime minister. d66 won 15%, one of the best results in its history. For his part, Mr Rutte moved towards the centre during the campaign, imitating left-wing parties’ rhetoric on social policy. And with the exception of the populist right, every party emphatically backed strong climate policies. For a country that spent last summer leading Europe’s “frugal” club of countries opposed to greater fiscal integration and nearly torpedoed the bloc’s €750bn ($900bn) covid-19 relief fund, the election may signal an important shift.


Mr Rutte owes his victory partly to approval of his handling of covid-19. The Netherlands has not done very well—infection rates have been higher than in peers like Germany and Denmark, and track-and-trace and vaccination programmes have been slow. But most voters seemed not to mind, while others blamed the health minister, a Christian Democrat. During the campaign most of the opposition avoided the issue. As for the child-benefits scandal (in which the tax authority financially ruined thousands of parents over false accusations of fraud), it was not the vvd leader but the head of Labour who quit over his role in the affair.


Yet even for the teflon-coated Mr Rutte, forming a coalition will be difficult. Between 15 and 17 parties have made it into parliament, depending on the final count. Together, the vvd, d66 and the Christian Democrats have exactly half the seats. But the Christian Democrats’ vote share fell to just 10%, from 13% in the previous election. Their leader, Wopke Hoekstra, currently finance minister, had been billed as a contender for Mr Rutte’s job but ran a clumsy campaign with no clear theme. They may prefer a spell in opposition to rebuild their strength, making Mr Rutte’s task harder.


The populist right split into more parties, but grew overall. The Party for Freedom (pvv), led by the anti-Muslim firebrand Geert Wilders, had hoped to finish second but settled for third with 11%. A smaller far-right party, Forum for Democracy, grew to 5%, while a new one, ja21, won 2%. All are considered untouchable by the major parties. On the left, Labour, the GreenLeft party and the far-left Socialists were pummelled, each winning 5-6%. Mr Rutte is unlikely to want more than one of them in his cabinet.


That leaves the great swirl of small-to-tiny Dutch parties. They often forecast trends that take longer to materialise in other countries. Four years ago the arrival of Forum for Democracy seemed to augur a new wave of alt-right populism, but that party fractured in November over racism and anti-semitism. The Party for the Animals, the world’s first animal-rights party to win parliamentary representation, got 4%. Identity politics is going strong: denk, a party representing Dutch Muslims, won 2%. Meanwhile Volt, a new pan-European liberal party that runs in every country in the eu, rose in the polls in the final weeks of the campaign and won 2%.


The vvd’s turn to the centre and the success of d66 suggest the next Dutch government may be a tad less parsimonious in future eu fiscal debates. But much depends on which parties join the coalition. In 2017 forming a government took over six months. Mr Rutte says the covid-19 crisis requires more urgent action, and wants speedy negotiations with d66 and the Christian Democrats. But Ms Kaag wants to bring in more parties on the left. She will be happy to take her time. 
Cats and dogs have become the new weapons in France’s image-politics wars. Things began to heat up late last year when Marine Le Pen, the leader of the National Rally (formerly the National Front), revealed that she had passed an exam to become an accredited cat-breeder. Her feline fervour was already well known. Ms Le Pen considers cats to be “part of the family” and once accused a Doberman belonging to her father, Jean-Marie Le Pen, of killing one of her treasured mogs. But this latest twist looked suspiciously like part of a bid to soften the image of a leader who has sought to distance herself from her father’s inflammatory far-right politics.








Just as Ms Le Pen has tried to tone down her strident style ahead of next year’s French presidential election, so have cuddly pictures of her six cats appeared with persistent regularity on her Instagram account. She has even set up a separate anonymous account, dedicated to her Bengal and Somali breeds. “I’m not interested in the money,” purred Ms Le Pen; “I just want cats to be better treated.” If I care for my cats, she seems to say, I would care for the country too.


Ms Le Pen’s efforts have not gone unnoticed. After his election Emmanuel Macron adopted a mongrel, Nemo, from a rescue shelter. Photos of the president, better known for his “Jupiterian” governing style, petting his black mutt periodically feature on the Instagram account of the official presidential photographer, Soazig de la Moissonnière. In December Mr Macron posted on social media a video of Nemo, with a message urging the French to adopt a rescue pet, and to do so responsibly. It got over half a million views on Instagram alone.


During the Fifth Republic, a menagerie of pets has come and gone at the Elysée palace. As well as his rescue dog, Mr Macron keeps two hens (a present). Nicolas Sarkozy brought in a handful of canines. Charles de Gaulle had a Welsh Corgi, reportedly given to him by the queen, as well as a cat, although neither lived at the official residence. Before Mr Macron, no fewer than six consecutive French presidents had Labradors, turning that breed into something of a tradition. Georges Pompidou’s was called Jupiter, as it happens. In short, every modern French president has owned a dog. Has Ms Le Pen picked the right pet for power?


Russia is one of the few places where commercial surrogacy is entirely legal (along with Ukraine, Georgia and some American states). Foreigners can pay a Russian woman for the use of her womb. Each year Russian surrogate mothers give birth to hundreds, perhaps thousands, of babies (estimates vary wildly). And in contrast to America, the service is cheap. Nine months of gestation plus labour can be bought for around $20,000. But in the next few months or so, Russia’s parliament looks set to ban the practice, at least if the customers are foreign. “Russia is not an incubator,” says Irina Yarovaya, a deputy speaker of the Duma, Russia’s parliament.








The apparent trigger for this proposed change was the death of a baby boy who was born to a surrogate mother on behalf of a Filipino family last year. The baby was nursed in a rented flat outside Moscow and died while recovering from an operation on his brain. When the police entered the flat, they found three other babies being nursed for different Filipino families. These included three-month-old twins belonging to Fredenil Hernaez Castro, a member of the Philippines’ parliament.


The police decided that they had stumbled upon a trafficking ring. Doctors who worked for the fertility clinics where the children had been born were arrested. So were a translator and a courier who had organised some of the documents. A lawyer who had made the arrangements was charged with child-trafficking but left the country before being arrested. The babies were sent to an orphanage, instead of their lawful Filipino parents.


Russian television channels launched a campaign of alarm, not about cops putting babies in orphanages, but about surrogacy itself. They claimed that certain reproductive specialists were in fact criminal outfits, bent on stealing embryos and faking documents. They warned that surrogate children might be brought up by same-sex couples.


A government investigative committee seized medical records from reproductive clinics in Moscow. It claimed that surrogacy services could legally be provided only to single women and heterosexual couples. (There is no such rule.) The authorities threatened to prosecute single men who have hired surrogates, and to take away their children. Several gay men fled Russia to avoid losing their children and their freedom.


Many countries ban surrogacy because they fear that poor women will be exploited—that they are not capable of deciding for themselves whether the fee is worth the labour. Some activists liken surrogacy to prostitution (which they also think should be illegal). In Russia, by contrast, pro-government conservatives see the debate as an opportunity to bash gays. “If we do not engage in sexual education of our children, then the lgbt sex-instructors of nato will do it for us,” said one talk-show guest recently. (nato, a western alliance that Russia views with suspicion, has nothing to do with sex education in schools.)


Russia’s president, Vladimir Putin, often vows to defend traditional family values. It is a potent rallying cry. Last year he held a referendum to change the constitution. The main aim was to allow himself to stay in power beyond 2024, but it was bundled with dozens of populist measures, including a constitutional ban on gay marriage. “As far as ‘parent number one’ and ‘parent number two’ go…as long as I’m president this will not happen. There will be dad and mum,” said Mr Putin. Voters had to say yes or no to the whole constitutional package. It passed easily. 
The excuses were plentiful as Germany’s centre-right Christian Democrats (cdu) slumped to two of their worst-ever state-election defeats on March 14th. The party was up against popular incumbents in Green-led Baden-Württemberg and in Rhineland-Palatinate, run by the Social Democrats (spd). The cdu’s state chapters had chosen weak candidates. And anyway Armin Laschet (pictured), the party’s leader, had said before the votes that state elections have their own character. National politics is another matter entirely.








All true. Yet there is no disguising the malaise that has descended on Germany’s ruling party. Bad enough on their own, the election results contributed to a broader sense that the cdu has lost its way. Six months ahead of a general election after which Angela Merkel, the chancellor, will step down, the party that has run Germany for over 15 years is suddenly confronting the prospect that it could leave government at the same time that she does.


Long bereft of ideas, for most of the Merkel era the cdu has relied on two other qualities for its electoral appeal. One is competence. The four governments led by Mrs Merkel brought Germany through a series of crises barely scarred. Unemployment and debt remained low, and the country’s export-led growth model looked robust. The state largely passed tricky tests such as a huge influx of migrants in 2015-16. The bland managerialism of the cdu, and Mrs Merkel in particular, gave voters permission to switch off from politics.




The government’s steady handling of the pandemic’s first phase reinforced that idea. Mrs Merkel’s ratings, and those of her party, soared, even as its spd coalition partner flatlined (see chart 1). Yet the situation is becoming rockier as Germany enters its third covid-19 wave. Vaccination was slow even before the controversial decision on March 15th to suspend the AstraZeneca jab. A plan to ease the lockdown settled in early March, even as recorded cases were rising, is in disarray; having just reopened, parts of Germany are now shutting down yet again. The despair of customer-facing businesses has been compounded by bureaucratic hold-ups in distributing aid.


On top of that a series of scandals has centred on mps from the cdu and the Christian Social Union (csu), its Bavarian sister party, who lined their pockets through mask-procurement deals. It has left a nasty stench, has punctured party morale, and may have further to run. Fully 88% of voters are dissatisfied with the vaccine roll-out. The number who say the cdu/csu is best placed to manage Germany’s problems has plummeted. In a matter of weeks the party’s “covid bonus” in the polls has almost evaporated.


The Merkel era’s other great appeal to voters was its aura of inevitability. The cdu/csu has led German coalition governments for 51 of the republic’s 71 post-war years, retaining support even as political fragmentation ate away at the spd, its traditional rival. Germany had long seemed on course for a cdu/csu-led coalition with the Greens after September’s election. But as the people have drifted away from what cdu stalwarts call “the last people’s party”, the notion of a government without the conservatives has gained traction. A “traffic-light” coalition of the spd, Greens and the liberal Free Democrats (fdp)—of the sort likely to stay in office in Rhineland-Palatinate—is the talk of the day, though it remains unlikely at federal level. But once the party stops looking invincible, more voters will be tempted by alternatives.


Not much of this is directly the fault of Mr Laschet, who has been in charge of the cdu for scarcely two months. His immediate priority was to unite the wings of a party bitterly divided between his centrism and the more robust conservatism of Friedrich Merz, whom he narrowly defeated for the leadership in January. But so far Mr Laschet has signally failed to provide the leadership so many in his party crave. He was slow to respond to the corruption scandals. He brushed off complaints that he was missing in action after the state elections with a tin-eared argument that it was the job of the cdu secretary-general to respond. And though his brand of amiable moderation chimes with the public mood, he has shown no interest in offering a vision for post-Merkel Germany. “The only explanation I can see is that he doesn’t have any ideas,” says one despairing cdu mp. Even supporters profess exasperation.




At some point in the seven weeks between Easter and Pentecost (these are Christian Democrats, after all) Mr Laschet and Markus Söder, the csu leader and Bavaria’s premier, will decide which of them is to lead the two parties into the election. Mr Söder is a savvy politician who has built a national reputation while insisting his ambitions do not run beyond his state’s borders. Yet although just 16% of cdu voters back Mr Laschet for the candidacy, even frustrated cdu mps think their leader will probably get the nod. Some quietly wonder why Mr Söder would want to swap a comfortable perch in Munich for the stress of leading a demoralised party into an uncertain election.


Indeed, the last campaign of the Merkel era promises to be its liveliest. The Greens, almost certain to enter government in one coalition or another, are fizzing with ideas. The fdp, enjoying a modest recovery, has finally found a distinctive voice in the pandemic. Even the long moribund spd has rediscovered a taste for power, animated by the prospect of booting the conservatives into opposition. Traditional voter blocs have broken down. “Even if we write the best manifesto in the world, it won’t be easy for us,” says Katja Leikert, a cdu mp.


Yet for all its woes, the cdu/csu is still odds-on to lead Germany’s next government. Optimists tell a story of a summer campaign in which a reunified ruling party exploits a public mood buoyed by a belatedly successful vaccination campaign and a rebounding economy. Mr Laschet remains the favourite to succeed Mrs Merkel at the helm of the eu’s largest country. But his chances would be that much better if he could explain why he deserves the job. 
GERMANY’S RULING Christian Democrats (CDU) had been expecting a rough night. But the blow delivered on March 14th by voters in Baden-Württemberg and Rhineland-Palatinate, two states in Germany’s rich south-west that together account for around a fifth of the country’s population, was brutal. In Baden-Württemberg, an industrial powerhouse that the CDU once ruled for nearly six decades, forecasts suggest the party may have slumped to just 23% of the vote, its worst result in a big west German state for generations and four points less than it got last time, in 2016. The CDU was also on course for its worst-ever result in neighbouring Rhineland-Palatinate. Just a few months ago the party had high hopes of winning in both places.


The two state elections kick off what Germans call a “super election year”, in which six of Germany’s 16 states elect new parliaments ahead of a federal election on September 26th, after which Angela Merkel has said that she will stand down as chancellor. Neither of the states that have just voted is likely to see radical change: Winfried Kretschmann, the Greens’ popular premier in Baden-Württemberg (and the party’s only state leader), will begin his third term, and in Rhineland-Palatinate Malu Dreyer of the Social Democrats (SPD) will probably maintain her “traffic-light” coalition with the Greens and the liberal Free Democrats.


But the results could have national consequences, in two ways. First, Mr Kretschmann may now opt to eject the CDU, the Greens’ junior coalition-partner in Baden-Württemberg, in favour of his own traffic-light arrangement. To do so would inevitably increase the speculation that such a coalition could take charge of Germany after the general election—meaning that Mrs Merkel’s party would leave government at the same time that she does. More immediately, the dreadful results for the CDU will affect its own preparations for the election, and potentially the prospects for Armin Laschet, its newly elected leader.




Having sailed through the early stages of the pandemic with soaring poll numbers (see chart), the CDU is suddenly facing trouble on several fronts. Most serious is a cluster of scandals involving MPs from the CDU and its Bavarian sister party, the Christian Social Union (CSU). Two CDU/CSU MPs were forced to resign after it emerged that they had earned hundreds of thousands of euros in mask-procurement deals last year. Others have been accused of accepting goodies to lobby the German government on behalf of Azerbaijan. The scandals have not yet affected the government, a “grand coalition” of the CDU/CSU with the SPD. But last week the leaders of the CDU/CSU parliamentary group felt sufficiently spooked to oblige all its MPs to confirm that they had not personally profited from the pandemic. Some in the party fear further revelations may lie ahead.


The scandals have contributed to a broader sense of malaise, as bureaucratic snafus have slowed Germany’s vaccine roll-out and the government’s once-smooth handling of the pandemic has hit the buffers. Earlier this month, amid growing public displeasure with one of Europe’s tougher lockdowns, Germany’s leaders agreed on a reopening strategy even as caseload numbers were rising and more infectious strains of the coronavirus were spreading quickly. The growth in cases has since accelerated, leaving the country teetering on a third wave even as schools and museums have started to reopen. As public backing for the government’s management of covid-19 has faltered, so has the CDU/CSU’s support.


All this presents Mr Laschet with a giant headache. After narrowly defeating a right-wing candidate for the party leadership in January Mr Laschet, a centrist in the Merkel mould, had started to win over some of his internal doubters. Yet outside the party he has done little to combat a growing reputation for complacency and listlessness. He was slow to condemn the misconduct of his parliamentary colleagues in public, and has brushed off any suggestion that he bears responsibility for the CDU’s performance in the state elections. (Many of his party colleagues disagree.) His approval ratings are dismal.


At some point in the six weeks after Easter, Mr Laschet and Markus Söder, the leader of the CSU, are meant to decide which of them is to lead their two parties, which choose a joint chancellor-candidate, into the general election. The nominee will become odds-on to succeed Mrs Merkel. And yet the party may have further to fall, once German voters fully register the fact of the still-popular chancellor’s imminent departure. After the latest debacle, some may start to wonder why anyone would want the job.
In the days when Italy’s former prime minister, Matteo Renzi, saw himself as an instrument of creative destruction, he revelled in the nickname il rottamatore, the Demolition Man. Today, that title is more applicable to Mario Draghi, the technocrat Mr Renzi boasts of manoeuvring into the premiership. Restrained and courteous, Mr Draghi is an unlikely wrecker. Yet his arrival has so far split the biggest party in parliament, the Five Star Movement (m5s), and pitched the centre-left Democratic Party (pd) into leaderless disarray.








The trouble began as soon as Mr Draghi sought parliament’s endorsement of his broad coalition. Though the Five Stars’ leaders had opted to back him and secured the approval of party members, some of its lawmakers saw this as an unacceptable capitulation. The m5s was founded to bring down the establishment, yet here it was supporting a man who embodied it. Fifteen m5s senators and 16 deputies voted “no” and were expelled. They have applied to form a new group in parliament.


The revolt highlighted an anomaly: the movement’s rulebook is at odds with the Italian constitution, which gives parliamentarians the freedom to vote as they see fit. The party rules say Five Star legislators must implement the wishes of the party’s members as expressed in online votes staged on a platform managed by Davide Casaleggio. The son of Gianroberto Casaleggio, the internet guru who inspired the movement’s foundation, Mr Casaleggio now champions the Five Stars’ early idealism. On March 10th he presented a document ostensibly intended to define the role of the platform. Many suspect it marks his first step towards taking control of a rival movement.


Forebodings of division also hang over the pd—part of the governing coalition, like the Five Stars. On March 4th Nicola Zingaretti, its affable leader, astonished followers by abruptly resigning, saying he could not any longer put up with the infighting, particularly over government jobs. The pd is arguably as ill-sorted as the m5s, the result of a marriage of convenience in 2007 between old enemies: former Christian Democrats and ex-Communists. Their differences have never really gone away. Mr Zingaretti’s merit was to be broadly acceptable to a majority of pd activists. The same is true of Enrico Letta, a former prime minister, who as The Economist went to press was considering appeals to head the party.


This is more than just a crisis of leadership. The pd was meant to be the party of reform. Yet the structural problems Italy faces today, which Mr Draghi and his fellow-technocrats have been enlisted to tackle and which the new prime minister has enumerated to parliament, are exactly the same as in 2007: an obstructive bureaucracy, a sluggish judiciary, a tax system that discourages productive economic activity, and low female employment. “If the resort to Draghi represents a failure of Italian politics, then it represents all the more so a failure of the pd,” argues Franco Pavoncello, professor of political science at John Cabot university in Rome.


Polls indicate that support for the pd has fallen sharply since Mr Zingaretti’s resignation. But they hold out hope for the m5s, which has lost about half its following since the 2018 election. On February 28th the party’s leaders entrusted Mr Draghi’s predecessor, Giuseppe Conte, with a relaunch of the movement, in what was widely seen as a first step to his becoming leader. Polls suggest support for a Five Star Movement led by the popular Mr Conte could soar. As for Mr Draghi, the more his sponsors bicker and split, the less time they will have to snipe at him. For now. 
Assembling coalitions in Germany was once a simple affair. Power alternated between the centre-right Christian Democratic Union (cdu, with its Bavarian ally, the csu) and the Social Democrats (spd), with the liberal Free Democrats (fdp) or Greens in support. Colourful names occasionally emerged for other governing arrangements: “Jamaica” for coalitions uniting the cdu, Greens and fdp—the parties’ colours match the island’s flag—or “traffic light” for the spd, fdp and Greens. For years these exotic amalgams mainly fuelled the fever dreams of political scientists. More recently, political fragmentation and Germany’s federal system, in which 16 states churn through their own governments, have made them flesh.








Half the states now have unwieldy three-party coalitions. Some, like the “Kenya” groupings in three east German states, are dysfunctional marriages of convenience. But the traffic lights in Rhineland-Palatinate, in Germany’s south-west, have been “very successful”, beams Daniel Stich, secretary-general of the spd there. They may well abide after an election on March 14th. Next door in Baden-Württemberg, which also votes that day, many in the ruling Greens want to dump the cdu, their coalition partner.


If that were to happen, a national traffic-light coalition would no doubt become more likely after Germany’s election in September, says Hans-Ulrich Rülke, the fdp’s lead candidate in Baden-Württemberg. True, the three parties are currently short of a majority (see table). For now a cdu/csu-Green tie-up remains the best bet to take over from today’s unloved “grand coalition”. But the covid bonus long enjoyed by the cdu/csu in the polls has evaporated, and the fdp is staging a modest recovery. A lot can happen between now and September, notes Alexander Schweitzer, leader of the spd’s deputies in Rhineland-Palatinate.




A traffic-light coalition would be an uneasy fit for those Greens and Social Democrats who dismiss the fdp as heartless neoliberals. But it has its attractions. The Greens would have a shot at leading the government; the spd a realistic way to stay in office (Olaf Scholz, its chancellor-candidate, is a fan). And it offers the fdp, which propped up the cdu/csu in a miserable coalition in 2009-13, a road back to relevance. Do not count it out.
The world is split into three types of covid-19 countries. The first consists of those with lots of recent cases countered by vigorous vaccination campaigns: America and Britain, for example. The second includes the likes of Australia, Japan and China, with few vaccines but few cases to worry about. The last is made up of places with lots of new cases but little vaccination. Continental Europe is the only big, rich region in that unfortunate ward. (Much of Latin America is in a similar spot, and data are patchy in many poor countries.) It is an unexpected outcome for a continent that thought it had managed the first phase of the pandemic rather well.








About a quarter of all cases and deaths from covid-19 since the start of the year have been in eu countries, whose citizens make up just 6% of the global population, according to Our World in Data, which collates national statistics. A spate of infections that started six months ago has proved stubbornly enduring—more of a swell than a wave. This week Italy became the sixth (and smallest) country to record over 100,000 deaths.


Resurgent covid prompted other countries, such as Israel and Britain, to turbocharge their vaccination programmes. But the European Commission fumbled the ordering of doses for the bloc last summer, and has secured few early jabs. Worse, in some countries many of the vaccines delivered are lying unused in fridges and freezers—the fault of national authorities. As a result, just ten doses for every 100 Europeans have been administered, against 28 in America and 35 in Britain.








Paired with a surge in “variant” cases that are more infectious—and now dominate from Poland to Portugal—the upshot is a pandemic that is likely to endure for months to come. The impact will be felt beyond hospital wards, which are filling up in some countries: health authorities in Paris are cutting non-covid procedures by 40% to help manage rising cases.


One impact will be on the economy. On March 9th the oecd, a policy-advisory shop, downgraded growth prospects in Italy and France even as it upgraded America’s. In view of low vaccination rates, its chief economist warned that it is too soon to think about more fiscal stimulus in Europe. Across much of the eu, swathes of the economy look likely to remain throttled—and state-supported—for months.


Politically, leaders are having to balance the need for lockdowns with perceived public fatigue. Italy is considering new confinement measures. France has stuck to a curfew, and kept schools open, even as scientific advisers warn that variant strains could soon send cases spiking. Germany loosened restrictions just as cases were rising, putting its faith in more vaccinations and tests. The sense of a coherent plan being in place there was not helped when two mps resigned as it emerged that last spring they had moonlighted as brokers of masks and other protective equipment. Spain is faring better, but others, such as Estonia, are facing acute spikes.


Unity among the eu’s members is being tested. A year ago national borders that had supposedly been abolished sprang up again, and governments beggared their neighbours out of whatever masks and other equipment they could snatch before they could be exported. A pan-European recovery programme funded by joint borrowing and the centralised procurement of vaccines was supposed to be a symbol of renewed unity.


That sentiment looks frailer than ever. National borders have started to reappear, erected by the likes of Germany and Belgium to isolate pestilent neighbours. Vaccine nationalism has made an appearance, blocking shipments out of the bloc. On March 4th Italy, under the new leadership of Mario Draghi, was the first to make use of an eu export-control mechanism agreed in January after AstraZeneca, a drug firm, abruptly pushed back deliveries to later in the year. So 250,000 doses of its vaccine will stay in Europe instead.


The biggest challenge, and source of much political tension, is the dearth of vaccines. National governments are quietly fuming at the commission for its procurement blunder, while Brussels blames the pharmaceutical companies. Some countries are now sourcing their jabs from outside the vaunted eu framework. Hungary has started using the Sputnik v vaccine and the Chinese Sinopharm one, with which its prime minister, Viktor Orban, was pricked on February 28th. Many of its central European neighbours are tempted to follow suit, though neither vaccine has received the green light from the European Medicines Agency. An Italian lab is to start making Sputnik v.


The eu is keen to show that the situation will improve soon. The European commissioner now liaising with the vaccine suppliers, Thierry Breton, has let it be known that he starts his day with a 5am call to the chief executive of AstraZeneca; other bosses get badgered later in the day. Around 100m monthly doses are expected from April onwards, double the figure for March and enough to get 70% of adult Europeans inoculated by the end of July.


That still means shortages in the coming weeks. But many European countries have not helped themselves. After the AstraZeneca debacle, several national authorities barred its use on older patients, even as the eu regulator declared it safe and effective for everyone. President Emmanuel Macron of France denigrated it as “quasi-ineffective” for over-65s. Now that age restrictions are being lifted in France and Germany among others, its take-up should increase—if patients sign up. Around a quarter of people in Italy, France and Germany say they would rather wait for another vaccine. The result has been stocks of unused AstraZeneca doses. Whereas 89% of Pfizer-BioNTech doses delivered to member states have been used, the figure is under half for AstraZeneca.


The procurement mess has at least meant that Europe has focused its few doses on those people who need them most urgently, notably the elderly. That should start to reduce the number of deaths, for example in care homes. National authorities are looking feverishly for signs that vaccination programmes are having such an impact, as they are in America and Britain. Until they do, Europe will remain stuck in a pandemic that others are starting to put behind them. 
It is time for Europeans to stand up and be counted. Every ten years most European countries hold a census, generally in years ending with a “1”. Britain seems to have started the tradition, back in 1801, and its own decennial stock-take will take place (except in Scotland) next weekend. Before covid-19, there were not many surprises. This year, thanks to the pandemic, there will be shocks and problems galore.








Everywhere more people than expected have died in the past year. Fewer babies are being conceived. Many migrant workers and foreign students have gone home. It is harder for census-takers to count people, because of social distancing. And it will be harder for anyone to make sense of the numbers they collect, because the past year has been so anomalous.


Some countries, such as the Netherlands, no longer conduct a formal count, relying instead on various data-banks to serve up national statistics. Most do still conduct one, but the amount of actual door-knocking varies. Information stored in databases and collected by census declarations online often needs enumerators to go out and check things, but sending them to ply the streets while covid-19 is still raging is not on. So Germany, France, Ireland and Scotland, among others, have postponed their censuses until next year.


Until the pandemic, demographic trends in most European countries were fairly similar. Europeans were ageing and having ever fewer babies. Without immigration the population of most European countries was set either to shrink soon or had already started to do so. Since 2012 deaths in the European Union’s 27 members have exceeded births. That has been the pattern in Germany since 1972 and in Italy in every year bar two since 1993. The fertility rate in the eu is now 1.53 children per woman—well below 2.1, the rate at which a population remains roughly stable. It is lowest in Malta, at just 1.14, and highest in France, at 1.83.




The biggest disparity between countries has been migration. Richer European countries attract migrants from poorer ones. So the population of those richer countries has increased over the past quarter of a century, despite low birth rates, whereas the population of the poorer ones has plummeted (see map). Bulgaria’s has shrunk by 21% since 1990; Romania’s by 17%. So worried is the eu that since 2019 it has had a commissioner for demography.


The pandemic has disrupted all of these trends. Around 547,000 people have so far died of covid-19 in the eu. Many east Europeans have gone home. The pandemic-induced recession has left many couples feeling financially insecure, so birth rates are expected to tumble even lower. For the first time since 2011 Germany’s population has not grown.


Unlike births and deaths, data on migration are hard to capture. Whereas Germany’s population has merely stopped growing, Britain’s may have shrunk dramatically. According to the Economic Statistics Centre of Excellence, a research body in London, covid-19 may have driven away more migrants than Brexit. Many had jobs that have disappeared, such as waiting tables and pulling pints. Thanks to an exodus of central and east Europeans, the United Kingdom’s population may have fallen by a whopping 1.3m.


Data on the number of migrants who have gone back home are sketchy. Ognyan Georgiev of the European Council on Foreign Relations, a think-tank, found that more than 558,000 Bulgarians returned from across Europe during the first lockdowns, between last March and May. The prime ministers of Serbia and Romania reported that 317,000 and 200,000 respectively of their citizens returned in the first few weeks of the pandemic.


Some of those who have gone back east are professionals who can work remotely, and may stay after the pandemic recedes, collecting British and German salaries while enjoying a lower cost of living in their homelands. But that could swiftly end if their employers ask them to come back to the office.


The pace of economic recovery will dictate Europe’s future migration patterns. Kresimir Ivanda, a demographer at Zagreb University in Croatia, says that if northern and western European countries recover faster than southern and eastern ones he will expect a new wave of Bulgarians, Croats, Italians and Spaniards to migrate once more for work. “In the short term,” says Mr Ivanda, “we will see huge disruption.” Mortality rates will rise and women, especially those in less secure jobs, will delay having children—and may never have as many as they had hoped. As covid-19 passes into history, he expects “the trends we have been witnessing in the last two decades to continue.” 
In 2017, any voters who wanted to follow Britain out of the eu had options. In the run-up to elections that spring, Geert Wilders, a bizarrely coiffured advocate of “Nexit”, was level at the top of polls in the Netherlands. A few months later Marine Le Pen reached the second round of the French presidential election on a policy of taking the country out of the euro and the eu itself. In Italy, Matteo Salvini, the leader of the Northern League, attacked Mario Draghi, then the boss of Europe’s central bank, as an “accomplice” to the “massacre” of Italy’s economy. The party dangled the prospect of Italy’s departure from the euro and even the eu itself.








Skip forward four years and the picture is different. Ahead of Dutch elections next week, there has been so little discussion of the eu that academics there have started begging politicians to pay some attention to the “eu olifant [elephant]” in the room. After flopping last time, Mr Wilders is now bashing Islam rather than Brussels. It will do him little good. Polls give a large lead to the party of Mark Rutte, the Dutch prime minister, who has learned to stop worrying and (almost, but not quite) love the eu. After a comprehensive defeat at the hands of Emmanuel Macron in 2017, Ms Le Pen and advisers have dropped their calls for Frexit and abandoning the euro ahead of elections next year. In Italy, Mr Salvini now supports a technocratic government run by Mr Draghi, his former nemesis, who is now prime minister. “I am a very pragmatic person,” said Mr Salvini, when discussing the shift.


Euroscepticism in its hardest form has gone out of fashion for a few reasons. Brexit torpedoed the idea of an easy departure. Anyway, leaving the eu was never a particularly popular idea outside Britain. Continental surveys such as Eurobarometer can generate Panglossian results, but they all point to big majorities supporting eu membership in almost every country. In both France and the Netherlands 69% would vote to stay, while only 31% would back leaving, according to eupinions, a pollster. Attracting these would-be quitters is a reasonable strategy in the Netherlands, where politics is so fragmented that anything over 10% is a good result. But it is a weak foundation to rely on for those hoping to win more than half the vote, such as Ms Le Pen.


Even in countries where leaving is ostensibly popular, the idea of ever actually doing it is beyond the pale. Italian voters are among the most fed up when it comes to the eu. During the nadir of the covid-19 crisis last year, nearly half of Italians said they would vote to leave the bloc, given the choice. At the same time, the main complaint about the eu is that there is not enough of it: Italians are among the biggest advocates of deeper integration, demanding everything from common debt to sharing out the asylum-seekers who turn up on Italian beaches. When it comes to the eu, Italian voters resemble Woody Allen’s joke about two people moaning in a restaurant: the food here is terrible, and such small portions. Over the past year, however, the portions have increased. As part of the eu’s €750bn recovery fund, Italy will receive around €200bn in grants and loans, paid for with common eu debt. Mr Salvini’s change in tune comes after a change in circumstances.


Equivocal Eurosceptics like Mr Salvini increasingly make a different calculation: why try to smash the eu when you can help reshape it? The Northern League and Ms Le Pen’s National Rally have shifted from pariahs to potential parties of government, says Duncan McDonnell of Griffith University. Mr Salvini has a shot at becoming prime minister, polls suggest. A Le Pen presidency is also possible, if still improbable. But the chance of a seat at the table is there. “It would be ridiculous to leave,” said Philippe Olivier, one of Ms Le Pen’s advisers (who is also her brother-in-law), when summing up the French politician’s shift in strategy. This strategy has worked well in Poland and Hungary, whose governments enthusiastically attack the eu yet have no intention of quitting.


An enemy within
After all, the eu is a tool. Changing who wields it changes what it does. The politics of austerity dominated the past decade because the centre-right politicians who controlled its levers of powers wanted it. Tight rules on spending were agreed by European leaders and can be dismissed in the same way. Leaders such as Mr Rutte tend to grow more comfortable with the eu once they learn how much control they have. National governments run the show.


There is no constitutional reason for the eu to shift towards the liberalism that so offends its Eurosceptic critics. Its treaties were not passed down on tablets of stone. If all governments agree, they can be changed, as indeed they may soon be if a planned Conference on the Future of Europe set to run until 2022 proves to be more than a talking-shop.


In any case, political orders trump whatever institutional biases may exist. Before the migration crisis of 2015, officials in the European Commission had a humanitarian bent on the topic, lecturing governments about the perils of building fences as people wandered across borders. But when a bunch of hard-nosed immigration ministers demanded a far tougher policy from the eu, they got what they wanted.


Yet Euroscepticism is dormant rather than dead. Politics is a results business, and increasingly those results are dictated by the eu. By taking on the responsibility for supplying vaccines, the commission also agreed to take the blame if things went wrong. If eu citizens find themselves still confined to their homes while Americans and Israelis hit the beach, Europe’s band of Eurosceptics may stir anew. Likewise, if the eu’s underpowered fiscal stimulus results in European economies falling further behind America, as seems likely, then the likes of Ms Le Pen and Mr Salvini will be first in the queue to try to exploit the anger. The eu is responsible, for the first time, for people’s health and more than ever for their wealth. Get either wrong, never mind both, and voters will not be forgiving. 
“Iworry about Berlin,” says Rolf Buch, a born and bred Rhinelander. The chief executive of Vonovia, Europe’s biggest residential-property firm, thinks that the city’s policy of capping rents has achieved little good, but caused severe collateral damage. Even if the federal Constitutional Court declares the rent cap unconstitutional in the next few months, as many expect it to do, Berlin will not go back to the status quo ante. Protests are here to stay, Mr Buch reckons.








Faced with increasing unrest over rents deemed unaffordable by Berliners, the city’s Senate, run by a coalition of Social Democrats (spd), Greens and Die Linke, Germany’s hard-left party, introduced a five-year rent cap for all apartments built before 2014 that came into force a year ago. In stage one of the scheme, which went into effect on February 23rd 2020, the rents for around 1.5m flats were frozen at their level of June 2019. When stage two kicked in on November 23rd, landlords were obliged to reduce any rents that exceeded by more than 20% a list of newly defined caps, set at anywhere between €3.92 and €9.80 ($4.66-11.66) per square metre, depending on the quality of the flat and the fittings it came with. Any future contracts would have to stick within the caps.


Sebastian Scheel, Berlin’s housing minister and a member of Die Linke, considers the scheme a success because rents have gone down in the capital. The spd has duly copied the idea; earlier this month it put a plan for the introduction of rent caps across the country into its manifesto for a general election due in September. And indeed a recent study by the German Institute for Economic Research found that rents in the newly regulated market of flats built before 2014 have declined by 11% compared with the still-unregulated market for newer buildings.




But the problem, entirely foreseeable and foreseen, is that the caps have made the city’s housing shortage much worse: the number of classified ads for rentals has fallen by more than half. Tenants, naturally enough, stick to their rent-capped apartments like glue. Landlords use flats for themselves, sell them or simply keep them empty in the hope that the court will nix the new regulation. Meanwhile, rents and sale prices in the still-unregulated part of the market, and in cities close to Berlin, such as Potsdam, have risen far faster than in other big German cities.


Thanks to its former status as a subsidised island in East Germany, Berlin’s property market has undergone extreme price fluctuations. For many years after reunification rents in Berlin were much lower than those in other big German cities. The supply of beautiful old apartments with high ceilings, tall windows and big drawing rooms (known as the Berliner Zimmer), was plentiful. Berlin’s population fell in the mid-1990s, and urban planners assumed that would continue. But then came waves of immigrants and young Germans attracted by low rents, a trendy art scene, all-night clubbing and a thriving job market. On average, 30,000-40,000 people have moved to Berlin annually in recent years, stretching social services, such as nursery schools and health clinics, to their limits. Rents have exploded. According to Mr Scheel they have more than doubled in the past ten years. Incomes have not been able to keep up.


Berlin could face a tricky autumn if Germany’s Constitutional Court kills the cap. Landlords may get the right to demand repayment for the rent they have missed out on, just as unemployment and insolvencies are forecast to shoot up because of the devastation wrought by the covid-19 pandemic. And an expropriation campaign, launched in 2019, is still gathering signatures to force a citywide vote on whether to oblige companies that own 3,000 properties or more, such as Vonovia, to sell them to the debt-laden city government.


Mr Buch says he is discussing dropping demands for repayments. About 10% of his company’s apartments are in Berlin. Deutsche Wohnen, another property behemoth that owns 110,000 flats in Berlin, says its fiduciary duty to its shareholders would oblige it to demand repayment from tenants, as Berlin is by far its most important market. But the company promises to find solutions for tenants who cannot pay any forthcoming arrears of rent. One thing is certain. The rent cap has managed to make Berlin’s housing shortage even worse—and poisoned relations between tenants and their landlords. 
Winfried kretschmann has a strong claim to be the world’s most powerful Green politician. True, Greens occupy a few junior ministries in places such as Austria and New Zealand. But Mr Kretschmann is the undisputed ruler of the state of Baden-Württemberg, an industrial powerhouse in Germany’s south-west that, with 11m people, is bigger than most eu countries. Ten years ago, voters spooked by the Fukushima nuclear accident and sick of decades of rule under the conservative Christian Democrats (cdu) doubled the Greens’ vote, elevating them to power at the head of a left-wing coalition. Even Mr Kretschmann was surprised. Yet he handily secured re-election in 2016, and may well repeat the feat at Baden-Württemberg’s election on March 14th. How he pulled it off carries lessons for the rest of the country, and perhaps beyond.








After a brief flirtation with revolutionary communism at university, by 1980 Mr Kretschmann had found his voice on the moderate “Realo” wing of the newly formed German Green Party. For years he nourished a small but growing audience for his message, articulated in the state legislature, that sustainability and other green topics ought to be combined with innovation and wealth creation. This put him “way ahead of his time”, says Danyal Bayaz, a Green mp from Baden-Württemberg.


Pro-business centrism is one of two pillars of Mr Kretschmann’s appeal today. Happy to label himself a “conservative”, he emphasises that climate protection must go hand in hand with economic growth, and readily slaps down bad ideas emanating from his own side. “People like it,” says Boris Palmer, the Green mayor of Tübingen, a town in Baden-Württemberg. “They don’t want party soldiers, they like politicians interested in their needs.” This has helped the Greens expand beyond their comfort zone, in cities such as Stuttgart and Freiburg, to former cdu voters and Mittelstand exporters, often in far-flung rural areas.


The second pillar is a well-crafted image that combines Mr Kretschmann’s down-home style—a devoted churchgoer and nature-lover who speaks in a hokey Swabian accent—with that of the philosopher-king who peppers interviews with Hannah Arendt quotes and lets it be known he spends his summers on Aegean islands thumbing through “The Iliad”. His big-tent Politik des Gehörtwerdens, the “politics of being heard”, is an antidote to divisive radicalism. Colleagues describe a patient leader open to fresh ideas on everything from school reform to artificial intelligence. All this gives Mr Kretschmann a statesmanlike aura that politicians from the cdu, now serving as the Greens’ junior coalition partner in the state, concede is damnably hard to run against.


It is a potent combination. Mr Kretschmann has at times led national popularity polls, despite having no ambitions beyond his home state (“Whenever I’m in Berlin, I am always reminded how beautiful it is in Baden-Württemberg,” he once quipped). Two-thirds of cdu voters in the state say they would vote for him directly given the chance. His popularity has inspired a mild personality cult. In a personalised campaign where the pandemic makes traditional electioneering impossible, voters are left to gaze at posters of their 72-year-old leader’s kindly visage overlaid with slogans such as: “He thinks about the big picture.”


Yet what do the Greens have to show for a decade in power? Mr Kretschmann’s government with the cdu can boast a strong biodiversity law, and an expansion of renewable power as the atomic sort disappears. Yet “given the constraints of the coalition, you won’t find so many concrete achievements,” says Mr Palmer. Take the car sector, which provides around one in five jobs. Not far from the grand Villa Reitzenstein in Stuttgart in which Mr Kretschmann conducts state business lie museums devoted to Mercedes and Porsche cars, and a square called Daimlerplatz. Mr Kretschmann once said he looked forward to a time with fewer cars on Germany’s roads. But he was condemned to hug the industry close.


Too close, for some. Mr Kretschmann’s commitment to yanking his state’s sometimes-dozy carmakers into the 21st century is genuine. Fearing that Baden-Württemberg could face a fate like Detroit’s, he has chivvied carmakers to confront challenges, such as the switch to electric cars, via a seven-year “strategic dialogue” started in 2017. But results are thin. In 2020 Mr Kretschmann disappointed many by teaming up with premiers of other petrolhead states to lobby for subsidies for diesel-fuelled cars. Some young activists fed up with Mr Kretschmann’s caution have formed a “Climate List” to contest the election. “The Greens have forgotten their roots,” grumbles Daniel Wagner, one of its candidates.


Over the years Mr Kretschmann has clashed with his party on everything from phasing out combustion engines to deporting failed asylum-seekers. For left-leaning Greens in other states, the party’s success in Baden-Württemberg can seem a mixed blessing: why seek office only to ape the conservatives? Mr Kretschmann replies that power is useless if you leave half of society behind. And as the only Green in charge of a state, he carries outsized weight in Germany’s federal system. His tendency to present himself as the voice of the party in national debates irritates colleagues elsewhere. But it has also made a difference, notably in 2019 when Greens in Germany’s upper house, where state representatives sit, sharpened a woefully unambitious climate-change package.


Don’t scare the horses
For all the hand-wringing, Mr Kretschmann’s centrism has carried the day in the national party, now firmly in the hands of Realos and gearing up to enter government after a general election in September. The habit of governing has become ingrained for the Greens, who sit in coalition in 11 of Germany’s 16 states. Should they agree to serve as junior partner to the cdu at national level, as polls suggest is likely, they will have to accept painful compromises. Yet if power is no longer the dirty word it once was in some Green circles, the party has its Swabian champion to thank. 
For a man in his own army’s cross-hairs, Nikol Pashinyan, the Armenian prime minister, seems unfazed. As long as the Armenian people have the final say, “there will be no coup,” he told The Economist this week. The only way out of the crisis consuming his country, he says, leads through the ballot box and early elections.








There are no tanks on the street in Yerevan. But Mr Pashinyan is fighting for his political life. On February 25th dozens of officers, including the country’s top soldier, Onik Gasparyan, demanded the prime minister’s resignation, accusing him of incompetence. Mr Pashinyan called this an attempted coup, refused to step down and ordered Mr Gasparyan to do so instead. (So far, he has not.)


Tensions in Armenia have been brewing since November, when Mr Pashinyan signed an armistice with Azerbaijan, ending a war over Nagorno-Karabakh, a separatist ethnic-Armenian enclave inside Azerbaijan. More than 6,000 people died in the fighting. Armenian defences were pummelled by Turkish drones and overrun by Azerbaijani ground forces. Under the ceasefire agreement, Armenia gave up control of swathes of land which it had captured around Karabakh three decades earlier. The enclave’s status remains unresolved. Some 2,000 Russian troops have been deployed there to keep the peace.


To many Armenians, persuaded by the army and the government that the fighting was going their way, the surrender came as a shock and a betrayal. Mr Pashinyan immediately came under fire. The opposition blamed him for provoking the war and losing the peace. Protesters stormed government buildings. The army (and the Kremlin) bristled after Mr Pashinyan claimed that Russia’s Iskander missiles, which Armenia used at least once during the war, had turned out to be duds. He backtracked after a phone call with Russia’s president, Vladimir Putin.


The protests have attracted no more than a few thousand people. But those who turn up seem to be spoiling for a fight. “Pashinyan sold out my homeland and my people,” says Hrachya Abramyan, a veteran of both Karabakh wars, at a rally in front of the parliament. “If he does not resign, we will grab him by the ears and throw him out like a dog.” The opposition parties have not warmed to an offer of snap elections, presumably because they continue to trail in the polls. Instead they propose a transitional government. Some appear on the verge of endorsing an actual coup. “I don’t like the idea,” says Davit Harutyunyan, a former minister. “But if I feel that without taking the next step we risk losing the country and civil war, then definitely.”


Mr Pashinyan, a former journalist, came to power in 2018, when exasperation with decades of cronyism overflowed into mass protests, bringing down the government of Serzh Sargsyan, his predecessor. Yet the tide that propelled Mr Pashinyan into power has ebbed. In elections two years ago, he won 70% of the vote. Today only 39% of Armenians want him in charge. He had already faced criticism for his handling of the economy and the covid-19 crisis. He has made no new friends by shrugging off the blame for the lost war.


Many see a Russian hand in the army’s move against Mr Pashinyan. Yet Russia may not want the Armenian leader gone, so much as tamed. Mr Pashinyan was once eager to loosen Armenia from Russia’s grip and to improve relations with Western powers. That is no longer possible. Hobbling from a lost war, squeezed between two old enemies and frustrated by Western inaction, Armenia now depends on Russia’s security guarantees more than ever, no matter who is in charge. 
On march 1st Russian news announced that Alexei Navalny was moving to a new prison, Penal Colony No. 2, notorious for psychological torture. Two days later his lawyers found him in a different, and less ghastly, jail. Russia’s justice system likes to keep people guessing.








The Kremlin says Mr Navalny, Russia’s main opposition leader, is a common criminal, as well as being a Western agent. Its propagandists tout his (plainly bogus) fraud conviction. Their struggle to convict him in the court of public opinion has received a boost from an unlikely source: Amnesty International, a global human-rights group.


On February 23rd Amnesty said it had decided to stop calling Mr Navalny a “prisoner of conscience”, a term first popularised by Amnesty itself. The reason given was that he had made some xenophobic comments nearly 15 years ago. Amnesty had not planned to publicise this decision, but an internal memo had leaked.


Kremlin megaphones went wild. Day after day they quoted Amnesty’s verdict that Mr Navalny’s comments constituted “advocacy of hatred”. “I very much understand Amnesty International which talks about hatred from Navalny’s side,” crowed Dmitry Kiselev, Mr Putin’s operatic propagandist-in-chief. The head of rt, a state broadcaster, called Mr Navalny a Nazi.


This propaganda coup was made easier by a shift in philosophy at Amnesty. In 1961 Peter Benenson, the group’s founder, defined a “prisoner of conscience” as anyone who is locked up for expressing an opinion “which does not advocate or condone personal violence”. For decades, this definition worked well. Amnesty’s campaigns helped bring about the release of legions of dissidents, including many in the old Soviet Union. But a new generation of activists decided that it was not enough to eschew violence. Since 1995, to merit the label “prisoner of conscience”, a dissident must also not have used hateful language.


Two videos Mr Navalny made, in 2007 and 2011, failed that test. At the time he was trying to build a broad coalition of liberals and nationalists to oppose Mr Putin. To this end, he sought to persuade patriotic voters not to back violent ultra-nationalists, who were then on the rise. In one video he condemned physical attacks on illegal immigrants, and said Russia should deport them instead. In another, he referred to Islamist militants as “cockroaches”.


Mr Navalny has long ago publicly expressed regret for using disparaging language about other ethnic groups, but has not specifically disavowed the videos. His activism now consists largely of pointing out how corrupt the Putin regime is. This rattles the Kremlin, which is why it tried to assassinate him last year. It is also why its propagandists worked so hard, after Amnesty named Mr Navalny a prisoner of conscience in January, to persuade the group that he isn’t.


Amnesty was flooded by almost identical complaints about Mr Navalny from “concerned citizens”. Many cited a Twitter thread by Katya Kazbek, a freelancer for rt, highlighting the old videos and calling Mr Navalny “an avowed racist”. The complainants urged Amnesty to abide by its own rules and strike Mr Navalny off its list of prisoners of conscience.


It did—and, by doing so, raised questions about those rules. The old definition of a prisoner of conscience was clear: a dissident who neither commits nor advocates violence. The new one is fuzzy. What counts as “hate speech” changes rapidly, and varies from place to place and listener to listener. If Amnesty disqualifies anyone who has ever said anything that is currently deemed hateful, it hands despots a powerful tool. Dig up the worst thing a dissident has ever said, and watch a Western human-rights group tie itself in knots.


Amnesty says it still considers Mr Navalny a political prisoner, even if he is not a prisoner of conscience, and calls for his release. The distinction is lost on many. Boris Akunin, a novelist, wrote to Amnesty: “Instead of protecting a man who was first almost killed and then unjustly imprisoned by a dictatorship you struck him a further blow. You closed the doors of his cell even tighter, making it harder for us all to fight for the man’s freedom. By adhering to the letter of your protocol you failed the spirit of your mission.” 
To some he was a military genius, strategic mastermind and visionary leader who bequeathed to France a centralised modern administration and sense of gloire. To others he was a tyrant and a butcher who squandered French supremacy in Europe on the battlefield of Waterloo. Napoleon Bonaparte, who died in captivity on the British island of Saint Helena at the age of 51, has long inspired both admiration and distaste, even in France. Now, ahead of the bicentenary of his death on May 5th 1821, those rival passions have been revived.








Alexis Corbière, a deputy from Unsubmissive France, a left-wing party, declared: “It is not for the republic to celebrate its gravedigger.” On the right Jean-Louis Debré, formerly head of the constitutional council, said that “overdoing it” would be “a provocation”. The Black Lives Matter movement has emboldened those who reject any celebration of a leader who reintroduced slavery to the French West Indies in 1802. Nicolas Mayer-Rossignol, the Socialist mayor of Rouen, says he wants to replace the imposing bronze statue of the emperor on horseback that stands outside his Normandy town hall.


Yet the French also acknowledge that they owe much of their modern state, and its institutions, not to mention their country’s aspiration to grandeur, to the “little Corsican”. As first consul, Napoleon created the French legal code, the Bank of France, the administrative system of préfets, high-school lycées, the légion d’honneur and much more. In a poll in 2016 he was listed as the second-most-important Frenchman in history, after Charles de Gaulle. His red quartzite tomb in Les Invalides, lying in splendid isolation in a crypt beneath the dome, receives over a million visitors a year. This spring scores of new books are promised, says the Fondation Napoléon, as well as conferences and a big exhibition in Paris. “We have every reason to be proud of him,” said Patrice Gueniffey, a historian, who considers him a historical figure on a par with Alexander the Great or Julius Caesar (both of whom also killed a lot of people).


President Emmanuel Macron has not yet shown his hand. In 2005 Jacques Chirac, a Gaullist predecessor at the Elysée Palace, refused—amid protests at the time—to commemorate the bicentenary of Napoleon’s victory at Austerlitz. Talk shows have been debating what to do this year, and whether his legacy is damaging or beneficial for France. An adept of “en même temps”, or the improbable art of reconciling opposing views, Mr Macron has his work cut out.
For most of its history, the European Union commanded no troops. It was not that sort of outfit. The idea of gun-toting Euro-soldiers was more a Eurosceptic bogeyman than a serious scheme. Yet on January 11th the bloc tweeted proudly that “[f]or the first time, the European Union has its own uniformed service”. A video, set to rousing music, showed a blue-clad, side-capped guard with the insignia not of any member state, but of the star-circled flag of Europe—a member of the new standing corps of the European Border and Coast Guard Agency, more commonly known as Frontex. But if the agency’s rise exemplifies the union’s march towards something resembling a state, it also illustrates how unsteady, and occasionally ugly, that advance may be.








When the idea of a joint border force was first mooted around the turn of the millennium, eu member states balked at the idea. Many had just abolished their national currencies and adopted the euro; pooling yet more sovereignty in a highly sensitive area was a step too far. Frontex eventually came into being in 2004, with a tiny budget and meagre staff, after a surge of irregular migration into the Canary Islands. But it was the migration crisis of 2015 that would transform its fortunes.


Politicians, desperate to shore up their borders, shovelled money and power at Frontex. Its budget leapt from under €100m ($123m) in 2014 to €280m by 2017, reaching almost €400m last year. Under the eu’s budget for 2022-29, Frontex is due to get €5.6bn for the seven-year period—half of what it originally hoped for, but a tidy sum nonetheless. The agency has also been given the right to recruit personnel and buy equipment directly, rather than borrowing both from member states. Its standing corps is on track to grow to 6,500 staff this year, with the aim of reaching 10,000 by 2027.




Its existing guards have already fanned out across Europe’s land and sea borders, where their job is largely to reinforce and support national border forces. But they have also ventured farther afield. Frontex personnel have deployed to “pre-frontier” areas such as Albania and Montenegro, and civilian officials to Niger, Turkey, Senegal and Serbia, where they monitor migrant flows headed towards Europe.


Those without uniforms need not worry about missing out. As well as patrolling borders, Frontex is now responsible for running a new European Travel Information and Authorisation System (etias), which will screen and authorise non-eu citizens entering the borderless Schengen zone without a visa, including Britons. Around 250 staff in Warsaw will eventually run the system around the clock. It also runs the European Border Surveillance System (eurosur), which fuses data from drones, ships, social media and the eu’s Copernicus Earth-observation satellites to build up a picture of migrant flows.


As its coffers have grown, Frontex has set its eyes on fancier kit. Last year the agency signed contracts with Airbus and Israeli Aerospace Industries, and Elbit, another Israeli firm, to buy €100m-worth of advanced drones to be based in Greece, Italy and Malta. It is also pouring money into other technology, including artificial intelligence. “I think the European Commission sees that as a way of muscling into the sort of core defence sphere, like dual-use and border technologies,” says Roderick Parkes of the German Council on Foreign Relations. “They've really got Europol in their sights,” he adds, referring to the eu’s law-enforcement agency.


But whereas Europol is regarded as a pocket of administrative excellence, Frontex has a more chequered reputation. On December 7th the eu’s anti-fraud office, olaf, raided the offices of Fabrice Leggeri, Frontex’s director, and his chef de cabinet as part of a probe into misconduct, including the “pushback” (illegal deportation) of migrants. In October an investigation by Bellingcat, a digital-forensics group, and several news outlets said that Frontex vessels were either “actively involved” or present during several such efforts on the Greek-Turkish border (Frontex denies this). On January 27th Frontex said it had suspended operations in Hungary, after the eu’s top court criticised that country’s forcible return of migrants to Serbia.


Many of these problems are “growing pains”, says Hanne Beirens of the Migration Policy Institute Europe, a think-tank. One issue is that Frontex’s central administration is too small to supervise the growing number of far-flung staff and their compliance with human-rights rules. In the past, member states were partly responsible for their officers on secondment with Frontex. The new standing corps severs this national chain of accountability, says Raphael Bossong of SWP, a think-tank in Berlin. “Ultimately, the eu would directly become responsible for these executive actions, including those with potentially lethal consequences.”


Yet more management would not solve the problem. The larger issue, says Ms Beirens, is the clash between the eu’s spiralling ambitions—it has expanded Frontex’s mandate thrice in the space of five years—and the agency’s limited powers on the ground. If officials see abuse occurring, they have few options to stop it other than to pull out, as in Hungary. In some cases, local border forces conduct the most unsavoury activity when Frontex is not looking.


Other problems will need ironing out too. As Frontex expands, it risks drawing recruits away from the eu’s existing pool of 100,000 or so border guards, leaving gaps in national forces. And the pattern of recruitment might also show up deeper faultlines. Frontex’s foot soldiers are drawn from low-wage eastern and southern European countries, but its leadership comes from wealthier north-western ones “who haven’t guarded a land border in the last 30 years”, observes Mr Parkes.


Meanwhile, Frontex’s purview is growing wider still. In December, as part of post-Brexit wrangling, Britain and Spain agreed that the border between Gibraltar and Spain would be abolished, with the British territory effectively being folded into the eu’s Schengen zone. Britain objected to the idea of Spanish border guards taking over ports it had controlled for 300 years. So Frontex will do the job, at least for the next several years. “There's hardly anything more controversial than who guards your borders,” notes Christian Kaunert of the University of South Wales. “It’s the most symbolic aspect of statehood.” 
For much of France’s Fifth Republic, the modern state established by Charles de Gaulle in 1958, criminal cases against elected politicians have often failed either to reach court or to end in a conviction, let alone a prison sentence. On March 1st a Paris court took a step closer to ending an era of impunity. It found Nicolas Sarkozy, a centre-right president from 2007 to 2012, guilty of corruption and influence-peddling. He was sentenced to three years in prison, two of them suspended.








The decision has sent a shockwave through the French political class. This is the first time an ex-president has been handed an irreducible prison sentence. In 2011 Jacques Chirac, another centre-right former president, was handed a two-year suspended sentence for the misuse of public funds, dating to his time as mayor of Paris in the 1990s. Mr Sarkozy has denied all the allegations, and has appealed.


The case against him dates back to 2013. Investigators tapped his mobile phone while looking into allegations that Muammar Qaddafi, the former Libyan leader, had helped finance the French candidate’s campaign in 2007. They stumbled upon conversations between Mr Sarkozy and Thierry Herzog, then his lawyer. These exchanges, which the pair thought were protected by lawyer-client privilege, concerned separate illegal party-financing allegations then circulating. The case against Mr Sarkozy in that affair had been dropped. But, prosecutors said, he wanted information linked to other inquiries.


During these conversations, ruled the court this week, a “corruption pact” emerged. In return for information, Mr Sarkozy offered to help secure for Gilbert Azibert, an appeals-court magistrate, a plum job in Monaco. (Mr Azibert never got the job.) The court also gave Mr Herzog and Mr Azibert prison sentences of three years each, two of them suspended. Both deny the accusations. Mr Sarkozy, the judge said, who was “the guarantor of the independence of the judiciary, used his status as former president to reward a magistrate for having served his personal interest.”


Mr Sarkozy is unlikely to end up behind bars. The court said he could wear an electronic tag instead. He has in any case appealed, a process that could take many months, if not years. Christian Jacob, head of his Republicans party, called the sentencing “absolutely disproportionate”. Mr Sarkozy called it a “profound injustice”, and stressed that no money changed hands: even the judge said the ruling was based on a “faisceau d’indices” (a body of indications), not proof. Friends say that magistrates were out to bring the ex-president down. On March 17th Mr Sarkozy is due in court to face separate charges of exceeding campaign-finance caps. He denies these accusations too.


In recent years, courts have convicted a string of French politicians. This has begun to erode the sense that they are untouchable. Last year a court sentenced François Fillon, Mr Sarkozy’s former prime minister and a presidential candidate, to five years in prison, three of them suspended, for embezzlement. He is awaiting his appeal. Others include Jérôme Cahuzac, a Socialist ex-budget minister, Claude Guéant, Mr Sarkozy’s former chief of staff, and Patrick Balkany, an ex-deputy from Mr Sarkozy’s party and former mayor of Levallois-Perret, a Paris suburb.


In one of those twists at which the French excel, the once-hyperkinetic Mr Sarkozy has become more popular since he left office than when he was president. Despite the judicial tangles, time and defeat at the ballot box in 2012 appear to have softened opinion towards Mr Sarkozy. A recent poll, taken before the verdict, found him to be France’s sixth-most-popular politician. He continues informally to oversee matters relating to the Republicans, ahead of the presidential election in 2022. Some of those close to him suggest that, before this week, he had not given up hopes of running again.


This verdict surely puts paid to those ambitions and could open up the centre-right field, perhaps even to Michel Barnier, a former French foreign minister who ran the eu’s Brexit negotiations. It may serve a broader purpose too. The second conviction of an ex-president stands as a powerful sign that French politicians are held to the same standards as ordinary citizens—even those at the very top. 
Wander around any Polish city and the same phone number pops up on an array of unlikely surfaces. It is scrawled on bus stops and billboards. It can be daubed on the side of a church. Head online and the same number (+48 222 922 597) appears in people’s usernames. Those who dial it are put through to Kobiety w Sieci (“Women on the Net”), a group that offers women information on how to get abortions. In a country where providing terminations is now, in effect, illegal, it is a useful number to have.








In October Poland’s constitutional court struck down a law allowing abortion in cases of fetal abnormality. Of the 1,000 or so legal abortions in Poland per year before the ban, nearly all were in this category. Now, abortion is limited to cases of rape or to save a mother’s life. This fulfils a long-held dream of Poland’s ruling Law and Justice party to clamp down on abortions. Activists responded by turning cities into a gonzo Yellow Pages. It also provided a burst of publicity for Abortion Without Borders, an alliance of organisations such as Kobiety w Sieci that help women who live in countries where abortion is restricted. After the Polish ban, traffic to the website shot up and calls poured in. Among the callers were angry priests, demanding to know who had plastered their church with the number of an abortion hotline.


Abortion laws within the eu are a patchwork. They range from relatively permissive in places such as the Netherlands to practically banned in Poland (and forbidden altogether in Malta). The bulk fall in between. There are no common rules. Normally, the eu steps in to harmonise law. On reproductive rights it has no competence. Given that the bloc ranges from the devout to the enthusiastically godless, eu officials would rather ignore the issue. Yet thanks to the free movement of people and goods—and the increasingly blurred distinction between European and domestic politics—the eu still makes it easier to obtain abortions within its territory, whether it tries to or not.


Consider how organisations such as Abortion Without Borders work. Activists in Poland offer only advice, which is perfectly legal. Groups based outside Poland will arrange the delivery of pills, book flights, arrange translators and pay for treatment. In one case, they even coughed up the deposit for a hire-car. In Poland these activities would leave them open to prosecution. In, say, the Netherlands, no one can touch them. Posting abortion pills into Poland requires beating the authorities. Crackdowns have been mounted in the past. “We found other ways,” says Dr Rebecca Gomperts, a campaigner for legal abortion. Thanks to the single market, sending a package from one part of the bloc to another requires no extra paperwork. It is easy for goods to slip through. If it is a game of whack-a-mole, the moles are winning.


Likewise, freedom of movement means that abortions available in one eu country are available to all eu citizens, provided they have the means to get there. Groups such as Abortion Without Borders make that possible by paying travel costs (and, during the pandemic, arranging covid-19 tests). Usually, the eu operates on the principle that a person or business should be treated roughly the same in any eu country. Without common rules, arbitrage comes into play: companies can move from states with tougher regulations to those with lighter ones. This is exactly what can happen, at least temporarily, when a Polish woman wants an abortion. She boards a train to where the rules won’t stop her.


Abortion law in Europe is, on the whole, liberalising. Ireland allowed abortion in 2018, as religious opposition faded and the law was routinely flouted by women who went to Britain for terminations. Availability varies between different European countries, however. Terminations beyond 12 weeks are tightly limited, with only a handful of countries offering them in most circumstances. (When Britain, which allows abortions with little restriction up to 24 weeks, left the bloc, the options were further reduced.) The upshot is that women head to wherever they can get what they want. Enter the waiting room in a Dutch clinic offering late-stage abortions and one will find women from across Europe.






Free to choose
To its critics, the eu is at best a poor defence against illiberalism and at worst an enabler of it. Under its watch, governments such as Poland’s have trampled on women’s rights, judicial independence and media freedom. Only this month independent media in Poland staged a blackout in protest at a punitive tax. Yet when it comes to abortion, the eu’s guarantees of free movement for goods and people serve unwittingly to spread a different kind of freedom of choice.


eu membership has liberalising effects in other, less obvious ways. When the eu was haggling last summer over €1.8trn ($2.2trn) of funds to be distributed to countries over the next seven years, some governments demanded the right to claw back the money if countries such as Poland trampled on the rule of law. Polish ministers dismissed that as an ideological assault, a punishment for Poland doing things liberal eu members did not like, such as limiting abortion. Actually, the reason other eu countries wanted to punish countries that threaten the rule of law was that countries such as Poland have been threatening the rule of law.


Where Polish ministers are right to be wary is that, eventually, decisions such as banning abortion will move into the arena of European politics. Politics follows money. And now the eu controls more of it. Taxpayers in rich countries may wonder what the governments spending their cash are up to. Voters in one country may not approve of funding a government that tramples on women’s rights, nobbles judges and hounds journalists. While restrictive abortion laws exist in places like Poland, the process will remain needlessly miserable. But safe, legal routes are still open—and there is little Poland’s rulers can do about it. In the eu an abortion is only a phone call away, no matter what the law says. 
The mechanical clatter of chairlifts and the bass beat of high-altitude bars are familiar soundtracks in an Alpine ski resort every winter. So the quiet of the mountains this season is startlingly strange. French ski resorts are instead alive to different sounds: children tobogganing, huskies pulling sledges, defiant enthusiasts trudging uphill on skis with skins. Late last year, when the French government decided to clamp down on covid-19 once more, it shut all uphill transport but kept resorts open. This means the French can still go skiing—but without lifts.








Some solutions are punishing. Ski touring, or uphill skiing, involves struggling up the slopes on foot, with grips attached to the bottom of the skis. The Alpine village of Saint-Martin-de-Belleville, part of the Trois Vallées ski domain north-east of Grenoble, has opened a couple of runs for those with the stamina to reach the top. But skiers have become a minority. Husky-sledding is fully booked. Kit for trekking on raquettes (snow shoes) has sold out. “Everything we had has been pre-booked and rented,” says the owner of a ski-hire shop in Saint-Martin. At an altitude of 2,000 metres, hardy tourists can even go ice-diving through a hole in a frozen lake.


The French ski for almost as many days in total every year as Americans, who are five times as numerous. With little prospect of lifts opening this season, and most neighbouring ski areas also shut, France’s 325 resorts have had to diversify. This may help them lure more non-skiers to the mountains in future. Meanwhile, those who usually make beds, serve drinks, maintain the lifts or teach ski school in the Alps are either furloughed or out of work. Foreign tourists are stuck at home.


Saint-Martin-de-Belleville’s tourist office says it has only 30% occupancy, less than half its normal rate in February. In the high-altitude French resorts, purpose-built for skiing and often charmless, the rate has dropped to 25%, says the National Association of Mayors of Mountain Resorts (anmsm).


The government has unveiled a “mountain plan” costing €4bn ($4.8bn) to help keep people and businesses going. But the squeeze is being felt. Some small shops and firms usually earn two-fifths of their yearly income in February. Revenues across the ski industry may be half the €10bn expected in a normal year. Village town halls, which depend on their share of lift-pass or car-park income, fear for their budgets. “The mountain is an ecosystem,” says Joël Retailleau of the anmsm. “It’s easy to just press a button and close the lifts, but it has knock-on effects, not only in the resorts, but down into the valleys. This affects hundreds of thousands of people.”


Local anger at the government’s decision may be vented in regional elections in June. Laurent Wauquiez, a Republican who is president of Auvergne-Rhône-Alpes, was the favourite even before the lifts were shut. Marine Le Pen’s nationalist party was lying second without even picking a candidate. The government is unlikely to reopen ski lifts before the season ends. If anything, as infection rates start to rise again, it may have to tighten up. Neighbouring Italy had planned to reopen ski resorts this month, but changed its mind.


Ski lifts transformed the poor mountain valleys of France into playgrounds for Europe’s rich, but also created glaring inequality. Locals now find themselves missing the tourists, even if the mountains are gloriously peaceful without them.
“Human dignity shall be inviolable.“ The first article of Germany’s constitution turns out to have surprisingly broad application. For while much of Germany’s service sector remains in the deep freeze, on March 1st Germany’s 80,000 hair salons will be allowed to reopen. Some politicians frowned at the decision, taken in mid-February. But it has “something to do with dignity”, argued Markus Söder, Bavaria’s premier.








Germany required hairdressers to close before Christmas. During this long winter many mop-headed Germans immersed themselves in distinctly undignified self-cutting Instagram tutorials, or made hair-raising dashes to salons in Luxembourg. Others went underground. Frauke (not her real name), a Berlin-based stylist, has been visiting clients for a secret snip “on the down low”, albeit with precautions. Lockdown fatigue has set in, she reckons. When hairdressers first closed last spring, almost all her regulars cancelled. This time a good 80% of them are willing to risk fines to maintain a decent trim.


"Our profession has social relevance," argues Jörg Müller of the Central Association of the German Hairdressing Trade. Yet its special treatment has inspired snippy comments from owners of locked-down hotels, shops and restaurants. What explains it? A slick lobbying effort by Big Hair helped. Politicians cite "personal hygiene" and the needs of the elderly. Frauke says her clients think the "old, white men" who run the country have grown tired of looking scruffy.


Either way, Germany's hairdressers have timed their return well. The decline in covid-19 numbers has stalled, and vaccination is proceeding at the pace of a leisurely perm. That means the (presumably well-coiffed) state and national leaders who will meet on March 3rd may not be able to offer German citizens and businesses the easing of restrictions they crave. When it comes to leaving lockdown, there can be no short cuts.
The kremlin has accused nato of trying to overthrow Vladimir Putin. It has portrayed Alexei Navalny, Mr Putin’s most prominent challenger, as America’s agent. It has called the European Union, which condemned Mr Navalny’s poisoning and subsequent imprisonment, an “unreliable partner”. But there is one nato country, and candidate eu member, that Mr Putin is happy with: Turkey. Recep Tayyip Erdogan, Turkey’s president, has said nothing about the mistreatment of Mr Navalny or the arrests of thousands of Russians who protested against it.








His silence is testimony to a remarkable entente that has developed between the two authoritarian leaders. It is an improbable relationship. Deep historical rivalries divide Russia and Turkey, and their interests collide, sometimes violently, in many areas. Yet the two men share a bond in hard power that is reshaping regional politics and posing awkward problems for Turkey’s Western allies.


Historically, Russia and Turkey have gone to war a dozen times, though not since both empires were transformed by revolution at the end of the first world war. The continent-spanning colossi had continually rubbed up against each other in areas where their interests overlapped, and in many ways they still do. They have, for instance, recently been sparring over the civil wars of Libya and Syria. In September they faced each other closer to home in the South Caucasus, which Russia sees as its backyard. With Turkey arming and instructing a Turkic-speaking Muslim Azerbaijan and Russia standing behind Christian Armenia, many worried that a conflict over Nagorno-Karabakh, an ethnic Armenian enclave within Azerbaijan, would spread into an even bigger war.


Yet even as Turkey’s drones pummelled the Russian tanks used by the Armenian side, Mr Putin praised Mr Erdogan as someone he could do business with. “Working with such a partner is not only pleasant but also safe,” he told an audience of foreign experts at the Valdai Discussion Club in October. Mr Erdogan, in turn, saluted Mr Putin by testing the s-400 missile system that Turkey had bought from Russia. In November they ended the fighting by striking a bargain that gives Russia a military presence in Nagorno-Karabakh and Turkey an economic stronghold in the South Caucasus.


That deal represents one of the biggest geopolitical shake-ups since the end of the cold war, when Russia and Turkey were on opposite sides. It also carries a message about the use of hard power and the reality of a multipolar world. “They both understand that it is not the balance of forces that matters, but the readiness to use them,” says Andrey Kortunov, head of the Russian International Affairs Council. America may have had a superior army, but its reluctance to become engaged in Syria left Russia and Turkey in charge of that war-battered region. And after nearly 30 years of fruitless talks over Nagorno-Karabakh, it was Turkey’s military backing and Russia’s acquiescence that helped Azerbaijan regain territory and shake up one of the least soluble conflicts in the Caucasus.


To Mr Putin, this was a demonstration of a new multipolar order, something he had been advocating since 2007, when, at the Munich Security Conference, he first took issue with the post-cold-war order with its “one centre of authority, one centre of force, one centre of decision-making”. Russia’s mission was to constrain America’s new hegemony.


Nagorno-Karabakh was not the first time Russia had collaborated with Turkey to minimise the influence of Western powers. In the aftermath of the Bolshevik revolution and the collapse of the Ottoman empire, Kemal Ataturk briefly saw Lenin as an ally against the imperial West and the Bolsheviks saw Turkey as an accomplice in their quest for world dominance. They supplied Turkey with arms to fight the Greeks and the British, and the Turks allowed the Bolsheviks to take control of the oilfields of Azerbaijan and establish their rule in the South Caucasus. The deal between Ataturk and Lenin in 1921 that fixed Turkey’s north-eastern border and limited its presence in the South Caucasus has held ever since.


Last year’s war over Nagorno-Karabakh was a mirror image of that deal. It is now Mr Putin who is wooing Turkey in his confrontation with the West, hoping to use it as a wedge in nato, while Mr Erdogan is projecting Turkey into its former spheres of influence. The warmth is all the more remarkable given that Turkey is the only nato country to have collided with Russia militarily in recent years. In 2015 Turkey shot down a Russian warplane that had violated its airspace after flying over Syria.




Russia responded by imposing sanctions against Turkish products, ordering Russian tourists to stay away from Turkish beaches and bombing ethnic Turkmen fighters in northern Syria. Turkey found it impossible to pursue Islamic State (is) and the militants of the Kurdistan Workers’ Party (pkk) on the Syrian side of the border. To rub it in, Russian officials and media outlets accused members of Mr Erdogan’s family of buying oil from is. As one Turkish official later said, “We played hard, and they played harder.”


The thaw
What changed? The relationship began to improve in the summer of 2016, when Mr Putin commiserated with the Turkish president after an abortive coup in Turkey that killed some 270 people. “Putin called immediately,” says a Turkish official. “Like the guy or not, he was smart enough to show solidarity.” Most Western leaders were slower to do so. Mr Erdogan travelled to Russia, where he signed a gas-pipeline deal and agreed to resume work on a Russian nuclear plant in southern Turkey. The two pilots who had shot down the Russian plane in 2015 ended up in prison, charged with being involved in the coup.


“The fighter-jet crisis was a turning-point in how Turkey dealt with Russia,” says Emre Ersen, a Russia expert at Marmara University in Istanbul. “After nato didn’t run to Turkey’s help, Turkey understood that the only way to advance its interest in Syria was by agreement with Russia. That agreement still holds.”






Since 2016 Mr Erdogan has held more face-to-face meetings with Mr Putin than with any other leader. Russia has turned from being Turkey’s opponent in Syria’s civil war into its most important partner there. Turkey has been able to carry out its military operations in northern Syria only with Russian consent. Meanwhile, Russian news outlets have made inroads among Turkish audiences. Mr Erdogan’s inner circle now includes a group of “Eurasianists”, who are open to co-operation with Russia and China and hostile towards Europe and nato. Turkey’s government and its propaganda machine now play up tension with the West as much as they tend to play down tension with Russia.


The decision to buy the s-400 air-defence system is the most consequential element of the new relationship so far. Two years ago Mr Erdogan called the purchase “the most significant deal in our history”. The system has not come cheap. The price Turkey paid included $2.5bn for the hardware itself, expulsion from America’s f-35 programme and the accompanying loss of $9bn in contracts for the Turkish arms industry. In December America imposed additional sanctions against Turkey’s defence-procurement agency.


Mr Erdogan may have been desperate for a weapons system that could counter the kind of threat that arose in the coup in 2016, when Turkey’s own F-16s bombed his palace. Many of his supporters believe, improbably, that America had a hand in that coup. In February his interior minister accused it of orchestrating the violence. There were also rumours that Russian military intelligence tipped off Mr Erdogan about an imminent threat to his life.


Into the American vacuum
In Syria, the Turks say they had no choice but to do business with Russia, as America shied away from confrontation with the regime, drawing red lines but failing to take decisive action. Turkey also bristled at America’s decision to outsource the ground war against is to the Kurds. Turkish officials say America not only allowed Russia to emerge as the main power-broker in Syria but alienated Turkey by teaming up with the pkk’s local offshoot.


Occasionally clashes between Turkey and Russia still occur, as when, a year ago, a Turkish convoy got hit by Russian jets in the service of the Syrian army. The strike killed at least 36 Turkish soldiers. Yet Turkey was careful not to confront Russia directly and blamed the attack on Syria’s president, Bashar al-Assad.


For his part, Mr Putin was equally accommodating, and allowed Turkey to take revenge and pummel Syrian positions with combat drones while Russian jets stayed grounded. As far as Mr Putin is concerned, using Turkey to undermine nato from within is even more important than helping Mr Assad in Syria. The same motive partly explains Russia’s acquiescence in Azerbaijan’s war over Nagorno-Karabakh, when Turkey helped the Azeris. Mr Putin has managed to convert Russia’s role as a mediator there into getting military boots on the ground, in the shape of peacekeepers, to supervise the new deal. Turkey has won both prestige in the region and a promise of a transport corridor through Armenia to Baku, which could join up with China’s Belt and Road Initiative. The West got nothing.


Trade and investment also play a part in binding Turkey to Russia. Because Russian energy exports make up the bulk of their trade, Turkey has a gaping $13.4bn deficit with Russia. “But we shouldn’t underestimate business ties,” says Behlul Ozkan of Marmara University. “Turkish construction companies close to the ak [Mr Erdogan’s party] are getting big tenders.” Between 2010 and 2019, Russia was by far the biggest market for Turkish contractors, with over $40bn in completed projects.


Mutual support
Those ties have come to matter especially because both leaders are presiding over struggling economies (see chart 1). In Turkey inflation and unemployment have remained in double digits since 2018. In less than four years, the Turkish lira has lost half its dollar value. Russia’s stagnant economy and a six-year-long decline in real incomes have fuelled broad discontent with the Kremlin. Both Mr Putin and Mr Erdogan have fallen back on the idea that each of their countries is a “besieged fortress” surrounded by enemies, and resorted to aggression abroad to distract attention from troubles at home.




Broader trends are at work, too. Turkey and Russia share a sense of bitterness about being excluded from Europe. Turkey’s attempts to join the eu have been rebuffed for nearly six decades. The belligerent and authoritarian Turkey of today clearly has no place in the club. But such is the mood in Europe, and such the fear of a Muslim nation of over 80m people, that Turkey would probably not be allowed in, even if it became a thriving democracy.


Both autocrats share a nostalgia for empire. Mr Putin portrays himself as a patriot who is rebuilding parts of the Soviet empire, and has waged wars against Georgia and Ukraine. He strives to keep what he sees as client states, most recently Belarus and Armenia, on a tight leash. Mr Erdogan has placed his country’s Ottoman past in the service of a more aggressive foreign policy, making noises about restoring Turkish rule over Greek islands close to its Aegean shores, and confronting Greece, Cyprus and France in the gas-rich eastern Mediterranean. He fancies himself the voice of the Muslim world.


“Erdogan has the kind of personal relationship with Putin that he doesn’t have with many Western leaders,” says Mr Ersen. “Both are strongmen who are not challenged at home, and each knows the other has the power to implement the decisions they reach.” Mr Erdogan knows the deals he cuts with America risk being derailed by independent bureaucracies, public opinion and Congress. With Mr Putin, he does not need to worry about any of that.


Mr Erdogan has also been an attentive student of Mr Putin’s embrace of foreign policy by fait accompli. Russia bloodied Turkey’s nose in Syria and captured valuable turf to its north by annexing Crimea. “Erdogan recognised the value of hard power,” says Suat Kiniklioglu of the German Institute for International and Security Affairs. After Crimea, Turkey’s leader realised that aggression is not always punished. “Ankara sees weakness, disagreement, indecisiveness and confusion in the West, and sees this as an opportunity to intervene in its neighbourhood,” says Mr Kiniklioglu. Mr Erdogan has started to take a few pages out of Mr Putin’s handbook. Russia sent “little green men” and mercenaries to Crimea, the Donbas and Libya. Turkey deployed hundreds of Syrian mercenaries to join the fighting in Libya, and then in Azerbaijan, possibly through a private security company. Russia uses gas to exert pressure over European governments. Turkey uses migrants and refugees.




There are, of course, big differences between the two men and the countries they lead. Following a constitutional coup that scrapped the limit on his presidential terms, Mr Putin has moved much closer to dictatorship, though anger at the imprisonment of Mr Navalny may yet loosen his grip. Mr Erdogan’s power is less firmly entrenched. Turkey’s biggest conglomerates are run by members of the secular class, who accommodate the president but do not love him. Mr Erdogan has locked up many of his opponents, defanged the media and taken control of the courts, but still has to deal with tightly contested elections. His party’s support in the polls has been slipping. Two years ago in local elections it lost control of Istanbul, Turkey’s economic motor, and Ankara, its capital.


Vive la différence
Russia and Turkey are still far from, and may never conclude, a true alliance. “We’re not talking about a strategic partnership,” says Onur Isci, head of the Centre for Russian Studies at Bilkent University. “I don’t think Turkey has the luxury of risking the collapse of its whole institutional relationship with the West.” Although the two have co-operated in Syria, they remain on opposite sides of the war. The same is true in Libya and the Nagorno-Karabakh conflict.


The two powers also have largely incompatible interests in Georgia and Ukraine, both of which Turkey would like to see as members of nato. That is an absolute no-no for Russia, which waged wars to keep both countries apart from the West. As a result, Georgia and Ukraine now both look to Turkey as an important counterforce against Russia, a role that Mr Erdogan has been happy to exploit. Turkey has beefed up its economic and defence relationship with Ukraine. In 2019 it sold Ukraine half a dozen of its combat drones, the first such purchase by Ukraine’s army. “Turkey is not the Turkey of 30 years ago,” a Turkish official says. “Our defence and economic capacity has improved. We don’t see ourselves as speaking with Russia from a position of weakness.”


Russia and Turkey will look for common ground wherever they can, says Mr Ersen, but they will find it hard to reconcile their interests, especially in the Black Sea and the Caucasus, where Turkey’s position continues to be closer to the West’s than to Russia’s. “Regional problems”, says Mr Ersen, “are the soft underbelly of the Turkey-Russia relationship.” Their longer-term prospects diverge, too. Turkey’s demographic outlook and economic-growth prospects are much the brighter. Its population is growing; Russia’s is shrinking.


At present, Turkey is a country unmoored. It is increasingly estranged from the Western alliance. But its partnership with Russia is recent, thinly based, and reversible. Among the many matters competing for President Joe Biden’s attention, stopping Turkey’s drift away from the West and into Mr Putin’s arms deserves to be near the top of the list. 
The bois de la cambre is the most handsome park in Brussels. Its 123 hectares offer mature forest and potential peace for the residents of the Belgian capital’s well-to-do southern suburbs. Naturally, the Belgians—among Europe’s biggest petrolheads—built a motorway through it. During the lockdown, the park was closed to traffic. Pedestrians were delighted. Drivers were furious, court cases came and a new front in the culture war was born.








Grumpy motorists are easy to find in Europe today. Head north to the Netherlands and they moan about speed limits. There, motorway traffic now crawls along at 100kph (62mph) after the government cut the daytime speed limit from 130kph to stop the country busting through its pollution limits. Mark Rutte, the country’s ever-flexible prime minister, declared the measure he had just introduced “rotten”. Over the border in Germany, the days of screaming down the autobahn at 200kph could be over, if the Greens end up in government and introduce a speed limit. Green politicians know it will cause a fight. “The speed limit is second amendment stuff,” says Daniel Freund, a Green mep.


Car wars belie Europe’s reputation for eco-friendliness. Green parties are riding high in the polls and could return to power in Germany this year. Climate-denier cranks have been routed. Those who believe man has nothing to do with global warming are bracketed with folk who think the Moon landing was fake and Elvis is alive. Ambitious targets are set, and then made more stringent, as the eu positions itself as the class swot of environmentalism. A few years ago, reducing emissions to 40% below 1990 levels by 2030 was deemed enough. Now the demand is 55%. All eu countries have signed up to it, after persuasion and copious bribes via eu funding.


What must be done has been agreed on. The fight over how to do it is just beginning. Support for climate measures is broad but shallow, says Heather Grabbe of the Open Society European Policy Institute in Brussels, which polled eight European countries. Nearly all voters are happy to buy less plastic, though far fewer are keen to pay more for fuel or flights. And good intentions mask complacency. In each country a majority of voters expect life to continue broadly as normal, even if nothing is done by 2035. The size of the likely shift over the coming decades has not sunk in. Hard choices are yet to be made or a political price paid.






Already certain politicians of the right are jostling to provide voters with an easy way out. Policy platforms promising frequent flights, cheap petrol and a guilt-free carnivorous diet are appearing across fringe parties. Ahead of Dutch elections in March, the far-right Party for Freedom (pvv) promises to raise speed limits to 140kph. Populists have found their previous bread-and-butter issue, immigration, sinking from public consciousness as borders have been more or less closed. So now the likes of the Sweden Democrats, an anti-immigration party, and the similar Alternative for Germany are increasingly focusing on the environment. Most stop short of outright global-warming denial. Instead, they argue that too much is being done, too quickly, at too high a cost. “Nobody is against a green environment,” declares the pvv in its manifesto. Instead it opposes “pointless, unaffordable climate policy”. The pvv and its ilk are unlikely to get anywhere near office. Such parties achieve their aims, however, not by winning power but by dragging mainstream parties towards their positions. That is what happened with migration.


This makes it politically more dangerous for politicians to go green than at first glance. Get it wrong and punishment is swift. France provided an example of what not to do when, in 2018, it cut speed limits on country roads and raised taxes on fuel. The result was the gilets jaunes movement, which snowballed from a crowd of grumpy drivers into protesters waving mock guillotines in Paris. In Germany the Greens learned in 2013 that proposing to ban some things and charge more for others was not popular. In the land of sausage-munching drivers of gas-guzzling cars, the party proposed higher taxes on fuel and meat-free days in the cafeteria. Support plunged and the Greens are still trying to shrug off a reputation for being the party of prohibition.


Foot-dragging is already a problem, even before a proper backlash has begun. Germany agreed to phase out coal only by 2038, after dawdling from both the centre-left Social Democrats and the Christian Democratic Union, their centre-right coalition partners. The new cdu leader, Armin Laschet, is among the coal industry’s strongest supporters. The temptation to go even slower may grow as parties on the extremes offer voters an easy alternative. Pushing through environmental reforms in the wake of a catastrophic slump makes life even harder. Suppose the recovery is botched. Even if the real cause is miserly fiscal policy, voters may blame greenery for their woes. That could make reform harder to sustain.


Avoiding a car crash
When it comes to the environment, there will be losers. This is by design. Some behaviour—whether taking a third flight in a year, or zipping through a park in a Mercedes—must become inconvenient or expensive compared with greener options, because technology will not solve the problem fast enough. Some jobs will go. Politicians argue hopefully that if carbon taxes go up, then other taxes can go down; dirty jobs can be replaced by clean ones. But voters may feel they have heard all this before. A similar argument was put forward about globalisation. For years, voters were assured that it did not matter if jobs went abroad as new ones would replace them at home. The proceeds of extra growth would be shared. But the hoped-for redistribution disappointed. Some jobs were not replaced; some areas were left to rot. Politics went to pot. Voters are expected to accept this logic a second time and trust that governments will not betray them. If Europe’s leaders flunk it again, the consequences could be ugly. 
First they ignored him. Then they smeared his underpants with Novichok, a nerve agent. When he survived that, they jailed him. And now they are trying to demonise him. After years of refusing to utter his name in public for fear of making him seem important, the Kremlin is levelling its most intense propaganda at Alexei Navalny, Russia’s main opposition leader. He is the subject of every prime-time news programme and talk show—and they are not being polite.








The scale and intensity of this propaganda assault are reminiscent of campaigns waged by Stalin’s henchmen in the 1930s against “enemies of the people” and, more recently, are comparable to the Kremlin’s information war against Ukraine in 2014. The narrative is tried and tested. As usual, it consists of two parts.


The first is to portray Mr Navalny as a Nazi who belittles Russia’s victory in the second world war. Since most Russians are proud of this victory, and Mr Putin portrays the state he rules as the successor of the Soviet Union that won it, the implied message is that Mr Navalny is a threat to the Russian constitutional order itself. What such attacks lack in truth or logic they make up for in vehemence. Vladimir Solovyev, a Kremlin mouthpiece, likens Mr Navalny to Hitler, while adding that “Hitler was a very courageous man and did not dodge military service like this codpiece Führer.”


To provide more material for its propaganda machine, the Kremlin has mounted a show trial. Mr Navalny is accused of defaming a second world war veteran, who had appeared in a propaganda video last year, promoting changes to the constitution that allow Mr Putin to rule Russia beyond 2024. The charge hinges on Mr Navalny having said that everyone who took part in that video was a traitor.


The second part of the Kremlin’s narrative is that Mr Navalny is working for foreign intelligence services. According to Mr Putin’s people, he is part of a Western plot to destabilise Russia and somehow destroy its national identity. As evidence, they cite the presence of foreign ambassadors at his trial, and his team’s pleas to America and the eu to place sanctions on Mr Putin’s cronies. A demand on February 17th from the European Court of Human Rights that Mr Navalny be released immediately will doubtless serve as grist to that mill.


Mr Navalny, who now faces a large fine and additional time in prison on top of his current sentence of nearly three years, has counter-attacked. He mocked the judge by asking her to recommend a recipe for pickling cucumbers, since it was pointless to discuss the law with her.


The Kremlin’s campaign betrays its nervousness about Mr Navalny. His influence is growing, as shown by the success of a video he released about a vast secret palace that was allegedly built for Mr Putin by his cronies. In a recent poll by the Levada Centre, an independent pollster, some 36% of Russians reported having watched the film or being familiar with its contents, and another 30% had heard of it.


Such viewing figures represent a four-fold increase over Mr Navalny’s previous YouTube audience and shatter the Kremlin’s monopoly on information. Unable to counter his presence on social media and the internet effectively, the Kremlin has deployed its indiscriminate television artillery. Although television reaches mainly older people, it sends a strong signal to bureaucrats and state employees across the vast country.


Gregory Asmolov, an expert on information warfare and the internet at King’s College London, says the purpose of the mudslinging is to sow hatred and division. “Television propaganda helps to delegitimise people who support Navalny, and turns them into outcasts and enemies of the state and the people,” he says. This in turn helps to justify further repression.


Yet, perversely, the Kremlin is also helping to boost Mr Navalny’s movement. It is acting so outrageously that it is making it harder for ordinary citizens to acquiesce. And it is making the opposition’s supporters angrier, the sort of anger Mr Navalny has long sought to stoke. Propaganda is a powerful tool for prolonging an autocrat’s power. But it can also act as an irritant, driving calls for action against him. 
Markets have a way of bowing before Mario Draghi, who on February 13th took charge of Italy’s 68th government in 75 years. Stocks soared the moment it was reported he had been asked to become prime minister. Three days after he took office, investors flocked to a bond auction, slashing Italy’s borrowing costs. It was reminiscent of the hot days in July 2012 when Mr Draghi, then president of the European Central Bank, vowed to do “whatever it takes” to preserve the embattled euro. The bond-buying scheme the ecb assembled to render Mr Draghi’s promise credible was never used: his words were enough to calm the financial furies.








But tackling Italy’s problems demands more than rhetoric. Ravaged by the pandemic, on current projections Italy will not regain its pre-crisis gdp until 2023. And its covid-19 woes are layered atop deeper pathologies of slow growth, low productivity and high debt that have largely defeated the efforts of successive governments. “We all know the reform priorities,” says Marco Valli, an economist at UniCredit, an Italian bank. “The question is, will Draghi be able to fast-track the badly needed ones?”


The cards may seem stacked against him. Italy has burned through six prime ministers in the past decade; not since 2008 have voters themselves chosen one. The obvious cautionary tale is that of another non-politician in whom Europeans invested high hopes: Mario Monti, a former eu competition commissioner elevated into the job in 2011 after soaring bond yields toppled Silvio Berlusconi. He lasted only 18 months in office, and his reforms to pensions were later watered down.


Yet there is a bullish case for Mr Draghi. The legacy of his bond-buying activism at the ecb, and that of Christine Lagarde, his successor, should keep markets calm as he pursues tricky reforms. For the moment, voters seem less restive; Mr Draghi takes office with sky-high approval ratings. And whereas Mr Monti faced tough calls to slash spending, Mr Draghi’s government will be charged with allocating Italy’s share of the €750bn ($900bn) covid-19 recovery plan agreed on by the eu last summer. This could amount to more than €200bn in grants and loans over six years.


This is essential to understanding what amounted to a government of national salvation unveiled by Mr Draghi on February 12th. Its members range from the radical left to the hard-right Northern League, a party whose populist leader, Matteo Salvini, blithely ditched its Euroscepticism in exchange for seats at Mr Draghi’s table. That bears witness to the drawing power of “Super Mario”, the man who saved the euro, but even more to the largesse coming Italy’s way. How Mr Draghi chooses to dispense it will be crucial.


He offered his first hints during an address to Italy’s Senate on February 17th. The new prime minister promised to tweak the recovery plan drafted by the government of Giuseppe Conte, his predecessor, especially the part dedicated to environmental objectives—to which 37% of the recovery funds must be devoted. Final plans must be submitted to the European Commission by the end of April. Mr Draghi said his government would pay close attention to whether Italy’s proposed investment projects could be completed by 2026, when the last of the funds will be disbursed, but added that they should fit into a strategy aiming at 2050, when the eu’s net carbon emissions are meant to reach zero.


Although 15 of the 24 places at Mr Draghi’s cabinet table will go to politicians from the various parties in his coalition, the ministries that will execute Italy’s recovery plan will mainly be led by technocrats. Three stand out. Roberto Cingolani, a physicist with a background in robotics and nanotech, will run a super-ministry devoted to ecological transition. Vittorio Colao, a former Vodafone boss, will oversee digital and technological matters. Daniele Franco, the new finance minister, comes from Italy’s central bank. All three have managerial as well as technical expertise. Such appointments, says Mr Valli, show that “Mr Draghi wants his people in charge” of the recovery fund. At the ecb he was often keener on executing good policy than in winning over critics.




In his Senate address Mr Draghi also promised to speed up vaccination, and to begin a comprehensive overhaul of the income-tax system. He pledged to promote female employment and to narrow one of Europe’s widest pay gaps between men and women. Other areas for reform were the judicial system and public administration. Much of this will please officials in Brussels, who saw in Mr Conte’s draft plan more ambition on spending proposals than the reform that Italy’s huge debt stock (see chart) makes imperative. Paolo Gentiloni, the European commissioner charged with overseeing the recovery plans, is himself a former Italian prime minister who understands the country’s roadblocks to reform.


After decades in public service (plus a stint at Goldman Sachs), Mr Draghi’s new job marks the 73-year-old’s first foray into democratic politics. But the “technocrat” label conceals as much as it describes. He displayed sharp political instincts during the euro crisis, preparing the ground for policy shifts like the start of quantitative easing, and he outflanked critics like Jens Weidmann, the hawkish head of the Bundesbank. German conservatives detested his dovishness but failed to halt his policies. On leaving office in 2019 Mr Draghi was showered with praise by Chancellor Angela Merkel, and was awarded Germany’s Order of Merit, its highest civilian honour. Most of Europe’s leaders, whom he will meet (virtually) at a summit on February 25th, know and respect him. “The gut feeling is that someone like Draghi won’t blow it,” says a German official.


All this should help him manage what is likely to be a short-lived administration (an election is due by June 2023.) Still, the snake pit of Italian politics poses a new sort of test. Apart from the League and Mr Berlusconi’s Forza Italia, Mr Draghi’s cabinet unites representatives of the heterogeneous Five Star Movement and three leftist parties. “Unity is not an option; unity is a duty,” the new prime minister warned parliament this week. But a quarter of the Five Star lawmakers failed to support him in his first Senate confidence vote. And squabbles have already erupted, over picking junior ministers and closing ski slopes. They will not be the last. 
Just over a decade ago, France dropped a rule that had obliged motorists to change their car’s number plate each time they moved house to a new administrative département. The point was to ensure, in true bureaucratic style, that the vehicle’s plate matched the place of residence. Since 2009, however, car owners have been free to choose which département code they display, turning number plates into a test of sentimental attachment, with unexpected results.








The surprising favourite is Corsica, an island that is home to just 340,000 people. The 2A that represents one of the island’s two départements, along with its symbol of a bandanna-wrapped head, was the most sought-after plate, relative to the local population, over an eight-year period. Mountain regions were also popular. Paris did not get into the top ten.


This amour for Corsica, which became part of France in 1796 after a history of contested independence and conquest, may simply reflect the strong regional identity of the island’s diaspora. To display a 2A or 2B plaque is a badge of pride and belonging. Perhaps, suggest some, it is also a declaration of love for the “isle of beauty”, as it is known to French tourists, 2m of whom flock there in a normal year.


Or could it be that a Corsican number plate, consciously or not, is regarded as a form of implicit protection? The island has a history of violent nationalism, after all. The Corsican National Liberation Front waged a decades-long armed campaign for independence. No mainlander wants to attract too much attention there. Two decades ago Claude Erignac, the préfet, or central-government representative, was assassinated. Mob and clan rule on the island have a broad hold on the French imagination. Honoré de Balzac’s novel, “La Vendetta”, was about Corsican vengeance and family honour.


Even non-Corsicans in Paris are known to drive with Corsican plates. “They are convinced that their car won’t be damaged, and that they won’t be bothered on the roads,” suggests Benoit Ginet, founder of Eplaque.fr, an e-commerce number-plate business, which registered a disproportionate demand for those from the island in 2020. There may also be a form of superstition at work. “Motorists feel stronger with Corsican plates,” he suggests: “It’s a mark of serenity.” 
Catalans pride themselves on their seny, their hard-headed common sense. Yet when it comes to politics, as Jaume Vicens Vives, a great Catalan historian of the mid-20th century, pointed out, they have more often acted with its opposite: rauxa, or emotional impulsiveness. In the run-up to an election for the regional government on February 14th, many expected that practical matters such as the pandemic and the economic slump would be uppermost in Catalan minds. But the wounds of October 2017, when an unconstitutional referendum on independence for one’s of Spain’s most important regions led to the jailing of nine separatist leaders, are still raw. The Catalan authorities let the prisoners out on day release so that they could campaign. Once again, the emotional divide over independence dominated the election.




The separatist parties won 74 seats, increasing their slender majority in the 135-strong Catalan parliament by four. For the first time since launching their independence drive in 2012 they won a majority of the popular vote, with a total of 51%. But the import of that was blunted by a record low turnout of under 54% (down from 79% at the previous election, in 2017), depressed by the pandemic and political disaffection. The nationalist vote, meanwhile, was split among four parties with very different strategies. This allowed the Catalan affiliate of the Socialist Party of Pedro Sánchez, Spain’s prime minister, to win more votes than any other party, even though it took only 23%. For him it was a useful, if limited, victory.


Esquerra (the Republican Left of Catalonia), which now favours gradually building wider public support for independence, won 21% of the vote and 33 seats. It is now the best placed to preside over the Generalitat, the Catalan administration, dislodging its coalition partner, Junts (Together). As the party of Carles Puigdemont, a former president of the Generalitat who fled to Belgium in October 2017, Junts still flirts with unilateral action of the kind it took in 2017, when it declared independence after the referendum. The two parties have often been at loggerheads with each other and with the cup, an anti-capitalist separatist group that increased its seats from four to nine. Negotiations over forming a new government may take weeks.


“It’s time to sit down and see how we settle this with a referendum,” said Pere Aragonès, an Esquerra leader who is likely to be the next president. He also wants an amnesty for the prisoners. Another referendum on independence would aggravate a conflict that splits Catalonia down the middle. More modestly, Mr Sánchez’s government, which has sometimes depended on Esquerra in the national parliament in Madrid, is likely to approve pardons for the separatist prisoners. It began desultory talks with Esquerra that could eventually lead to an agreement for even more regional autonomy, which might satisfy most Catalans while irritating other Spaniards. Mr Sánchez’s hand was strengthened by poor results in Catalonia both for Ciudadanos, a centre-right party that lost 30 seats, and the People’s Party, the main conservative opposition. Both were overhauled by Vox, a hard-right party, which won 8% of the vote.


The messy result of this week’s election prolongs rather than resolves Catalonia’s political drama. The region is “resigned and downcast”, says Jordi Alberich, an economist in Barcelona, the Catalonian capital. “The separatists are resigned to the fact that independence won’t happen, and the non-nationalists that there’s nothing to be done.” The relentless theatre of the independence drive has hurt the Catalan economy, which was overtaken in size by the Madrid region in 2017. “It’s very difficult to unwind this,” says Mr Alberich. “It takes a long time and that has a heavy day-to-day cost.” 
Was there ever a luckier prime minister than Mario Draghi? Or an unluckier one? He is set to come into office with around €200bn ($240bn) from the EU’s recovery funds to spend. But he will also take over Europe’s worst-performing economy in a pandemic and with a parliamentary majority hard put to agree on anything, let alone on controversial structural reforms the European Commission wants to see implemented as the largesse is disbursed.




By February 12th, as he prepared to announce a cabinet featuring a mixture of politicians and technocrats, only the far-right Brothers of Italy party had declined the chance to climb aboard the “Super Mario” bandwagon. The ideologically variegated Five Star Movement (M5S), the biggest group in parliament, gave its approval following an online ballot of members (with a lukewarm 59% voting in favour of Mr Draghi). Even the hard-right Northern League hastily renounced its Euroscepticism to book a place in Italy’s next parliamentary majority, and perhaps its cabinet.


The former president of the European Central Bank faces both a daunting challenge and a unique opportunity. The challenge is to cope with the effects of covid-19 in a country hard hit by the virus; Italy is fourth in the eu in terms of deaths relative to population. Its economy shrank by 8.8% last year, compared with 5% in Germany. If a ban on sackings is lifted at the end of March, an estimated 250,000 more people will be dumped onto the labour market. Mr Draghi’s opportunity, though, is to use the recovery funds to start reversing two decades of economic decline. Even before the pandemic, Italians’ real gdp per person was lower than at the start of the century. Behind that woeful performance lies an array of obstacles to growth, held firmly in place by vested interests.




In consultations with the various parties, Mr Draghi has hinted at how he intends to deal with both the challenge and the opportunity. The priority areas he indicated were health (a central aim must be to speed up vaccination); education (he has suggested that the school year be extended to allow students to catch up); the protection of individuals and enterprises from the effects of the pandemic; and, less obviously, the environment (which squares with the priorities of the commission and the m5s). The prime minister-designate’s targets for reform are said to include Italy’s tax regime, its stultifying bureaucracy and a slow, unpredictable civil-justice system that discourages both domestic enterprise and foreign investment.


But these are tasks for a period of years, so the first question that arises is how Mr Draghi’s long-term aims can be reconciled with the eu’s exacting deadlines and—a point largely overlooked in the euphoria surrounding his appointment—the short life expectancy of his government. Contracts for 70% of the recovery funds must be awarded and signed by the end of 2022 and the remainder committed within the following year. In the meantime, a general election must be held by early 2023. But, given the parties’ aversion to winter campaigning, it is more likely in the first half of next year. Mr Draghi may want to step down even sooner if he is to run for president in a separate election due in February 2022. “I think he’ll set a working method for the next government,” says Veronica De Romanis, who teaches European economics at luiss, a university in Rome.


A second question is how much unpopularity Mr Draghi is prepared to risk. When the outgoing government suggested a longer school year, it prompted an outcry from the unions. Tax reform usually favours some parts of society at the expense of others. And Mr Draghi’s approach to safeguarding enterprises may also prove controversial. Last year he co-chaired a working group of the Group of Thirty, an informal body of bankers and officials, that looked at restoring the corporate sector after the pandemic. It concluded that governments should focus on supporting viable firms and managing the pace of what his co-chair called “the needed creative destruction”.


Mr Draghi is popular. But Italy’s electorate and parliament are notoriously fickle. “If he starts immediately with these reforms we have been speaking about for 20 years, he will have a chance of success,” says Giuliano Noci, professor of strategy and marketing at Milan’s Politecnico University. “But if he waits for more than a month, the sentiment will change.” 
No one is ever truly ready for lockdown. But when the Netherlands closed its schools in December, the Herman Wesselink College, a high school in a well-off suburb of Amsterdam, was readier than most. About half its students have parents who completed higher education. Nearly all have their own bedroom to study in. The school has given its pupils laptops for years, and during the first lockdown last spring switched smoothly to remote learning. The director says students have not fallen behind a whit in terms of content, though their study skills have languished.


The Mundus College, a trade school in a poorer Amsterdam neighbourhood, has had it rougher. About a third of its students are new immigrants or refugees. Vocational education is hard to do remotely. Classes have stayed open at half-size under an exception for vulnerable students, but it is impossible to follow social-distancing rules for subjects like nursing, says Diana Brummelhuis, the director: “You can’t teach someone to handle a wheelchair by lecturing.” She estimates that her pupils are lagging at least a quarter behind their normal pace.


Such contrasts are playing out all over Europe. On a continent famous for its welfare systems, school closures threaten to widen divisions of education, ethnicity and class. Compared with the rest of the world, Europe has not done badly during the pandemic. Most of its schools reopened in the autumn, while in South America and South Asia they largely stayed shut. But covid-19’s second wave has forced many European schools to close again.


This hurts all pupils, but it hits the poor and vulnerable ones harder. France’s education ministry says that last spring’s lockdown increased the gap in exam scores between normal schools and ones in hard-up areas by several points. In Germany, that first lockdown cut studying time from 7.4 hours per day to 3.6. An analysis of last year’s national exam results in the Netherlands came up with the depressing finding that during the spring lockdown the average pupil had learned nothing at all. Those whose parents were poorly educated did even worse: they emerged from their first two months of schooling by internet knowing less than when they started.


France has been the most determined of any European country not to let schools close, arguing that the risks to educational attainment and social cohesion are greater than those to public health. Last spring President Emmanuel Macron overrode advice from epidemiologists and ordered schools reopened. They have stayed that way, though since November most high schools have worked in shifts. Germany closed its schools from December 16th until at least February 15th. Its state governments would like to start reopening them, but Chancellor Angela Merkel wants to wait until covid-19 caseloads fall by half from current levels. Northern Europe has roughly followed the German pattern (apart from contrarian Sweden, which closed only briefly in January).


In southern Europe closures have been less widespread. Spanish schools have stayed open since the autumn, though most high schools use some distance-learning. Some 35,000-40,000 new teachers and assistants have been hired to reduce class sizes. In Italy primary schooling has not been interrupted. High schools, shut in November, have reopened for most classes. Both countries have struggled with remote classrooms, thanks to dodgy internet connections and a lack of computers among poorer pupils.


Similar tech problems plague the continent’s poorer east. Nevertheless, the closures there have been stricter. In Poland schools have been shut since late October; schools for those aged up to eight reopened on January 18th. A survey of Polish teachers last summer found that most knew of pupils who had not turned up since instruction went online. Romania’s schools were shut almost continuously from March until they reopened on February 8th, yet more than a quarter of the country’s children are not equipped for online education, according to Save the Children, a charity. By January the government had distributed around 250,000 tablets, but said 287,000 more students still needed one.


Many experts worry about the emotional and developmental damage of lockdowns. But the data are ambiguous. A survey of Dutch social workers last year found that emotional neglect of the children they were responsible for was much more common than in the same period in 2017. But even though some children report less affection from their families, others say they are getting more, including a rise in hugs. Others worry about working parents forced to stay at home to care for children. About 150,000 Polish women have dropped out of the labour force since last March, says Piotr Lewandowski, an economist.


One issue has been what to do about Europe’s all-important national examinations. Germany is pressing ahead with the Abitur to ensure that this year’s graduates get equal respect. Dutch high schools have stayed open for students in their final year before the eindexamen. In France, the dreaded four-hour baccalauréat exams have been cancelled, apart from bits the country considers essential: French literature, the final oral exam and, of course, the written exam in philosophy.


At least the gravity of the threat to education has sunk in. Austria, Denmark and the Netherlands reopened their primary schools on February 8th; Romania reopened primary and most high schools as well. The question is what governments will do if infection rates rise in the spring: close schools again, or find other painful measures (such as curfews or bans on house visits) to compensate for keeping children in class. 


Arthur schopenhauer owned a succession of pet poodles. Franz Kafka maintained that “all knowledge, the totality of all questions and all answers is contained in the dog.” Frederick the Great exclaimed: “The more I see of men, the better I like my dog.” Pets have been deeply embedded in Germanic culture for centuries, but never more so than now. As people seek a cure for covid-induced solitude and angst, demand has surged for dogs, budgies, snakes and even cats.


The German Kennel Club says dog sales increased by 20% in 2020. Prices for puppies sold on pets4homes, Britain’s largest online ad site for pets, more than doubled. A Yorkshire terrier pup can set you back £1,500 ($2,050), and some breeds cost twice that. Some dogs are no doubt enjoying the pandemic, since their owners are always home. Many are being pampered. The share price of Chewy, an online pet-supplies store, rose by more than 260% in 2020 as owners splurged on posh toys and organic food. Zoo Zajac, a huge pet shop based in Duisburg, says January was probably the best month in its 45-year existence.


Soaring profits, alas, attract crooks. The unspeakable crime of “dognapping” is on the rise. Pedigree pooches are preferred. The German Animal Welfare Federation (dtb) registered 75 illegal trades between January and October last year, more than in all of 2019, involving more than 800 animals (mainly dogs). The true number is surely much higher. Many take place online and are hard to spot. Puppy farms are mass-producing dogs, often in poor conditions. Thomas Schröder of the dtb demands a ban on the online sale of animals. Other activists argue that the internet helps find good homes for many pets, though they advocate stricter regulation of online sales.


When covid-19 eventually recedes, animal shelters expect another problem. Some new owners will tire of their lockdown pets and want to return them. Others will go back to work and find they have no time to look after them. Europe’s biggest animal shelter, in Berlin, which is the size of 22 football pitches and houses some 1,300 animals, including apes and a pig called Tinkerbell, is bracing for a post-pandemic crush.
MARIO DRAGHI, the former president of the European Central Bank, is due to be sworn in as Italy’s prime minister on February 13th. He will head a cabinet that gives all but one of his country’s main parties a stake in his new government. Announcing his line-up on the evening of February 12th, Mr Draghi allotted 15 of the 24 seats around his cabinet table to politicians from a governing majority of prodigious breadth that will range from the nativist right to the radical left.


The remaining nine jobs went to independents. In one of his most striking appointments, he called in the former boss of Vodafone, Vittorio Colao, to head a new ministry of technological innovation and digital transition. Mr Draghi’s government will come into office with the task of allocating around €200bn ($240bn) from the EU’s recovery funds and Mr Colao’s nomination chimes with Brussels’s emphasis on using the cash to shape a “smarter” Europe. The European Commission also wants to see significant investment in environmental projects. To that end, Mr Draghi created a second new ministry—of ecological transition—and named another independent, a physicist, Roberto Cingolani, to head it. As his finance minister, he chose a long-standing associate, Daniele Franco, the deputy governor of the Bank of Italy.


Unexpectedly, Mr Draghi retained no fewer than nine members of Giuseppe Conte’s departing government, including Roberto Speranza, the health minister. Mr Speranza will have the key task of speeding up Italy’s vaccination programme. The Five Star Movement (M5S) will have the largest contingent, with four ministers including Luigi Di Maio, who stays on as foreign minister. Though the Five Stars’ popularity has waned since the 2018 general election, it remains the biggest party in parliament.


The composition of Mr Draghi’s cabinet appeared to be a first attempt to solve the problems inherent in a governing majority that will be hard put to agree on anything, let alone the controversial structural reforms the European Commission wants to see implemented as the EU’s largesse is disbursed.


Among the main parties, only the far-right Brothers of Italy party declined the chance to climb aboard the bandwagon of “Super Mario”—the man widely credited with having saved the euro from catastrophe in 2012. The ideologically variegated M5S only gave its approval following an online ballot of members (a lukewarm 59% voted in favour of Mr Draghi). Even the hard-right Northern League hastily renounced its Euroscepticism to book a place in Italy’s next parliamentary majority. The standard bearer of its less populist wing, Giancarlo Giorgetti, was given a key post as business minister.


The new government faces both a daunting challenge and a unique opportunity. The challenge is to cope with the effects of covid-19 in a country hard hit by the virus; Italy is fourth in the EU in deaths relative to population. Its economy shrank by 8.8% last year, compared with 5% in Germany. If a ban on sackings is lifted at the end of March, an estimated 250,000 more people will be dumped onto the labour market. Mr Draghi’s opportunity, though, is to use the recovery funds to start reversing two decades of economic decline. Even before the pandemic, Italians’ real GDP per person was lower than at the start of the century. Behind that woeful performance lies an array of obstacles to growth, held firmly in place by vested interests.


In consultations with the various parties, Mr Draghi has hinted at how he intends to deal with both the challenge and the opportunity. The priority areas he indicated were health, education (he has suggested that the school year be extended to allow students to catch up); the protection of individuals and enterprises from the effects of the pandemic; and the environment (which squares not only with the priorities of the commission but also those of the M5S). According to politicians who spoke to the prime minister-designate in consultations over recent days, his targets for reform include the tax regime, a slow, unpredictable civil-justice system that discourages both domestic enterprise and foreign investment, and Italy’s stultifying bureaucracy. To shake it up, Mr Draghi has called on Renato Brunetta, a leading member of Silvio Berlusconi’s Forza Italia party, who made a determined, but highly controversial, effort to reform the public sector as a minister in the TV magnate’s 2008-11 government.


An early question that arises is how Mr Draghi’s long-term aims can be reconciled with the EU’s exacting deadlines and—a point largely overlooked in the euphoria surrounding his appointment—the short life expectancy of his government. Contracts for 70% of the recovery funds must be awarded and signed by the end of 2022 and the remainder committed within the following year. In the meantime, a general election must be held by early 2023. But, given the parties’ aversion to winter campaigning, it is more likely to happen in the first half of next year. Mr Draghi may want to step down even sooner if he is to run for president in a separate election due in February 2022. “I think he’ll set a working method for the next government,” says Veronica De Romanis, who teaches European economics at LUISS, a university in Rome.


A second question is how much unpopularity Mr Draghi is prepared to risk. When the outgoing government suggested a longer school year, it prompted an outcry from the unions. Tax reform usually favours some parts of society at the expense of others. And Mr Draghi’s approach to safeguarding enterprises may also prove controversial. Last year he co-chaired a working group of the Group of Thirty, an informal body of bankers and officials, that looked at how to restore the corporate sector after the pandemic. It concluded that governments should focus on supporting viable firms and managing the pace of what his co-chair called “the needed creative destruction”.


Mr Draghi is popular. But Italy’s electorate and parliament are notoriously fickle. “If he starts immediately with these reforms we have been speaking about for 20 years, he will have a chance of success,” says Giuliano Noci, professor of strategy and marketing at Milan’s Politecnico University. “But if he waits for more than a month, the sentiment will change.”
Squadrons of armed policemen block the entrance. Metal barriers line the avenue leading up to the campus. Snipers occasionally emerge on nearby rooftops. Bogazici University has long been considered one of Turkey’s most prestigious. Today it resembles a besieged terrorist hideout.


That, believe it or not, is how Turkey’s president, Recep Tayyip Erdogan, sees it. On February 1st police stormed the campus and detained dozens of students who were protesting about his appointment of a government loyalist as their rector. The protests have taken place regularly for over a month. They escalated after the arrest of four students who had organised an art show that included a rainbow flag alongside an image of the Kaaba, the black cube at the heart of Mecca. Turkey’s interior minister called the students “lgbt perverts”. Mr Erdogan compared the protesters (at least 600 of whom have been detained) to terrorists. “There is no such thing as lgbt,” he said on February 3rd. (Why he is so upset about something he doesn’t think exists remains a mystery.)


Mr Erdogan tends to inflame protests. He often depicts them as part of an existential struggle between pious and secular, conservative and degenerate, patriotic and foreign—and crushes them. This tactic worked in 2013, when a small protest in defence of a small park snowballed into countrywide demonstrations after Mr Erdogan referred to the protesters as looters and had them sprayed with tear-gas and rubber bullets. Dozens were later rounded up and indicted on coup charges.


Mr Erdogan is doing something similar today, while attempting to seize control of Bogazici, a rare bastion of liberalism in a country increasingly under the sway of nationalists and Islamists. Sexual minorities make a perfect target. Homophobia in Turkey is a chronic condition. With the exception of the country’s main Kurdish party, no political group in Turkey has embraced lgbt rights, out of both conviction and fear of a conservative backlash.


After an abortive coup in 2016, Mr Erdogan redoubled his attempts to bring education into line with his vision of a more pious, prouder Turkey, a country looking inward rather than westward. Under an emergency law, he sacked over a thousand academics accused of terrorist sympathies (with scant evidence) and gave himself the power to appoint university rectors. His choice of Melih Bulu, a longtime member of the ruling party, as Bogazici’s president, has gone down particularly badly. Since being parachuted in, Mr Bulu has had to contend with claims that he plagiarised parts of his dissertation. Condoning the arrests of hundreds of his students has not made him popular on campus.


Once again, Turkey’s president has deliberately turned a local crisis into a national one. Once again, he seems poised to prevail through a combination of division, intimidation and force. But all this comes at a price. In a poll published last year, over 62% of young people in Turkey said they would prefer to live abroad if they had the means. If the country’s best and brightest start leaving, Mr Erdogan will have no one to blame but himself. 
When robert conquest, a historian, was working on a new edition of “The Great Terror”, his seminal text on Stalin’s crimes, he was told to come up with a new title. The book had described the horrors of the Soviet Union at a time when apologism for it was still rife. By the time of the new version, freshly opened archives had vindicated Conquest’s account. His friend Kingsley Amis, a novelist, suggested a pithy new title: “I told you so, you fucking fools”.


Head east in Europe today and it is easy to find similar sentiments about Russia. The Baltic states and Poland warned Josep Borrell, the eu’s foreign-policy chief, against visiting Moscow in the wake of its imprisonment of Alexei Navalny, Russia’s leading opposition politician. They were right. Mr Borrell was humiliated. In a press conference Sergey Lavrov, the Russian foreign minister, dismissed the eu as an “unreliable partner”, while Mr Borrell stood alongside. European hypocrisy was mocked as he brought up the treatment of Catalan politicians by Spanish authorities, knowing that Mr Borrell is a staunch opponent of independence for the region. Mr Borrell did not even insist on visiting Mr Navalny in jail. While he was there, news leaked that the Russian government had expelled diplomats from Germany, Poland and Sweden for attending pro-Navalny rallies. Diplomats from eastern Europe may be politer than Amis, but the message is the same.


Dealing with Russia is the most pressing foreign-policy problem facing the eu. It is also where the bloc is least coherent. While national capitals may not always agree on how best to handle China or how close to remain to America, on Russia they are hopelessly split. Russia can be a potential or even necessary ally, a business opportunity or an existential threat, depending on whether you are in Paris, Berlin or Warsaw. The notion of an eu foreign policy is flimsy at the best of times, but especially on this topic. “Everybody knows that the big boys freelance on anything that matters,” says Radek Sikorski, a Polish mep and former foreign minister. And Russia is among the things that matter most.


Doveish attitudes are based on pragmatism, pessimism and cynicism. France puts its accommodating strategy down to culture and geography: Russia is too large to push around and too near to ignore. It emphasises patience and engagement—a tactic its critics label “doing nothing”. When it comes to Russia, Emmanuel Macron, the French president, talks in terms of decades, and doubts whether tough action would do much good. Whereas such remarks may be wise from a policy wonk, they are less comforting coming from the mouth of the eu’s only hard power.


In Germany economics trumps geopolitics. Nord Stream 2, a pipeline running from Russia to Germany, undercuts the eu’s wider strategy of trying to rely less on Russia for energy but retains the support of the German government. (The fact that Gerhard Schröder, a former German chancellor, is the chairman of the scheme does not help.) Angela Merkel surprised critics by shepherding through—and sticking with—sanctions on Russia over its actions in Ukraine. Yet she is soon to leave office. Armin Laschet, the new leader of her Christian Democratic Union, is more doveish. Even direct attacks, such as Russian hackers breaking into the Bundestag’s computers in 2015, failed to budge opinion. Unfortunately for the eu’s band of eastern hawks, France and Germany are not alone. Spain and Italy, the eu’s other big countries, are similarly meek when it comes to Russia.


Each approach shares an assumption that there is not much the eu can do about Russia. But the eu forgets its power. It is a bloc of 450m people with a gdp that is nine times larger than that of its Russian neighbour; Russia’s economy is slightly larger than Spain’s and smaller than Italy’s. Collectively, eu countries spend almost three times as much as Russia on defence. Just France and Germany together spend roughly two-thirds more. Yet when dealing with Russia, the eu behaves like a supplicant. What Russia lacks in relative means, it makes up for in motivation: from the Sahel to Belarus, Russia is an enthusiastic troll, causing no end of trouble for the bloc. European governments have the tools to take a firmer line with Russia, whether sanctions on those close to Mr Putin, or scrapping Nord Stream 2. What they lack is the will to use them. In one multilingual intervention, Assita Kanko, a Belgian mep, asked of Mr Borrell: “Dónde están los cojones de la ue?”


When doves cry
The ill-fated Moscow trip caps off a period in which Russia’s gangsterism has become impossible to ignore. Until recently, it was possible to argue that it was open to a constructive relationship with Europe. Now it is not. Sanctions require the unanimous support of all governments, which is tricky, even with new eu legislation that makes it easier to punish human-rights abusers. But such measures are more likely thanks to Russia’s recent actions. “Russia is usually its own worst enemy,” says one official from an eastern country.


This clarity leaves Europe’s doves in a bind. Their vision of a better relationship with Russia, working together on matters like climate, is appealing. In this world, Russia could be a well-behaved g8 member. Unfortunately, that Russia does not exist. Instead, European powers face a government that tries to murder its opponents, stokes proxy wars and hacks its neighbours. It is a country that deliberately chooses confrontation rather than partnership, and the eu—both its national capitals and its institutions—must recognise this.


The real Russia is much closer to the way it is described by the eu’s eastern countries than to the benign image conjured up by western ones. No one can force Mr Macron to give up his hope that Russia will eventually be a partner. Likewise, no one can force German politicians to take a short-term economic hit for geopolitical gain. But they cannot say they were not told. 
In february 2016, just 14 months before the most recent French presidential election, not a single opinion poll of potential candidates bothered to test the name Emmanuel Macron. Weak party allegiances, anti-establishment distrust, a bold campaign—and a generous dose of luck—carried the electoral novice from nowhere to the presidency in record time. As France now turns its mind to the presidential contest in 2022, all polls and predictions therefore deserve caution. Yet the contours of the next campaign are beginning to emerge, and they present a peculiar challenge to Mr Macron as he thinks ahead to his re-election bid.


Two new polls suggest that 2022 will bring a repeat of the run-off between the centrist Mr Macron and the nationalist Marine Le Pen. But each also points to a far tighter race than in 2017, when Mr Macron beat Ms Le Pen squarely by 66% to 34%. One poll reduces the sitting president’s margin to 12 points. The other gives him an even narrower victory of 52% to 48%. The French, prone to malaise even in good times, give little credit to their president and are feeling anxious: about a possible third lockdown, the spread of le variant anglais, the reliability (and now the availability) of vaccines, the well-being of the young, and the livelihoods of all those furloughed chefs and waiters who sustain the French art de vivre.


Apprehension, as well as disease control, has bred a politics of reassurance and caution. Whereas once Mr Macron stood in an army tent and declared war on the virus, covid-19’s long effect on politics has been to emphasise protection. He promised to do “whatever it costs” to save jobs and lives. His government maintains a generous furlough system for millions of employees, as well as loans and grants to keep businesses afloat. It is shielding its supermarkets from foreign predators, has raised health workers’ salaries and has all but shelved its controversial pension reform. A nightly national curfew has been in place since mid-December. Even France’s glacial vaccine roll-out is justified as a measure to build trust in a vaccine-sceptical country; Britain’s approach, said a minister, carries “enormous risks”.




Such prudence may be justified by the pandemic, and in many ways matches the new global orthodoxy. Yet the broader message also works against Mr Macron’s reflexes, and what he stood for during his bid for the presidency in 2017. The candidate’s campaign then was based on an attempt both to free up initiative and risk-taking, and to build a modern system of rules and protections to encourage this to happen. Mr Macron’s defiant, disruptive side—reforms to the labour market, schools, training, the railways and taxes—marked his initial years in office. Covid-19 is crushing this flat.


“In all our societies the pandemic is leading us to protect more; that’s normal,” Mr Macron told The Economist at a recent meeting with foreign reporters, arguing that if he had not carried out his liberalising reforms before the pandemic the country would be less well placed to finance protection today. The recovery plan based on common European Union borrowing is, he pointed out, oriented towards investments that “build the future, and not from a perspective of protection”. But Mr Macron does not deny that the balance has shifted: “Two years ago I was told, ‘You are freeing up more than you are protecting’; today I am told, ‘You are protecting more than you are freeing up.’”


This poses a particular challenge in France, a country that has long had a strong central state and that has tended to long spells of conservatism interrupted by bursts of rebellion, some of them rather dramatic. Protection is in some ways the country’s default mode, and that mindset can be hard to alter. Mathieu Laine, a liberal writer and the author of a new book, “Infantilisation”, argues that the French state is now acting to entrench a dangerous form of risk aversion. All those rules and forms devised by overzealous bureaucrats during the pandemic—no more than one hour of exercise a day, at no more than one kilometre from home—are teaching people, he says, how to “unlearn what it means to exercise freedoms”.


It may yet be that this shift towards the politics of protection could in fact provide Mr Macron, a former investment banker, with a form of defence. The most disillusioned of his former supporters are on the left. Last year he lost his absolute parliamentary majority when a group of left-leaning deputies quit his party, La République en Marche. Instead of a nod in their direction, he then replaced one centre-right prime minister (Edouard Philippe) with another (Jean Castex). Some inside the party now want Mr Macron to tilt towards the left to recover such voters. If faced with another second-round choice between him or Ms Le Pen, they might otherwise abstain. Polls suggest that this is part of the reason for the closer run-off gap.


The chances are that Mr Macron, whose adage is en même temps (at the same time), will seek to forge a fresh balance in the run-up to 2022. He has shown that he is still ready to take risks, says one of his presidential aides, by keeping schools open since last May, and refusing—against scientific and ministerial advice—to put France into a third lockdown right away. Partly as a result, his poll rating among the young has risen 11 points in three months. For now, his greatest asset is that no single credible alternative candidate has yet emerged, on either the left or the right. But these are uncertain times. And nobody knows more about the volatility of electoral politics than the former outsider whom polls overlooked, Mr Macron. 
When the Goteborg Film Festival offered the chance for a film fan to spend seven days alone on an island, with only 60 films for company, the organisers weren’t sure if anyone would want to apply. The pandemic has been isolating enough, even for Swedes, who have yet to lock down like other Europeans. The lucky winner would not be able to bring a phone or contact friends and family during a week of stormy seas and dark Swedish winter. No one was expecting that the festival would get over 12,000 applications from 45 countries.


The chosen castaway, a pink-haired Swedish nurse called Lisa Enroth, has been on Hamneskar island, 37km north-west of Gothenburg (as it is spelt in English), since January 31st. Sending her by boat to an “isolated cinema” was the best way to carry on the festival this year, says its chief organiser, Mirja Wester. A single person watching films cannot spread the virus (unlike the 160,000 at last year’s event). The solitary experience is also in keeping with how millions have watched movies of late. And like the lighthouse that towers over the island, streamed and downloaded films shine a ray of hope.


Still, some films are not meant to be watched alone. By day three, Ms Enroth was already rueing her lack of friends and wine. “I should have had someone there to cling onto,” she said in a video diary after watching “The Macaluso Sisters”, a tragic Italian drama. She confessed to having “started talking to the stove”. It is easy to understand how she feels, alone on a rocky outpost. Yet such sentiments have long been common all over Sweden. Half of Swedish households are single-person ones.


When lighthouse-keepers first came to Hamneskar, no one thought they could survive long in such desolation. Ms Enroth’s prospects are rosier. A psychiatrist is on standby in case she starts to struggle. And for an emergency nurse whose energy has been drained by the pandemic, solitude may even be a relief.
Judging by the security measures, you would have thought Moscow was experiencing a terrorist attack. Police in riot gear surrounded the capital’s main court and blocked the approaches. Muscovites suspected of being protesters were whisked away and bundled into police vans. By lunchtime 350 people, including journalists, had been detained, adding to nearly 2,000 arrested during protests two days earlier. Jails and detention centres filled up so fast that many demonstrators were held in police vans in freezing temperatures without food or water for up to 40 hours.


The reason for the mass arrests was Alexei Navalny, Russia’s opposition leader, who had returned last month from Germany, where he had been treated for poisoning, ordered, he says, by President Vladimir Putin himself. On February 2nd Mr Navalny was put in a glass cage inside the Moscow court and sentenced to nearly three years in prison. This converted the original, suspended, sentence handed down in 2014 into a trumped-up case designed to stop him from standing for election. The European Court of Human Rights in Strasbourg had previously exonerated him of that charge and made Russia pay him compensation.


The latest proceeding was a mockery of the law. Mr Navalny denounced it as “one man’s hatred and fear…I mortally offended [Mr Putin] by surviving. And then I committed an even more serious offence: I didn’t run and hide.” Worse still, Mr Navalny had revealed that Russia’s Federal Security Service (fsb) had smeared his underpants with Novichok, a toxin. Mr Putin would go down in history not as a global statesman but as “Vladimir the Underpants Poisoner”, said Mr Navalny. His speech, blanked out by state television, was broadcast by tv Rain, an independent internet channel, and watched by nearly 9m people on YouTube. Within minutes of the sentencing, Mr Navalny’s team had called people out onto the streets.


Taking no chances, riot police closed metro stations and took over the main squares and crossroads. Videos that spread instantly on social media showed small groups of mostly young and peaceful Muscovites walking through the centre chanting “Navalny” and being shoved into side streets where they were beaten.


The poisoning of Mr Navalny made it clear that the fsb, rather than the civilian technocrats who were once responsible for domestic politics, are now dominant, says Alexei Venediktov of Echo Moskvy, an independent radio station. “They describe Navalny as ‘the engine’ and ‘the banner’ of the protest movement.” Locking him up will disable the engine, they reckon.


They also plan to sully the banner by portraying Mr Navalny as a foreign agent planted by the West to overthrow Mr Putin’s regime. They cite the protests by democratic countries, including America, Britain and Germany, and the attendance of their ambassadors at Mr Navalny’s sentencing, as proof of its determination to hobble Russia. Mr Navalny’s call for sanctions against Mr Putin’s friends could bring a new charge of treason that carries a sentence of up to 20 years. Prosecutors are also working on a new fraud case, alleging that Mr Navalny has stolen donations to his own anti-corruption foundation.


Yet by unleashing violence against peaceful protesters, the Kremlin is helping Mr Navalny in his main task: undermining Mr Putin’s legitimacy. The president is clearly rattled by Mr Navalny’s bold return and his explosive two-hour video, which was watched by 100m people, showing a vast secret palace allegedly belonging to Mr Putin. The president is now trusted by only 29% of the population, says a recent poll by the Levada Centre, a fall of 20 percentage points since he was re-elected in 2018. For this, blame corruption, a stagnant economy and a shift in media consumption. Mr Putin dominates state tv. But most Russians under the age of 40 get their news and views from the internet, where Mr Navalny is strong. The Kremlin would like his sentencing to display its limitless power. In fact it, enhances Mr Navalny’s moral stature at Mr Putin’s expense. 
At the end of December, a smiling Ursula von der Leyen appeared in front of a camera to hail the beginning of the eu’s vaccination programme. The president of the European Commission boasted that from Sofia to Helsinki Europeans were being jabbed with drugs bought collectively and then divvied up by the commission. It was, she beamed, “a touching moment of unity and a European success story”. A month later, the smiles have vanished. The eu has vaccinated a much smaller proportion of its people than America, Britain or Israel has done. The programme has been dogged by a lack of doses and clunky roll-outs. Supply problems hit when AstraZeneca, an Anglo-Swedish drug firm, warned that it would provide less than half of the 80m doses it had pledged to the eu in the first quarter of the year. A touching moment has become a tortuous one and the blame game has begun. Where does the responsibility lie?


Start with the body Mrs von der Leyen heads: the commission. It took months to sign contracts for covid-19 vaccines, something that could have been done in weeks. Shrugging off liability—ensuring that the drug firms were on the hook should anything go wrong—was prioritised over speedy delivery. The row with AstraZeneca was badly handled. In a mix of institutional panic and fury, Mrs von der Leyen demanded export controls on any vaccines heading out of the eu. This threat of a blockade led to concern from Tokyo to Ottawa, rather undermining the eu’s claim to be the doughtiest defender of the rules-based trading system. A plan to block exports to Northern Ireland using a mechanism in the Brexit deal that is widely seen as a nuclear option was revealed and then dropped via a midnight press release. To cap it all, while trying to apologise for blundering into Northern Ireland’s conflict between Protestants and Catholics, the commission’s spokesman uttered a world-class gaffe: “Only the pope is infallible.”


But no one forced national governments to put the commission in charge. Legally, eu institutions have barely any responsibility for the health care of the continent’s citizens, which is left to national governments. Rather than deal with the tricky politics of some eu countries buying more vaccines than others, governments outsourced the job to the commission. Commission negotiators, used to arguing over simpler things like beef quotas in trade deals, were tasked with dealing with makers of novel pharmaceuticals. Reshuffling institutional responsibilities while in the middle of a crisis is risky, yet surprisingly normal in the eu. The job of overseeing a project costing €2.7bn ($3.35bn) to vaccinate 450m people was handed to a department whose main previous concern was food labelling—all at the behest of national capitals.


Mrs von der Leyen’s clumsy handling of the crisis casts the spotlight on the national leaders who gave her the job in the first place. Picking the European Commission president is not a meritocratic process. Mrs von der Leyen, who was having a rough patch as German defence minister at the time, ended up with the job because she raised the fewest objections, rather than due to wild support among leaders. Convenience trumps track records when it comes to divvying out top jobs in the eu. (And explains why three of the past four prime ministers of Luxembourg—a country of 600,000—have led the commission, among the biggest roles in Europe.) Ultimately, the last thing the eu’s 27 heads of government want is someone with too much ambition or political star power in the role. After all, the eu’s treaties are littered with unused tools that could reshape the continent in the hands of someone with the right mix of political nous and ambition. By contrast, Mrs von der Leyen’s main qualification for the job was an expectation that she would do what she was told by her main backers, who include Emmanuel Macron, the French president, and Angela Merkel, her former boss. After the past few weeks’ performance, leaders may wish they had opted for other qualities.


In the EU, no one can hear you scream
When it comes to complaining about the eu’s management, avenues of dissent are limited. A typical government has opposition parties waiting on the sidelines, loudly explaining why it is bad and why they would do much better. In Brussels, there is no such public political competition. The commission can be kicked out if meps so choose, but the European Parliament—the main democratic organ of the eu—is weak. Schemes to turn the club into something resembling a parliamentary democracy, with the commission president chosen on the basis of election results, were shelved in favour of the private haggling between leaders that resulted in Mrs von der Leyen’s selection. Lawmakers spinelessly played along. The result is that opposition is left to fringe parties with the teleological belief that the eu will, at some point, implode. Attacks on the current management are cast as opposition to the whole project, argues Hans Kundnani of Chatham House, a think-tank in London. This makes for an unhealthy political scene, where criticism is regarded as illegitimate, and anything short of outright collapse is seen as vindication.


And thus, complaints about the vaccination programme have been overridden. Rather than apologising to voters for the fact that European pensioners are less protected than American, British or Israeli ones, the eu reminds them that things could be much worse. In this telling, purchasing collectively has enabled eu countries to avoid fighting each other over scarce supplies. Other countries took risks by more quickly approving the very drugs that will be injected into European arms, runs another defence. A noble intention is, apparently, enough to forgive faulty execution. Mrs Merkel summed up this attitude on the vaccine roll-out in an interview: “On the whole, nothing went wrong.” When it comes to the eu, voters are left in a no-man’s land, unsure how to air their anger, where to aim it or even if they should be upset at all. For a democratic club, this is not a healthy place to be. 
In certain countries, when the politicians are considered to have failed, it is time for an unsmiling general to appear on television to announce he has seized power. In Italy, the procedure is more benign: a man in a well-cut suit, usually one with a successful career as a central banker behind him, is called to the presidential palace to get the nod.


On February 3rd just such a man, Mario Draghi, arrived at the palace on the Quirinal hill to be asked by the president, Sergio Mattarella, to head a new government. Mr Draghi accepted, conditional on the support of a parliamentary majority. Mr Mattarella called in the former boss of the European Central Bank after Matteo Renzi’s Italia Viva group torpedoed hopes of a deal between the parties that had supported the outgoing prime minister, Giuseppe Conte, and his left-leaning coalition.


Markets rejoiced. The Milan bourse leapt nearly 3% at the opening. The yield gap between Italian and German government bonds, which widens as doubts grow about Italy’s ability to repay its vast debts, shrank by 8% to just over 100 basis points.


The reaction was understandable. As Mr Draghi noted, with bankerly understatement, Italy faces a difficult moment. Not only is it in the midst of a pandemic; in March, a ban on firings is due to be lifted, unleashing a wave of job losses. And by the end of April, the government has to agree on how to spend more than €200bn ($240bn, or 4.3% of gdp) in grants and loans from the eu’s recovery fund; the grants alone are more than half what in real terms it got from the Marshall Plan after the second world war. Other member states want it to use the money in a way that reverses two decades of dismally low growth that has threatened the stability of the eu’s single currency. Few are better equipped to tackle the economic challenge than “Super Mario”, the man whose decisive action saved the euro in 2012.




The outcome of the crisis that erupted when Mr Conte resigned on January 26th represents a triumph for Mr Renzi, himself a former prime minister. He has brought down a coalition whose policies, including its plans for the allocation of the eu’s funds, he increasingly deplored. He has unseated a popular prime minister who threatened to challenge him in the middle ground of politics. And both outcomes have been achieved without an election that could have destroyed Mr Renzi’s tiny party. Italia Viva had enough seats in parliament to have been crucial to Mr Conte’s majority, but polls suggest it now has the support of less than 3% of the electorate.


Mr Renzi’s victory was scarcely a win for Italian democracy, however. Something is wrong in a country where a party as tiny as his can oust a government, let alone one that has had as frequent recourse as Italy in the past 30 years to political outsiders.


The first was Carlo Azeglio Ciampi—like Mr Draghi, a former governor of the Bank of Italy. Mr Ciampi took office in 1993 as the country’s post-war order, dominated by Christian Democrats and Communists, was falling apart. He remained at the helm until an election the following year. But after the winner of that election, Silvio Berlusconi, was ousted in 1995, another Bank of Italy alumnus, Lamberto Dini, was tapped to head a government composed mostly of technocrats like himself. The country’s next existential trauma, an effect and a cause of the wider euro crisis, wafted a former European commissioner, Mario Monti, to power in 2011. Then, after the 2018 elections, when the leaders of the hard-right Northern League and the anti-establishment Five Star Movement (m5s) were unable to agree on who should get the top job, they gave it to Mr Conte, an obscure law professor. He survived to lead a second government that yoked the m5s to the centre-left Democratic Party (pd).


The alternative to a technocratic prime minister, and the normal response in most democracies, is the ballot box. Mr Mattarella argued, with some justification, that the challenges facing Italy are too urgent to allow for an early vote. But, in doing so, he highlighted another shortcoming: Italy’s cumbersome procedures for transferring power. The president recalled that it had taken five months to install a government in 2018 and four months in 2013.


Mr Mattarella says he wants a high-profile administration that “ought not be identified with any one political formula”. That does not necessarily mean the next cabinet should be purely technocratic. Italy’s non-party prime ministers have not all headed non-party governments: Mr Ciampi’s cabinet and Mr Conte’s two governments were made up of politicians.


All, however, have suffered from two shared weaknesses. Their leaders have been new to the roughhouse of Italian domestic politics. And, however technocratic, they have depended for their survival on the goodwill of politicians in what are often ill-assorted parliamentary coalitions.


The first signs were that Mr Draghi could win the support of Italia Viva, the pd and Mr Berlusconi’s Forza Italia, but that he faced opposition from the m5s and from the two most radical groups in parliament: the Free and Equal party on the left and the Brothers of Italy on the right. It was unclear whether the League would back him explicitly, or implicitly by means of abstention. But Mr Draghi risks finding himself dependent on the support of two parties, the pd and the League, with fundamentally different ideas on how best to govern Italy. It is a problem with which his technocratic predecessors became wearily familiar and one that helps to explain the brevity of their governments. On average they lasted for a year and four months. 
In the chill waters off Bornholm, a Danish island in the Baltic sea, a complex game of cat-and-mouse is playing out. A flotilla of Russian boats is rushing to complete the construction of Nord Stream 2, a 1,230km (765-mile) gas pipeline that would double capacity from Russia to Germany. Less than 150km of it remains to be built. Meanwhile, the American government, armed with sanctions legislation, is picking off companies it suspects of involvement. As the saga enters its endgame, the pipeline’s fate may depend on the outcome of this race.


Nord Stream 2 has inspired criticism ever since 2015, when Gazprom, Russia’s state-backed gas giant, and five European energy firms formed a consortium to lay a new pipeline costing €9.5bn ($11bn) next to an existing one along the Baltic seabed. American opposition, grounded in concerns that the new pipe will expand the Kremlin’s influence, is bipartisan. Eastern Europeans, as well as France, fear growing dependence on Russian energy—and depriving Ukraine, from which Russia has gobbled territory, of transit fees from an existing land pipeline. Attitudes in Brussels range from concern to bitter opposition.


Germans who value these opinions wonder why their politicians insist on ploughing ahead in splendid isolation. Yet Angela Merkel’s government has long sought to insulate the pipeline from diplomatic rows. Challenged after the recent detention in Moscow of Alexei Navalny, a Russian dissident, Mrs Merkel said she had not changed her mind on the pipeline. To circumvent American sanctions, the government of Mecklenburg-West Pomerania, a rural German state where the pipeline makes landfall, has set up a foundation, funded mainly by Gazprom, to mediate between Nord Stream 2 and private contractors—in the name, risibly, of “climate protection”. (Genuine greens are appalled.)


Yet not only does that ploy look doomed, America’s dogged efforts to kill the pipe are bearing fruit. Congress has passed two sets of sanctions aimed at it. In December 2019 the mere threat forced Allseas, a Swiss undersea construction firm, to pull its vessels from the project, halting construction for a year and costing Gazprom a fortune. Many other international companies have been scared off.


Russian ships eventually restarted work in December. But the heat continues to rise. On January 19th the American government made good on its threats for the first time, slapping sanctions on Fortuna, a Russian vessel repurposed for pipe-laying. A few weeks earlier Congress passed an amendment to a different sanctions law, passed in 2019. By radically expanding the set of companies now exposed to American action to include insurers, certifiers and any entity supporting “pipe-laying activities”, the new law is a “game-changer”, says Mateusz Kubiak of Esperis, a Polish consultancy. Russian assets may eventually be able to finish the pipe-laying, he says. But certification, a technical exercise to show the pipeline meets international safety and design standards, “cannot be simply transferred to some murky Russian company.”


What now? The aggressive sanctions policy of the Trump administration unsettled even stalwart foes of Nord Stream 2 in Europe. Joe Biden is keen to rebuild America’s tattered alliances, but his team also opposes the pipeline. Optimists think the most recent sanctions legislation could offer a way out. The sanctions are mandatory, limiting the White House’s room for manoeuvre. But as Dan Fried, a sanctions co-ordinator at the State Department in the Obama administration, notes, the text also lowers the bar for the president to waive the sanctions. “It’s a hint that Congress wants a deal,” he says. Mr Biden’s team has indicated that it is open to suggestions.


What might a deal look like? One idea is an automatic mechanism to impose sanctions on Gazprom should the Kremlin renege on a deal brokered by Mrs Merkel in 2019 to keep gas flowing across Ukraine. This could form part of a grand bargain in which America drops its sanctions in exchange for German commitments to bolster energy- and other forms of security in eastern Europe. But Germany would need not only to signal interest in such ideas, but to pause support for the pipe. And officials in Berlin fear hardliners in Congress may tie Mr Biden’s hands. The diplomatic stalemate, then, may drag on. Meanwhile, the delicate dance in the Baltic continues. 
THE TIDE came from the west. Last August mass protests broke out in Belarus, a former Soviet republic ruled by an ageing dictator, Alexander Lukashenko. Russian opposition leaders watched excitedly as tens of thousands of their Slavic neighbours took to the streets, week after week. The Kremlin was watching too, anxiously. Both sides knew that events in Belarus might be the prelude to what happens in Russia, where an increasingly autocratic Vladimir Putin has been in power for more than two decades. On January 31st, for the second weekend running, large protests broke out across Russia. More than 5,000 people were reported to have been arrested in the latest demonstrations triggered by the arrest of the opposition leader, Alexei Navalny, and his investigation of Mr Putin’s corrupt system of governance.


Paradoxically, the unrest may have been precipitated by the Kremlin’s attempt to avert a Belarus-style uprising. The scale and the suddenness of the revolt against Mr Lukashenko made it reassess the threat posed by Mr Navalny, who has made a name for himself by exposing corruption in Russia. That reassessment, many in Russia believe, led Mr Putin’s security service, the FSB, to poison Mr Navalny with Novichok, a nerve agent, in August. But Mr Navalny survived and, after undergoing medical treatment in Germany, returned last month to Moscow. His imprisonment upon arrival, and the subsequent release by his group of an explosive two-hour film about Mr Putin’s “secret palace”—swiftly radicalised the country’s politics beyond anything Russia had seen for more than a decade.


Tens of thousands of Russians turned out across the country, both to demand that Mr Navalny be freed, and to protest against Mr Putin’s corrupt government. The mass detentions, the brutality of the police and the anger directed against the ageing strongman have closely resembled the response to protests in Belarus.


In Moscow and St Petersburg, Russia’s two biggest cities, officials shut down many central metro stations, limited pedestrian traffic and lined the streets with so many barricades and armoured police vehicles that the city centres felt as though they were under military occupation. The capital was paralysed. As protesters headed for the prison where Mr Navalny is held, the area was fortified with the national guard and extra riot police. By early evening those detained included Mr Navalny’s wife; some of the country’s most prominent journalists, including Sergei Parkhomenko, a critical journalist and activist; and one of Russia’s most popular rappers, Oxxxymiron.


The riot police rushed into crowds, grabbing one or two people and leaving the rest scattered in smaller groups. In viral videos on social media, police forced protesters’ faces into the ground and lined them up against walls, beating them until they bled. They pushed knees into backs, and deployed tear-gas and tasers. It was a show of force, but also of the Kremlin’s nervousness. Russian leaders portray Mr Navalny as a Western agent and the protests as part of foreign intelligence services’ attempt to change the regime in Russia. But such conspiratorial thinking is likely to infuriate protesters, who feel they have good reason to be fed up with Mr Putin.


Russia is now in a full-blown political crisis. And there is more to come. On February 2nd Mr Navalny will face a trial that is likely to convert a suspended sentence of three and a half years—handed down in 2014 in a trumped-up case designed to block him from standing for election—into actual time in jail. Leonid Volkov, Mr Navalny’s chief of staff, who is co-ordinating protests from outside Russia, has called people to rally outside a court.


The Kremlin hopes that its Belarusian-style crackdown will suppress the tide of discontent. But Mr Volkov and the Navalny team reckon that a sense of injustice, generated by the Kremlin’s repression, will further undermine Mr Putin’s legitimacy and add fuel to the fire. For the moment, Mr Putin may feel pleased with his security apparatus. Although thousands turned out again, the numbers had clearly diminished since the previous weekend—even if they were difficult to estimate given their scattered nature.


What happens next largely depends on how the wider public perceives the action of the police and the tactics of the protesters. In the past older Russians often succumbed to state television propaganda that told them Mr Navalny and his followers were a source of chaos and bloodshed; younger Russians, who rely on social media and encrypted chat groups, will see the authorities as the main source of violence. That perception may spread as the protests feed on other grievances, not least economic stagnation and the inadequacy of measures to curb covid-19.


On Sunday afternoon in Moscow, a 66-year-old woman, who did not want to be named, watched on as men clad in light military fatigues and riot gear tackled two young women to the ground. “It looks like they are conducting war on their own people,” said the woman. She had not been a supporter of Mr Navalny’s but felt his arrest was “the last drop”, as she put it. “I’m scared I’ll end up in a police wagon if I join,” she continued, “but after this, how can I not?”


Meanwhile, Yevgeniya, a 25-year-old demonstrator, said she was pleasantly surprised that, despite the beatings, the police had used only limited force so far. “What they’ve been doing is manageable,” she said, noting she has been prepared for a response of the sort that took place in Minsk. “They haven’t killed anyone yet.”
For years, Adnan Oktar’s cult made for outrageously bad television. Newspapers indulged him as a crackpot, an Islamic preacher surrounded by a harem of women in heavy make-up and swimsuits. (Mr Oktar argued the bikini was a form of religious covering.) Few people took him seriously. The authorities mostly seemed to ignore him.


His luck ran out on January 11th, when a Turkish court sentenced him to over 1,000 years in jail for fraud, torture and sexual abuse. Mr Oktar was a chameleon. He embraced, then disavowed, anti-Semitism. He convinced his followers he was the messiah. He preached a conservative strand of Islam in the 1980s, dialogue between Christians, Muslims and Jews after 2001, and after 2011, when he launched his own tv channel, sex. On his show, Mr Oktar would appear flanked by scantily clad women, whom he called his “kittens”, and men dressed up to the nines. Between sermons on world events and Islamic doctrine, he would dance with his “kittens” to pop music.


In his spare time, he denounced Darwin. He collected fossils, campaigned against the teaching of evolution and wrote an 800-page doorstopper called the “Atlas of Creation”, copies of which he mailed to politicians and scientists. When Richard Dawkins, a biologist, called him a quack, Mr Oktar convinced a court to block his website in Turkey. Last year, his atlas made a surprise appearance on the bookshelf of Christine Lagarde, the head of the European Central Bank, during a Zoom call. Ms Lagarde had never bothered to open it, apparently.


Reports surfaced that Mr Oktar was grooming his followers as sex slaves with cocaine, video and blackmail. “Every freedom I had was gone,” says a former follower. Until recently, such allegations earned Mr Oktar only a couple of brief spells in prison, and one in a mental hospital. Few of his followers dared to speak out. Critics were sued for libel. When the police closed in, Mr Oktar resorted to conspiracy theory. He blamed the “homosexual lobby” and “the British deep state” for his legal troubles. His arrest, he claimed, was the work of Queen Elizabeth. Like so much of what he said, it wasn’t true.
If europe’s economies were a brass band, Germany’s would be the tuba: the biggest, most reliable generator of oom-pah-pah on a continent of cornets and bugles. Last spring it coped with the sharpest recession since the second world war better than its neighbours, thanks to a shorter and looser covid-19 lockdown and a massive fiscal stimulus. This year Germany was expected to recover its mighty puff more quickly than its peers.


However, the latest statistics suggest that the tuba’s valves are stuck: the recovery might not be as robust as forecast. On January 14th Destatis, the official statistics agency, announced that the German economy shrank by 5% last year. This is painful, but not nearly as bad as the double-digit contractions expected in Spain and several other European countries. In the last quarter of the year it stagnated, Destatis said.


Germany will almost certainly find itself back in recession in the first quarter of this year. A survey of purchasing managers by ihs Markit, a provider of financial data, published on January 22nd, suggests that the economy is barely growing this month. Manufacturers are hit hard by shortages of containers for deliveries and higher prices of commodities. Florian Hense, an economist at Berenberg, Germany’s oldest private bank, predicts “a dark winter” with a contraction of 1% for the first quarter compared with the previous quarter “with the risks tilted to the downside”.


A setback in the first quarter means that the predictions of the government and economic research institutes were too optimistic. On January 27th Peter Altmaier, the German economy minister (pictured), slashed his forecast for economic growth for 2021 from 4.4% to just 3%. Leading economic research institutes, which in December predicted 4.7% growth for 2021, are also likely to cut their forecasts.




Though Germany was widely admired for its level-headed management of the first wave of the pandemic, it is struggling with the second. It imposed a light lockdown at the start of November that closed down restaurants and cinemas but left shops open. As infection rates kept creeping up, the lockdown was extended and toughened in mid-December with the closure of all non-essential shops and schools. On January 18th Germany’s central bank said that the economy is managing to stay afloat but could suffer a “sizeable setback” if coronavirus curbs are extended again. The following day, after hours of emotional debate with the state premiers, Angela Merkel, the chancellor, announced that the lockdown would be extended until mid-February, and also slightly toughened.


Things could get worse. The number of insolvencies last year was lower than in 2019 thanks to a ruling by the government that gave companies more time with their paperwork. That concession has now expired, and Stefan Schneider, chief German economist at Deutsche Bank, predicts a wave of bankruptcies. Even businesses that were in good health before the pandemic could be affected. The German Retail Association warns that up to 50,000 shops may go belly up in the coming months. And according to kfw, a public development bank, more than a million jobs in small and midsized businesses are at risk.


As soon as temperatures rise, and more Germans have received the covid-19 vaccine, prospects are rosier. “Germany is structurally still strong,” says Holger Schmieding, chief economist at Berenberg. Thanks to its generous furlough scheme Germany will not see mass unemployment. The second lockdown is hardly affecting manufacturing, which is humming. Machinery and carmaking, two pivotal industries, will take off again in 2021, predicts Mr Schmieding.


Even so, the structural problems that predate the pandemic, such as an ageing workforce, a delay in digitising government and businesses, creaking infrastructure and over-dependence on exports, have not gone away. Little more can now be done to tackle them in an election year, but the next chancellor will have to take a deep breath and get to work. 
The logo outside the vaccination centre shows a red-caped Super Granny zapping the spiked coronavirus with one fist, while clutching a medical syringe in the other. Named “Chez Mauricette”, a nod to the first French patient vaccinated against covid-19, the place sounds more like a friendly local café than a health clinic. In the industrial town of Poissy, north-west of Paris, this is a deft antidote to grim times, and an effort to confront the peculiar scepticism of the French. “People are exhausted and anxious,” says Karl Olive, the town’s centre-right mayor, and a former football referee: “They need a bit of fun.”


On a recent weekday afternoon, patients wait calmly to be seen by a doctor before moving into a vaccination cubicle. After opening on January 7th, this centre is now jabbing over 600 arms a week. Alain and Anne-Marie Guillaume celebrated their 60th wedding anniversary there by getting an injection each. Poissy was the first centre to open outside a hospital or care home. Rather than waiting for regional health authorities to draw up a map, Mr Olive put in phone calls to the right people and told them his centre was ready to go. It was approved. “You can’t expect everything from the central state,” says Mr Olive. “Mayors in France can solve problems too.”


Poissy’s can-do defiance says much about the weaknesses of the French state, which contributed to a glacial early vaccination roll-out. This surprised many admirers of France’s well-financed and normally efficient health system. Indeed the number of daily covid-19 deaths in France is now the lowest per head among big European countries. France’s campaign has now picked up pace, overtaking Germany’s in daily doses administered per head. Yet the running total, of 1.2m doses injected by January 26th, is still lower in France than in Germany, Italy and Spain—and way behind Britain. This cannot be blamed only on delays in securing approval and delivering vaccines, which have affected all the eu (see article). Three specific, linked problems explain French dawdling.




The first is an inbuilt caution due to the criminal liability of elected officials in France. In 1999 Laurent Fabius, a former prime minister, was charged with manslaughter (and later acquitted) in a contaminated-blood case. Over 100 legal complaints have been filed against ministers, including Jean Castex, the prime minister, and Olivier Véran, the health minister. So health policymakers struggle to weigh risks and benefits dispassionately.


A second is the surprisingly strong anti-vaxxer sentiment in France, land of Louis Pasteur. In December just 42% told a poll they would get a jab. Part of this hesitancy stems from French health scandals, including the ongoing prosecution of a drug company over deaths of diabetics, and a massive over-ordering of vaccines against h1n1 (swine flu) in 2009. Conspiracy theories about big pharma blend with the anti-elite sentiment behind the gilets jaunes (yellow jackets) or Didier Raoult, a Marseille doctor who pushed hydroxychloroquine to treat covid-19. The French, concluded the government, needed ultra-careful handling. “It was a choice,” says a government source; “If we’d said ‘let’s just go for it’, people would have said they don’t trust us.”


Far from colliding with the administration’s instincts, deliberate prudence matched them. This is a third factor: a centralised French system that tends to prefer elegantly polished design over pragmatic local initiative. “It’s an énarque tendency,” says one, referring to the Ecole Nationale d’Administration, which trains the elite. In some bureaucracies, such as finance, clear command chains have nonetheless enabled political decisions to be put in place rapidly. But the health system is a many-tentacled beast, linking the ministry, national agencies, 18 regional authorities and departmental préfectures. “We have a central state that wants to decide and control everything, but lacks clear hierarchical lines,” says Nicolas Bauquet of the Institut Montaigne, a think-tank: “On the ground everybody is expected to wait for the plan.”


The upshot was a complex plan that wasted precious time. Before jabbing care-home residents, for instance, the health ministry produced a 45-page vaccination guide, including six pages on how to obtain residents’ consent. As the delays this caused became clear, rules limiting vaccines to care-home residents were shelved, and health workers over 50 included.


Back in Poissy, the mayor thinks President Emmanuel Macron needs to give the “ants’ nest” of the “techno-structure” a “big kick”. Paradoxically, for all the self-administered caution and rules, vaccine supply is now more likely to hold things up. For the slow roll-out has inadvertently turned the distrustful French into impatient enthusiasts: 56% now say they want a jab. 
After a decade in Britain, it took Alexej Kirillov barely 24 hours to decide to leave. In March 2020, as Europe’s borders slammed shut, Mr Kirillov, a 31-year-old strategy consultant, had a choice: lockdown in a costly, lonely London flat or go home to the Czech Republic and be close to family. “I was not planning to leave for another five years, or longer, or never,” he says. But covid-19 changed his mind. Nearly a year on, he has set up shop in his homeland. A temporary return has become permanent. “Now I’m back, I think why didn’t I move back sooner?”


He was not alone. In 2020 Europe saw a great reverse migration, as those who had sought work abroad returned home. Exact numbers are hard to come by. An estimated 1.3m Romanians went back to Romania—equivalent to three times the population of its second-biggest city. Perhaps 500,000 Bulgarians returned to Bulgaria—a huge number for a country of 7m. Lithuania has seen more citizens arriving than leaving for the first time in years. Other measures show the same. In Warsaw, dating apps brim with returning Poles looking for socially undistanced fun. Politicians in eastern Europe had long complained of a “brain drain” as their brightest left in search of higher wages in the west. Now the pandemic, a shifting economy and changing work patterns are bringing many of them back. A “brain gain” has begun.


Migration vexes European politicians. Freedom of movement—the ability to move to any country in the eu—is among the most popular benefits of belonging to the club. It is especially cherished by citizens of former communist countries, who have grim memories of being prevented from travelling by their own rulers. However, although most Europeans believe in freedom of movement for themselves, some are less sure about granting it to others. (Hence Brexit.) And governments of countries that lose lots of clever, enterprising young people tend to lament this fact. Graphics on Lithuanian government websites show the population dwindling from 3.7m in 1990 to 2.8m in 2019, thanks to emigration and low birth rates. About 2m Poles—or 5% of the country’s population—live elsewhere in Europe. Often, it is the most qualified. Doctors and nurses quitting Romania are a particular bugbear. Migration creates a clash of interests between individuals, who want to better their own lot, and governments, who would often prefer them to stick around and pay taxes. Ivan Krastev, a Bulgarian writer, observes that “It is easier to go to Germany than to make Bulgaria function like Germany.” And so people do.


Yet even before the pandemic, this process had started to reverse in some places. Emigrants from the Baltic states have been heading back, having earned a nest-egg or picked up useful skills in western Europe. Homeward-bound Estonians have outstripped leaving Estonians since 2017. A goverment programme to help returning Lithuanians had 215 consultations in 2015; this ballooned to nearly 9,000 by 2019. Similar tales can be heard in bigger countries. In 2018 the number of Poles abroad started to fall for the first time in nearly a decade and has steadily declined ever since, according to the Polish Economic Institute, a think-tank. Dedicated schemes—ranging from glossy propaganda about life in the Baltics to free Polish lessons for children born abroad—are common.


Migration anywhere in the world is often temporary. In Europe several factors are pushing and pulling people homewards. Liam Patuzzi of the Migration Policy Institute Europe, a think-tank, notes that the economic gap between east and west is closing. Labour markets in eastern Europe are hot. Before the pandemic, the unemployment rate in the Czech Republic was about 2%, the lowest in the bloc, down from almost 9% when it joined in 2004. Wage gaps, though still large, are falling. In 2010 a Romanian who moved to Italy could expect to earn five times more; in 2019, only three times. For the highly skilled the gap is narrower still. Throw in perks such as Romanian software developers being exempt from income tax, and a job in Bucharest can trump one in Brussels.


Remote working alters the calculation, too. A new grey economy has sprung up across the eu, with white-collar staff living in one country but illicitly working in another (and paying tax in the wrong place, as a result). Often these people are expats in their own country, physically at home, but telecommuting across a border. Headhunters now dangle the prospect of working anywhere, says a Romanian private-equity executive. Once the taxman catches up, however, those grey workers will have to choose: stay or go.


Darling, you got to let me know
Blue-collar workers typically have fewer choices. Waiters and cleaners, many of whom are migrants, cannot work remotely. Some 700,000 foreign workers have left London during the pandemic, deciding that the occasional glimpse of the Thames did not make up for high rents and the sudden collapse of job opportunities. But for white-collar workers the link between opportunity and location could be drastically weakened, spelling another shift in migration patterns. Greece, which saw phalanxes of youngsters leave during its bail-out, is eager to attract them back. If the sun is not tempting enough, the tax breaks help. Workers who move to the country can have their tax bill halved for the first seven years.


The number of people flowing back to eastern Europe is still much smaller than the number who originally left. And those who went home because of the pandemic may head off again when the lockdowns ease. About two-thirds of the Bulgarians who returned plan to migrate again, according to the European Council on Foreign Relations, a think-tank. In the long run, even as wage gaps close, some people will always seek adventure in foreign lands. Open borders in Europe allow people to choose where to live, which inevitably means that less attractive places will lose population. But nothing remains the same. Countries can grow more appealing, and people can change their minds quite suddenly about where they want to live. Ask Mr Kirillov. 
The start of 2021 in Europe was meant to be about jabs aimed at arms. Instead, it is fingers that are being pointed, and threats brandished. Delays to covid-19 vaccine deliveries in eu countries threaten to slow the group’s already-lethargic inoculation plans. News of production snafus has sent tempers flaring as politicians, Eurocrats and drug firms try to apportion the blame. Calls for vaccine protectionism to fix the problem—for Europe—could stop other countries securing shots.




The eu’s vaccination campaign is already among the most sluggish in the rich world: only two doses have been administered for every 100 Europeans, compared with seven in America and eleven in Britain. Things seemed to be improving, albeit slowly, as national governments stepped up efforts to distribute and administer jabs (see article). Then AstraZeneca on January 22nd discreetly advised the European Commission in Brussels that its factories in Europe were facing difficulties in producing sufficient quantities of the jab it had developed alongside the University of Oxford. That came on top of Pfizer-BioNTech, another vaccine-maker, also pushing back promised deliveries by a few weeks.


What AstraZeneca had tried to paint as a mere logistical rejigging caused an outburst of fury rarely mustered by the commission. The eu’s executive arm has been in charge of procuring jabs for the club’s 27 member states. National politicians had already groused that Eurocrats had been too slow to buy vaccines and to approve them. The news that AstraZeneca deliveries would be scaled back by two-thirds or more in the first quarter of the year compounded the perception of indolence in Brussels.


The commission responded by recycling the anger and diverting it towards the Anglo-Swedish firm. Stella Kyriakides, the eu’s health commissioner, pointed to large prepayments Europe had made to get its production lines up and running and demanded a return on its investment. Leaks suggest the commission thinks that AstraZeneca has been sending Europe to the back of the queue, perhaps to satisfy other customers. Jens Spahn, Germany’s health minister, pleaded for Europe to restrict exports of doses produced in eu facilities.


On January 26th Britain, fearful lest such a policy might cut off its imports of the Pfizer vaccine from Belgium, warned of the perils of “vaccine nationalism”. It later emerged that the eu wanted AstraZeneca to compensate for shortfalls in European factories from its British facilities; since then, Britain has not repeated its appeals for cross-border solidarity.


Waiting for Soriot
The AstraZeneca delay is particularly unwelcome in Europe. Though its vaccine was not expected to be approved by eu regulators until January 29th (and may at first be reserved for under-55s), the company had promised lots of jabs quickly. A schedule of expected deliveries in France released on January 7th suggested that fully 62% of all inoculations in February were to be with the AstraZeneca serum.


Other eu countries will be in a similar position. Given that much of Pfizer’s vaccine output now needs to be reserved for second doses for those who have already had a first Pfizer jab, some parts of Europe, such as Romania and bits of Italy, have already slowed down inoculations. Back-of-the-envelope estimates suggest far fewer first jabs could be administered than in recent weeks, at precisely the time Europe was hoping to increase them. That might mean longer lockdowns, deeper economic slumps and more irate voters (such as in the Netherlands, where riots broke out on three consecutive nights over curfews).


The delivery delays focused attention on the commission’s role as the central purchaser for the vaccine. Each country going it alone might have resulted in an unseemly free-for-all, leaving some Europeans jabbed and others not. But this left the European Commission in charge of a purchasing contract of the sort usually handled by member states. Unlike them, the Brussels bureaucracy is not well-versed in the intricacies of placing multi-billion-euro orders for the likes of fighter jets and new hospitals. Partly as a result, eu deals to secure vaccines were signed several months after those in Britain and America.


As much as it has huffed and puffed, the eu seems to have little recourse against AstraZeneca. The contract it signed is not public, but another one, thought to be similar, is. It suggests that vaccine suppliers hold all the cards in case of delays. Pascal Soriot, the boss of AstraZeneca, said the deal his firm signed with the eu was “not a commitment” to Europe, merely a promise to try to supply doses quickly. In an interview with European newspapers, he said the eu was being treated fairly—but that it should have tempered its expectations, and placed its order earlier.


Having pre-fed AstraZeneca all the carrot and left itself with no stick, Europe is left with few options. It is hardly likely to cancel its order of vaccines—a delayed jab is almost infinitely better than none at all. Any money that the commission could recoup would be insignificant, and would probably take years to arrive.


Hence the explosive idea from Mr Spahn to curb exports. Such an approach would jar with European proclamations of the importance of free trade, and of sharing vaccine supplies beyond the rich world. Others despaired. How could the eu credibly deal with protectionism by, say, India if it used export controls itself as a first resort in a scrap over vaccines, wondered one diplomat. “We feared a Singapore-on-Thames [in the shape of post-Brexit Britain]; these ideas are turning us into Cuba-on-the-Seine.” As tempers cooled, the commission seemed minded to implement a softer “transparency mechanism” designed not to block shipments but to track them. But the row is not over, and if the delays continue or worsen, the threat of export restrictions seems likely to re-emerge. In a crisis, it is often every man for himself, after all. 
In the colourful jargon of Italian politics the latest upheaval, which reached its latest turning-point on January 27th when the president, Sergio Mattarella, began formal consultations with the country’s political leaders, is a crisi al buio, or “crisis in the dark”.


Sometimes, everything has been carefully settled in advance. The prime minister steps down, as Giuseppe Conte did the day before, but in the knowledge that he—there has yet to be a “she”—can count on majority support in parliament for a reshuffled cabinet.


No such certainty exists this time. Without the support of one of the smaller parties in his coalition, Italia Viva, Mr Conte no longer has a majority in the Senate, the upper house of parliament. Once he has spoken to the speakers of the two houses and the heads of each parliamentary group, President Mattarella may—or may not—ask Mr Conte to try to form his third government in three years. But even if a solution can be found soon, which does not look easy, the outcome could be a government that is shaky or explosive.


That gives the crisis a Europe-wide significance. Under the eu’s plans for recovery from the pandemic, Italy will get the biggest allocation, of more than €200bn ($240bn) in grants and loans, to be raised mostly by borrowing underwritten jointly by member states. Already doubts existed about Italy’s ability to put its windfall to good use. Its track record for taking advantage of European funds is dismal.


By September 30th, three months before the expiry of the eu’s current budget, Italy had yet to find an acceptable use for 14% of the “Structural and Investment” funds to which it was entitled. Portugal, Romania and Croatia had all, by contrast, allocated their respective quotas. “There is a great deal of fear with respect to the crises that could affect [Italy],” said David Sassoli, the Italian speaker of the European parliament. “The European recovery plan should be getting under way and all the countries ought to be concentrated on that.”


Mr Conte’s coalition, which includes the ideologically eclectic Five Star Movement (m5s), the centre-left Democratic Party (pd) and the more left-wing but smaller Free and Equal movement, had been in trouble since January 13th. That was when the ministers from a fourth coalition party, Italia Viva, left the cabinet, mainly in protest at the plans for spending Italy’s recovery funds.


Though polling a mere 3%, Italia Viva, led by a former prime minister, Matteo Renzi, still has enough senators to deprive the government of a majority in the upper house. And they were expected to defeat it in a vote on a key reform, of the justice system, on January 27th. Mr Conte decided to jump before he was pushed.


That should boost his chances of being asked by Mr Mattarella to try either to woo back Italia Viva or to replace it with independent or opposition lawmakers. A first snag is that Mr Conte has reportedly said he wants nothing more to do with Mr Renzi. And the same is true of some in the pd and m5s. That could, of course, be a bluff. But a second snag is that Mr Renzi’s many criticisms of the government’s performance suggest he may not be content with a reshuffle that gives his tiny party more clout. He may genuinely want Mr Conte’s head.


If so, Mr Conte’s only resort would be to construct a new majority. Silvio Berlusconi, whose conservative Forza Italia party occupies 54 of the seats in the 321-seat Senate, has signalled his backing for a broader coalition. But then another snag arises: the Five Stars refuse to ally with a party they view as incorrigibly sleazy. Mr Conte had hoped to lure over a posse of Christian Democrats. But—yet another snag—their party secretary was put under formal investigation earlier this month, suspected of helping the Calabrian mafia.


So another way out of the crisis could well be a new prime minister, heading either the previous coalition or a new one. But he or she would need to be acceptable to all concerned. If no such candidate were found, and with all alternatives exhausted, Mr Mattarella would have to call a snap election in the midst of a pandemic. That, polls suggest, could lead to a government of the hard-right Northern League and the Brothers of Italy, heirs of the neo-fascist movement. But an election is still the least likely solution. A reform, approved by a referendum last year, cut the number of seats in parliament by around a third. The current lawmakers’ instinct for self-preservation will surely mean that everything possible is done to avoid a ballot. 
“WHO CARES about him?” Russian president Vladimir Putin smirked at a recent press conference. He was referring to Alexei Navalny, his main political challenger, who had survived an attack with the nerve poison known as Novichok and returned to Russia from Germany on January 17th. He was arrested at the airport on spurious charges before he even passed passport control.


Mr Putin has never uttered Mr Navalny’s name in public. But the answer to his rhetorical question came on January 23rd, when tens of thousands of Russians in more than 100 cities across the country braved police cordons to protest against Mr Navalny’s arrest and Mr Putin’s corrupt government. It was the largest unauthorised anti-Kremlin demonstration in years, and it resulted in 3,600 detentions.


In Moscow, some 40,000 people took to the icy streets according to a Reuters estimate. Protesters threw snowballs at baton-wielding police clad in body armour and helmets. There were a few incidents of violence: a car belonging to the FSB, the secret police, was smashed, and a woman was kicked in the stomach. But for the most part the crowds in Moscow were not radical, and the police showed restraint.


In burgeoning and sleek Moscow, where covid-19 restrictions have all but disappeared, commerce went on unhindered. Bars and restaurants continued to obligingly serve customers, and bike couriers squeezed their way through protesting crowds to deliver food orders. But although the city was not in a revolutionary mood, many residents’ sympathy lay with the protesters.


Leonid Volkov, Mr Navalny’s chief of staff, co-ordinated the protests from an undisclosed location outside Russia. He hailed them as “a victory of bravery and spirit over state terror” and called for another protest next Saturday: “We must get Navalny freed.”


The Kremlin is unlikely to pay heed. The government was unimpressed by the numbers, said Dmitry Peskov, Mr Putin’s spokesman, adding that many more people voted for Mr Putin than were protesting against him. That may say more about the nature of Russia’s presidential election in 2018, from which Mr Navalny was banned, than Mr Putin’s popularity.


It is true that the protests were small when compared with the half-million-strong demonstrations of the dying days of the Soviet empire. In Moscow, they were also less than half the size of those that swept the capital in 2011-13, when Mr Putin returned as president after serving one term as prime minister.


Yet today’s Russia is far more repressive than it was then and the turnout this time was held down not by support for Mr Putin, but by fear of being beaten up and arrested by police. In the run-up to January 23rd the Kremlin waged a massive campaign of intimidation. Employers ordered their staff not to protest. Schools told parents to keep their children at home. Some students were called in for unusual Saturday lessons. Others were threatened with expulsion. Police handed out formal warnings to activists. Most of Mr Navalny’s associates, including his spokeswoman, were preventively detained.


The Kremlin also went to considerable lengths to prevent images from spreading through social media and protesters from co-ordinating their movements through chat groups. A live coverage of the protest by TV Dozhd, an independent Russian internet television station, was interrupted when the police turned off the electricity in the flat from which it was streaming and detained its journalist. A hotel overlooking Pushkin Square, the protesters’ gathering point, was ordered by the secret service to clear out all rooms with a view of the square. Mobile internet and public wifi were severely disrupted.


The fear did its job. One woman, who asked that her name be withheld, watched the protest with her husband from behind a restaurant’s plate-glass windows, afraid to join in. “I feel ashamed, but I am simply too scared,” she said, tears welling in her eyes.


For Mr Putin, repression is a poor substitute for popularity. A more revealing signal of public attitudes than numbers on the streets is the 80m-plus views that Mr Navalny’s most recent and explosive film, attacking the president for corruption, notched up in its first five days on YouTube. The film exposes an obscenely opulent yet secret palace that was allegedly built for Mr Putin on the Black Sea by his cronies at a cost of $1.3bn. (Mr Putin denies that.) The president still commands the television channels that helped him to come to power, but it is Mr Navalny who dominates politics on Russia’s internet.


Mr Navalny’s film is a serious blow to Mr Putin’s legitimacy. “Two years ago people had to explain why they oppose Putin,” says Kirill Rogov, a Russian political analyst. “Now they have to justify why they support him.” Some children of Russia’s moneyed elite joined the protest. A number of pop stars have publicly withdrawn their support for the president. Alla Pugacheva, a legendary pop diva ever since Soviet days, has signed up for Mr Navalny’s Instagram account (and unfollowed the account of singer Filipp Kirkorov, her former husband and a Putin supporter).


According to some sociologists, 40% of those who protested at the weekend did so for the first time. One 15-year-old demonstrator said he overcame his fear because it might be his last chance to protest. It was not so much Mr Navalny’s politics that motivated him to brave the streets, but the abuse of human rights in Russia—including the rights of Mr Navalny himself. “I was shocked by the [police] brutality and the anger of the protesters,” he said afterwards. “I am amazed by how many people came out. And I feel this is just the beginning.”
Every country’s welfare state is a reflection of its soul. Take the Netherlands, an egalitarian country but also a deeply Calvinist and bureaucratic one. Dutch benefits are generous. Income inequality is among the lowest in the eu. But benefits are subject to complicated rules meant to exclude the undeserving. These can run amok. Over the past decade, systems meant to snoop out abuse of child-care benefits wrongly labelled more than 20,000 parents as fraudsters and drove many into penury. On January 15th Mark Rutte, the prime minister, and his cabinet resigned over the scandal. It may herald a modest shift to the left in Dutch social policy.


Child care in the Netherlands is private, but the tax authority gives parents subsidies to pay the fees, depending on income. After Mr Rutte and his centre-right Liberal (vvd) party took office in 2010, laws to fight benefit fraud were repeatedly sharpened, especially in 2013 after Bulgarian scammers were discovered collecting payments. The tax authority was given new powers to hunt cheats and encouraged to cover the cost with funds it seized.


Soon Dutch lawyers began getting complaints from parents who had not only had their benefits cut off but had been told to repay everything they had ever received. Those who did not repay fast were hit with fines. Without child care, many parents gave up their jobs. Some lost their homes. A disproportionate number had immigrant backgrounds. Parents had to prove they had applied correctly, but when they tried, the tax authority failed to respond.


“They would promise to look into it, and then you wouldn’t hear from them,” says Leigh-Anne Jansen, a British-Dutch dual citizen who was a full-time student with a young daughter when her benefits were cut off in 2014. She and her husband, who is Turkish-Dutch, were ordered to pay back about €30,000 ($36,000). Because the authorities refused to provide evidence, parents could not appeal.


A report by the national ombudsman in 2017 criticised the tax authority for mistreating parents, yet the benefit stops continued. Parliamentary investigations got skimpy information from ministries, with large sections redacted. By late 2019 the government acknowledged wrongdoing and set aside money for compensation (estimated at €1.3bn), but almost no payments have been made. Last July the personal-data authority found that the tax service had used algorithms in which parents with dual nationality (such as Ms Janssen and her husband) were labelled fraud risks. That violated the constitution.


The final straw for the government was a parliamentary report in December that labelled the mistreatment of citizens an “unheard-of injustice”. “There were a few really nasty things: the ethnic profiling, blacklists and citizens labelled as fraudsters for no reason and financially ruined,” says Pieter Omtzigt, an mp who was instrumental in uncovering the scandal.


The cabinet’s resignation is in a sense an empty gesture: a general election had already been scheduled for March 17th. Mr Rutte is running again, and polls put support for his vvd at about 25%, far ahead of any other party. The only party leader to resign has been Labour’s Lodewijk Asscher, who served as deputy pm while the anti-fraud policies were developed. It seems unlikely that Mr Rutte, who led the Netherlands throughout the benefits scandal, will face any political reckoning for it.


However, the vvd says it is willing to discuss proposals from the Labour and GreenLeft parties for direct government financing of child care. Mr Rutte has lately moved away from small-government orthodoxy, saying the pandemic has shown the public’s desire for a “strong state”.


The parents are at last seeing some justice. The government has promised each family at least €30,000. Incredibly, the tax authority at first said it would claw back much of that, but on January 18th the government abruptly cancelled the parents’ debts. Even that was frustrating to some. “All these years we have heard it is too complex, nothing can be done,” says Eva González Pérez, a lawyer who represents 40 of the families. “Now suddenly it can?” 
“Imay not be a great showman, but I am Armin Laschet—and you can trust that.” If the words with which Mr Laschet secured the leadership of Germany’s Christian Democratic Union (cdu) were less than rousing, they encapsulated the appeal of the football-loving cigarillo-chomper who defeated two rivals at a vote of party delegates on January 16th. Now in charge of Germany’s ruling party, Mr Laschet is well placed to succeed Angela Merkel, his cdu colleague, who will step down as chancellor after a general election in September.


Yet Mr Laschet, premier of the hulking western state of North Rhine-Westphalia (nrw), faces several hurdles on his way to the chancellery. His narrow run-off victory by 53% to 47% over Friedrich Merz, a corporate lawyer backed by right-leaning delegates, underlines the first. Mr Merz is a serial political loser who has repeatedly failed to dispel suspicions that he is more interested in his own fortunes than his party’s. But he became a vessel for the hopes of cdu members who saw in Mrs Merkel’s departure a chance to stop its liberal drift on matters like migration. Jana Schimke, a cdu mp who backed Mr Merz, says members have resigned from the party and that disappointment is particularly acute in east Germany. Mr Laschet’s first task is to unite his party’s warring tribes.


A bigger obstacle lies in Markus Söder, the swaggering premier of Bavaria and leader of the Christian Social Union (csu), the cdu’s sister party there. In March or April, the two parties must decide who will lead them into the general election—and therefore, polling suggests, succeed Mrs Merkel. Thanks in part to a confident performance during the coronavirus crisis, Mr Söder outshines Mr Laschet in opinion polls (see chart). He insists his ambitions do not extend beyond Bavaria. However, should Mr Laschet fail to win the affections of German voters—especially if the cdu struggles in two state elections due in mid-March—the party may turn to Bavaria for salvation, and Mr Söder will surely oblige. “We have to enter the race with the candidate who has the best chances,” says Christian Natterer, another cdu Merz-backer.




Mr Laschet’s hopes rest in part on his promise to maintain the stance of the woman he hopes to succeed. Like Mrs Merkel, he is a down-to-earth, risk-averse pragmatist who distrusts grand visions. But the pair differ markedly in style. Mrs Merkel, the phlegmatic daughter of a Lutheran pastor, grew up on the east side of the Berlin Wall, keeps her emotions in check and weighs her words like gold dust. Mr Laschet, a jovial, gaffe-prone Rhinelander of strong Catholic faith, was delighted to win an “award against deadly seriousness” at a carnival in his home town of Aachen.


Mrs Merkel has always remained aloof from the party she led for 18 years. She had to battle its entrenched structures, ruthlessly dispatching internal enemies where necessary (including, back in 2002, Mr Merz) and earning its affection by endlessly winning elections. Mr Laschet is a cdu man through and through. He joined at 18. After dabbling in law and journalism, he represented the party in parliaments at state, national and European level, losing almost as many elections as he has won.


A conciliator by instinct, Mr Laschet pledges to be the cdu’s team captain rather than its ceo. “This is his speciality,” says Serap Güler, who serves in his government in nrw. “He is open to being convinced, open to other views.” In nrw Mr Laschet has stacked his cabinet with figures from across the spectrum, including former opponents who have become firm supporters. His interior minister, Herbert Reul, is a law-and-order bruiser who lends Mr Laschet’s affable bearing a sharper edge.


Mr Laschet was an early and consistent advocate of expanding the cdu’s appeal to minorities in Germany—earning the nickname “Turkish Armin” among sceptical right-wingers but attracting adherents like Ms Güler, the daughter of Turkish immigrants. He backed Mrs Merkel’s decision to keep Germany’s borders open to migrants in 2015-16, as well as her subsequent policies to keep them out.


The Green Party, the cdu/csu’s likeliest governing partner after the election, would certainly prefer Mr Laschet to Mr Merz. But his closeness to industry could hamper coalition talks. Climate taxes and rules must not be allowed to strangle jobs, he argues. He is a miner’s son from a coal state, and in 2019 helped delay the date when Germany promises to stop burning the stuff to 2038. In 2017, during abortive coalition talks with the Greens, the energy negotiations he led for the cdu nearly collapsed.


Mr Laschet’s upbringing in Aachen, close to the Dutch and Belgian borders, places Europe in his “political heart”, says Moritz Küpper, one of the authors of “Der Machtmenschliche” (roughly, “power with a human face”), a recent biography. He keeps a bust of Charlemagne, the city’s most famous son, in his office. In 2018 he wangled the obscure job of plenipotentiary for Franco-German cultural relations to gain access to Emmanuel Macron. Last year, in a rare rebuke to Mrs Merkel, he said Germany should have been more responsive to Mr Macron’s call for action in Europe. Mr Laschet’s hawkish fiscal views are orthodox for his party, but he once hinted at support for Eurobonds. As the cdu often applies the brakes to Germany’s Europe policy, such views will carry weight.


Yet beyond his western European comfort zone, aspects of Mr Laschet’s foreign policy raise eyebrows. As a teenager he hung a poster of Solidarity, Poland’s anti-communist union movement, in his bedroom. But as an adult he shares Mrs Merkel’s reluctance to confront eu members that undermine democracy. (An early test will be whether he backs moves to expel Hungary’s authoritarian ruling party from the eu’s centre-right grouping.) He belongs to the ranks of Germany’s Putin-Versteher (understanders): he urges dialogue with the Kremlin, questioned whether it really murdered a former agent in Britain in 2018 and has turned a blind eye to its bolstering of the murderous regime in Syria.


Should he secure the chancellor-candidacy, Mr Laschet’s foreign-policy views are unlikely to be much of a handicap. Voters care far more about recovering from the pandemic. But Mrs Merkel’s departure will leave a gaping hole on the global stage. Mr Laschet has yet to show he could fill it. 
“Copium” is the most useful recent addition to the political lexicon. The portmanteau of “cope” and “opium” is a metaphorical opiate that dulls the pain of defeat, according to Urban Dictionary, a useful guide to slang. In Europe a slow vaccine roll-out across the eu has left its leaders huffing gallons of the stuff. So far the eu, a club of mostly small rich countries, has vaccinated 1.4% of its population. By contrast Israel, a small rich country, has vaccinated a third of its population. Even Britain, whose health service is a punchline on the continent, has jabbed 7%. With nearly 5% of people vaccinated America, the uncaring antithesis to the eu’s self-image, has done better than anyone in the bloc.


The copium comes in many forms. According to one ingenious argument, the eu vaccination scheme is not any slower than other rich Western countries, it simply set off later. Others suggest that regulators in the likes of Israel, America and Britain played loose with safety standards. The most pernicious argument, however, is that rolling out the vaccine is not a competition at all.


After all, competition sits awkwardly with the eu. It was set up to stop destructive contests between governments. Mashing together the coal and steel resources of western Europe was designed to make war—the worst form of competition—impossible. Strict rules stop countries from propping up failing national champions and the outright bungs that are common among American states trying to attract new businesses. The logic of eu rules is to create a firm floor to stop countries from undermining each other.


It was in this spirit that the eu built its vaccination strategy. Rather than allow individual countries to outbid each other, vaccines would be bought collectively by the European Commission and then shared out equally, according to population. Otherwise, the contrast between Bavarian teenagers in nightclubs and Bulgarian grannies in body bags would have made the spring fight over medical equipment—when eu governments were reduced to grabbing from each other—look like a lover’s tiff. Countries going it alone again would have produced winners, but also losers, most likely in the eu’s poorer member states. Sometimes competition can be a bad thing.


But a lack of competitive drive hurt the eu elsewhere. Regulatory slowness was painted as a virtue rather than vice. Part of the reason European regulators did not rush through approval was due to overblown concerns about Europe’s band of vaccine sceptics. Now several eu leaders led by Austria’s chancellor, Sebastian Kurz, are heaping pressure on the agency to hurry up and approve other vaccines. This has left the eu with the worst of both worlds, with a thorough process delaying arrival yet still being undermined by political interference.


Leaders are peculiarly relaxed that countries outside the eu are beating them at getting jabs into arms. Israel, runs one argument, is a special case. Squint at the statistics, however, and Israel becomes an archetypal eu member state. At 9m, its population is bang on the median for an eu country, as is its income per head. Yet many officials assume that Israel’s roll-out cannot be matched by countries of similar population and similar wealth. Israel may be better placed than, say, Austria, to fight a land war but there is no reason its health care cannot be matched. “There is this tendency to compare yourself with the worst,” complains one diplomat. In eu capitals there is no shame in losing to Israel as long as politicians can say they beat Belgium or Bulgaria.


For a bloc with global pretensions, this attitude is depressing. Countries that have done well with covid-19 are most aware that the world is a competitive place. Israel is surrounded by countries that want to destroy it. Taiwan, Japan and South Korea have similarly tricky relationships with powerful neighbours. By contrast, governments in the eu outsource their existential worries. It is the eu’s job to devise collective solutions to how the continent deals with, say, China. Just as criticism about procurement of vaccines can be offloaded—at times unfairly—onto Brussels, so can any holes in the collective approach to Beijing.


Reluctance to compete goes deeper than the response to covid-19. Areas that are still competitive within the eu, such as corporation tax, are being squeezed towards standardisation. Ireland lures businesses with the promise of a 12.5% tax rate, less than half the German and French rates. For now, the commission is only examining ways of wiping out the most egregious uses of tax law (those companies paying far less than 12.5%). In the long term, though, this is just the beginning of an anti-competitive squeeze.


Calls for corporate “European champions” are growing, based on the dubious logic that if businesses have less competition at home, they can be stronger abroad. Chinese and American firms bulk up by growing inside large, competitive single markets. Yet in the eu, when it comes to services—about three-quarters of the eu’s economy—the single market barely exists. Where the competitive streak of European governments does come out is in their attempts to grab the levers of power, says Hans Kundnani of Chatham House, a think-tank in London. Once in command, they tilt the field in favour of their own industries and economies. European governments are most competitive when it comes to the prospect of reducing competition.


A continent of cope
If the eu is to find its competitive spirit, then a vaccination race is the perfect place. The European Commission has set a goal of jabbing 70% of its adults by summer. There is time to catch up (especially as the pandemic has provided regular, brutal reversions to the mean, when high-flying outliers are brought to ground.) There is more at stake than health. If a group including some of the world’s most successful societies cannot vaccinate their populations swiftly, then any pretensions that the eu is a potential superpower look ridiculous. Put down the copium and put up a fight.
Awater pump known as Gruba Kaska (Fat Kathy) is a local landmark in Warsaw. To get there, you must walk 300 metres through a slimy tunnel under the Vistula river. There you will find eight clams hooked up to computers. They are monitoring the city’s drinking water.


The system is nifty. When the molluscs encounter heavy metals, pesticides or other pollutants, they close their shells, explains Piotr Domek of Adam Mickiewicz University in Poznan, who has worked on the project for three decades. To create a natural early-warning system, Mr Domek and his colleagues collect the clams from rivers or reservoirs, and attach a coil and a magnet to their shells. Computers register whether their shells are open or closed by detecting changes in the magnetic field.


“In the case of a terrorist attack, an ecological disaster or another contamination of the water supply, the clams will close,” says Mr Domek. This, in turn, will automatically cut off the water supply. The clams, he thinks, are life-savers. “If contaminated water goes straight to our taps, we will get poisoned,” he says in “Fat Kathy”, a short film that celebrates the invaluable bivalves.


Today 50 Polish waterworks (and one in Russia) use clams in this way. There are drawbacks. Clams, as the proverb reminds us, cannot talk. So they never reveal which toxin is causing them to clam up. Also, it seems that they may be less good at detecting dangerous pharmaceuticals. Still, Piotr Klimaszyk, who leads the team that developed the system, thinks it ought to be used everywhere. It is cheap: all you need is clams and computers. “It allows you to check the water quality hour by hour, minute by minute, so why not?”


Mr Domek is now so fond of clams that he tries to deter people from eating them. He mischievously suggests that they “have a negative effect on [sexual] potency”. Julia Pelka, the film-maker behind “Fat Kathy”, has also stopped gobbling them. We use them “to protect ourselves from ourselves”, she says.
There are few opportunities left for Russian military officers and their nato rivals to meet face-to-face and shoot the breeze. Soon there may be none. On January 15th Russia said that it would follow America in withdrawing from the Open Skies treaty, a decades-old arms-control pact that allows unarmed surveillance flights over 33 countries.


America left the treaty in November, complaining that Russia had imposed unacceptable restrictions on flights over Kaliningrad, Russia’s exclave north of Poland, and had used its own flights over America to map out critical infrastructure (which is permitted). nato allies were aghast, though publicly they sided with America.


America’s departure left Russia in an awkward position: it could no longer fly over American soil, yet America’s closest allies could still roam freely over Russia. Russian officials demanded guarantees that Europeans would neither restrict Russian flights over American bases in Europe nor pass imagery on to the Americans—both things that are not permitted by the treaty anyway.


European diplomats worried that acceding to such an ultimatum would risk setting a precedent whereby one country could hold a treaty to ransom. Russia’s demands were due to be discussed at a meeting of the Open Skies Consultative Commission on January 25th. Russia’s decision to pre-empt that gathering was a surprise.


Though Russia, like America, boasts advanced spy satellites that can do much the same job, in recent years it had invested more than any other treaty member in surveillance planes and advanced sensors. Russian military officers valued the treaty but “hardliners got the upper hand,” says Alexander Graef of the Institute for Peace Research and Security Policy in Hamburg. “My personal view is the Russians wanted to send a message that they won’t be pushed around on arms control and nato,” says Rose Gotemoeller, a former deputy secretary-general of nato.


The treaty’s 32 remaining members may limp on. Poland, a nato member, and Russia’s ally Belarus, for instance, have cause to keep an eye on military build-ups along their shared border. But with neither American nor Russian involvement, the treaty’s original rationale—to reassure Russia and the West that the other is not massing troops for war—will fizzle out.


For the moment, Russia’s membership hangs by a thread. To carry out its threat of withdrawal, Russia’s government would first have to write and pass a new law and then give six months’ notice to Canada and Hungary, the treaty’s depositories. In theory, that would allow time for President Joe Biden to re-sign the agreement. In practice, Russia would have to approve American re-entry amid disputes over Russia’s persecution of Alexei Navalny and cyber-intrusions against America. Congress is supportive of the treaty, says Mr Graef, but may impose awkward conditions for re-entry that are impossible for Russia to swallow.


In any case, Mr Biden’s priorities for arms control will be renewing the New start nuclear pact and reviving an ailing nuclear deal with Iran. With Russia’s suspension of the Conventional Armed Forces in Europe (cfe) Treaty in 2015, the collapse of the Intermediate-range Nuclear Forces (inf) Treaty in 2019 and the looming threat to Open Skies, the diplomatic foundations of Europe’s post-cold-war security architecture look shaky. 
It is 8.30pm on January 17th. Alexei Navalny and his wife Yulia stride through the arrivals terminal of Moscow’s Sheremetyevo airport. A gaggle of journalists is trying to keep up. Mr Navalny spots a bright poster of the Kremlin on the wall. He stops in front of it. Cameras snap. “I am not afraid…this is the happiest day for the past five months of my life,” Mr Navalny declares. “I have come home.”


Those were Mr Navalny’s first public words back on Russian soil. (Five months earlier he had fallen into a coma after being poisoned with Novichok, a nerve agent, and was evacuated to Germany for treatment.) Moments after he spoke, he was detained by officers in black uniforms at passport control, who led him away into the unknown. His wife hugged and kissed him, then wiped her lipstick from his cheek, uncertain when and if she would see him again.


A few hours later, far from the cameras, he was transferred to a police station. The next day, he was put on trial in a makeshift courtroom. “I’ve seen a lot of mockery of justice, but this time [Vladimir Putin, Russia’s president] in his bunker is so afraid that he has demonstrably torn into pieces Russia’s criminal code and thrown it into a dump,” he said.


After a brief hearing, the court sentenced him to 30 days’ detention for violating parole while recuperating in Germany from the assassination attempt. Before that sentence ends, on February 2nd, he will be back on trial. The next court will probably jail him for three-and-a-half years, a sentence that had earlier been suspended, on charges of embezzlement that are widely considered to have been trumped up. Mr Navalny’s real crime is to have exposed the actions of the Russian security services and to have returned home.


The scenes at the airport were just a warm-up. On January 19th, the day after the trial, Mr Navalny’s team released an explosive two-hour film about Mr Putin’s finances and a secret palace on the Black Sea coast that Mr Navalny alleges his friends have built for him at a cost of $1.35bn filched from Russian taxpayers.


A camera-equipped drone shows 78 square kilometres (30 square miles) of vineyards and parks with a church, an arboretum and a classical theatre, not to mention the residence itself—a 17,700 square metre Italianate palace filled with baroque furniture, a casino and a hookah lounge. In less than a day after it appeared the film had clocked up 20m views.


The fact that Mr Navalny’s team could evade security and put on public view one of the best-protected properties in the world is jaw-dropping, and humiliating for the Kremlin. And the symbolism of the palace itself does not flatter the regime. It is not like, say, the palace at Versailles, which was built to show off the power of France’s Sun King, Louis XIV. On the contrary, it is hidden from view, conveying the opacity and obsession with money at the heart of the Russian state.


In the past, Mr Navalny’s investigations into corruption largely focused on Mr Putin’s entourage and cronies. He refrained from attacking Mr Putin personally; not out of fear, but because so many Russians admire their president. The latest film aims to puncture Mr Putin’s legitimacy in the eyes of the public. That could earn Mr Navalny a long spell behind bars, or worse.


However, the Kremlin is faced with a dilemma. To imprison Mr Navalny now would be to turn him into a Nelson Mandela figure. To kill him would cement Mr Putin’s legacy not as the restorer of Russia’s lost empire and prestige, as he would like to see himself, but as something closer to a vengeful mafia boss.


Mr Navalny may see himself as a revolutionary. What is missing is the revolution. Only 23% of the public think political protests are possible where they live, according to a snap poll by the Levada Centre.


Why, then, has the challenger taken the gigantic risk of coming back to Russia and launching a direct attack on the Kremlin, which has already once tried to kill him? His may be a courage that borders on the suicidal. Yet he is no madman. Rather, Mr Navalny is a politician aiming to achieve power by democratic means, and determined to turn his country into a modern republic. As he says in his film, Mr Putin’s regime, like its Soviet predecessor, is primarily held together by fear and lies. Having first come into politics through the internet and social media, Mr Navalny has mastered its resources to destroy the Kremlin’s monopoly on propaganda. The number of people who have viewed Mr Navalny’s film already dwarfs the audiences of any news show on state television.


Yet, as Mr Navalny has often said at his real-life rallies, the biggest obstacle to ditching the current regime and moving towards “A bright future for Russia”, as he has branded his project, is not Mr Putin, his muscular goons or his propaganda, but the learned helplessness, resignation and fear that afflict so many of his compatriots.


By walking back into the lion’s den he is hoping to help the Russian public to jettison that fear. As he said from his courtroom: “Don’t be afraid…take to the streets not for my sake, but for your own sake and [for the sake of] your future! The only thing to be scared of is your own fear.” He has called for a countrywide protest on January 23rd. On TikTok, a social-media platform, videos with the hashtag “23 January” have already generated tens of millions of views. Whether those will turn into real people will perhaps determine Mr Navalny’s fate—and that of his audacious project. 
THE ANNOUNCEMENT came just a few minutes into the descent on the evening of January 17th. “Dear passengers, this is your captain. Just now the airport of Vnukovo is closed for technical reasons…” It was met with hoots of laughter and ironic clapping from passengers and journalists on board. Then came the voice of a passenger in row 13. “I offer my apologies to everyone,” boomed Alexei Navalny, Russia’s leading opposition politician, who had chosen Pobeda (“Victory”), a low-cost airline, for his return flight to Russia from Berlin. For the past five months he has been recovering there after a medical evacuation, following his poisoning with the nerve agent Novichok. It was never going to be a smooth flight.


The “technical reason” for the closure of Vnukovo was the 2,000-strong crowd of Mr Navalny’s supporters who had gathered to greet him. The Kremlin had no appetite for images of a hero’s welcome being flashed around social media, and even less for letting Mr Navalny through. So it diverted the Pobeda plane to Sheremetyevo airport, closing it off to traffic just to be on the safe side. As Mr Navalny walked through the terminal, accompanied by his wife and followed by a gaggle of journalists, he stopped beside a bright poster of the Kremlin for an impromptu press conference. “I am not afraid…this is the happiest day for the past five months of my life,” he declared. “I have come home.”


With that Mr Navalny proceeded to passport control. “You must have missed me. I missed you,” he grinned at the officer behind the glass. The officer called the police and Mr Navalny was led away “to clarify a few questions.” As soon as the airport had been cleared of his supporters, he was moved in secret to a police detention-centre. His lawyers were denied access to him; and he was not allowed even a telephone call. The Kremlin’s operation was well under way.


It has conducted similar operations before—with the expropriation of Yukos, Russia’s largest oil company, through a phoney outfit registered at a vodka bar’s address outside Moscow and the farcical show trial of Mikhail Khodorkovsky, its owner, who was accused of stealing the entire volume of physical crude from his own firm.


The arrest has turned Mr Navalny into political prisoner number one, Mr Putin into a vengeful dictator and Russia into a land where the Kremlin feels free to abuse the law. It has also produced a quick international reaction. In sharp contrast to the striking silence of President Donald Trump’s White House, Jake Sullivan, Joe Biden’s incoming national security adviser, tweeted a statement: “Mr Navalny should be immediately released, and the perpetrators of the outrageous attack on his life must be held accountable.” Amnesty International has declared Mr Navalny a “prisoner of conscience”. Sergei Lavrov, Russia’s foreign minister, said the West was simply trying to “divert attention from the crisis of the liberal model”.


The wheels of Russia’s Kafkaesque justice system went on turning unhindered. The following day, January 18th, at 12.29pm, Mr Navalny’s lawyers were told he was to stand trial inside the police station where he is being held—at 12.30pm sharp. Inside a hastily arranged courtroom, Mr Navalny managed to record a video: “I don’t understand what is happening. A minute ago I was led from a cell for a meeting with my lawyer. I came here and was told that a court proceeding is taking place here…. I’ve seen a lot of mockery of justice, but this time [Vladimir Putin, the Russian president] in his bunker is so afraid of everything that he has demonstrably torn into pieces Russia’s criminal code and thrown it into a dump.” This time, the (presumably unintended) backdrop to Mr Navalny’s video was a portrait of Genrikh Yagoda, the head of the NKVD, Stalin’s secret police, who was behind the “troika” trials of the 1930s and who was himself executed by his successors.


The formal excuse for detaining Mr Navalny is a good illustration of Russia’s lawlessness. He is accused by Russia’s prison service of breaking the probation rules of a suspended sentence that was handed out to him in an embezzlement case in 2014 and had the effect of barring him from politics. That case was subsequently overturned by the European Court of Human Rights, an arm of the Council of Europe to which Russia belongs, though Russia has refused to accept the court’s authority in this matter.


Of course, the reason why Mr Navalny could not report to the police station as required was that he was recovering in Germany from the effects of Novichok poisoning, allegedly ordered by the Kremlin and carried out by its operatives. His trial for “breaking probation rules” is scheduled for January 29th. Mr Navalny returned ahead of that date in the hope of having a few days at liberty on Russian soil to rally his supporters. But the Kremlin had no intention of allowing that. Less than 24 hours after he landed only to be arrested, the court delivered a verdict: Mr Navalny was jailed for 30 days. Long before that sentence expires, his probation trial will have taken place. It seems almost certain that the court in that case will decide to make his suspended sentence, to three and a half years in prison, into an actual one. And beyond that, the Kremlin is working on another embezzlement charge, which could get him an additional ten years behind bars.


The Kremlin’s fury is palpable. Not only did Mr Navalny survive an assassination attack, but he went on to expose the FSB, the successor to the NKVD and the KGB, as having carried out the attempt, and directly accused Mr Putin of ordering his murder. The Kremlin would doubtless have preferred to marginalise Mr Navalny by turning him into an exile abroad, as it did with Mr Khodorkovsky, who was deported to Germany after spending a decade in jail in Russia. But Mr Navalny has denied them this luxury, radicalising Russian politics and escalating his struggle against Mr Putin to the wire. Will that work? With Europe and America now likely to be forced by Mr Putin’s excesses into tougher action, the Kremlin’s tactics could well backfire.


In an early and still relatively candid interview, Mr Putin once recalled a telling incident from his youth. On the dirty staircase of a Leningrad apartment block, he and his friends were chasing rats with sticks. One rat, pushed into a corner and with nowhere to go, jumped at him. “It was very unexpected and very scary.” Now, as then, Mr Putin has only himself to blame. With Mr Navalny in jail, Mr Putin may be physically in control of his freedom and indeed his life. But the Russian dictator may have opened himself up for a nasty surprise. Mr Navalny has now called his supporters onto the streets on January 23rd. “Don't be afraid. Take to the streets! Take to the streets not for my sake, but for your own sake and [for the sake of] your future!” he said.
It is easy to be optimistic about the future of Europe when running through a dystopian hellscape, machinegunning police and decapitating pedestrians with a samurai sword. Such opportunities come thanks to “Cyberpunk 2077”, a Polish video game, launched before Christmas after a decade of development. It sold 13m copies at up to $60 each in its first ten days, with buyers tempted by its mix of hyper-violence, women wearing inexplicably few clothes and a one-armed terrorist played by Keanu Reeves. Pre-launch hype turned its Warsaw-based creator, cd Projekt, into the country’s most valuable listed company and a rare example of European business succeeding at the frontier of a 21st-century industry, rather than coasting on a reputation built up in the century before. Even the in-game currency provides something for Europhiles to cheer: in Cyberpunk lore, the main currency, “eddies”, is based on the euro. Society may have collapsed into a living nightmare, but at least the eu’s single currency lived on.




What should have been a rare technology victory for European business soon turned into a farce, however. The game was launched while still littered with bugs, much like the actual euro. Performance was so poor on older consoles that Sony, the world’s biggest console manufacturer, took the rare step of pulling the game from its stores. One scene gave an unfortunate reviewer an epileptic seizure. cd Projekt issued grovelling apologies. Its share price halved as complaints and refund demands poured in. The paper billionaires created among the Polish company’s management became paper millionaires once more. The peculiar cocktail of success and embarrassing failure of “Cyberpunk 2077” is an allegory for Europe’s video-game industry at large. It also says something about Europe’s economic place in the world.


Start with the positives. Had a Polish film studio put out a film that grossed the best part of $1bn in just a few weeks, as “Cyberpunk 2077” managed to do, it would be churlish to complain if some of the acting was clunky and the plot had holes. cd Projekt is far from alone. Ubisoft, its French peer, is behind popular series such as “Assassin’s Creed”, which allows players to vent their bloodlust across the rooftops of historic Europe. A host of other smaller developers are scattered across the bloc, from Bucharest to Helsinki via Berlin. Game-designers in Poland and France find their efforts on bestseller lists for the same reason Swedish pop stars do: they have a knack for knowing what people like. In an industry worth $140bn annually, roughly three times global box office for films, this is a useful skill to have.


Yet Europe’s success in the sector has its limits. European companies are dwarfed by American and Chinese rivals. The two biggest American competitors, Electronic Arts and Activision Blizzard, are roughly three and six times bigger respectively than their largest European peer. Any company showing signs of growing to a serious size is swiftly gobbled by an American or Chinese rival. Microsoft bought Mojang, the maker of “Minecraft”, for $2.5bn in 2014. Tencent took control of the Finnish mobile-gaming company Supercell in 2016 in a deal valuing the group at $10bn. Capital is always relatively scarce in Europe compared with America, but especially when it comes to video games, points out Matti Littunen at Bernstein, a broker. Often continental investors have no interest in the genre.


Just as Europe failed to produce its own Amazon or Facebook, so too has it failed to control the platforms that dominate video games. These are controlled either by hardware sellers, such as Microsoft and Sony, or American distributors such as Valve, which owns the world’s biggest pc-game store, Steam. The companies that did succeed in these previous land grabs, such as Microsoft, Google and Amazon, can be ambitious in a way that European rivals are simply unable to match. It is these giants that are set to dominate new markets, such as the rise of cloud gaming, with games streamed—à la Spotify, a rare European tech success—rather than bought individually, as they are now. People’s attention is a lucrative, finite resource and one that European companies are ill-placed to mine, because of previous failings. Europe’s younger technology companies will pay for the sins of their fathers.


Steady eddies
Perhaps Europe should be happy for its businesses to be niche players in a world dominated by American and Chinese firms. Being owned by others is not the end of the world. Asset-stripping in the creative industry is a dumb idea: there is little point buying a creative company, then firing everyone. True, the quality of jobs in gaming can be overstated. (At its worst, it can be well-paid grunt work, ensuring that a horse’s digital testicles shrivel in the correct manner on a chilly day.) But video games are a growing industry and, crucially for a bloc with increasingly divergent economic prospects, relatively well spread across the continent. As long as some jobs and investment stay, why should anyone care?


Yet this attitude jars with the goals of Europe’s leaders, who are desperate to make the union a proper superpower. The eu has proved capable of regulating businesses, but incapable of helping to build them. It should start by paying future-proof industries more attention. Instead of being cherished, sectors like video games are forgotten: eclipsed by traditional industries, which have the ear of national politicians; dismissed as too nerdy by the luvvies who give the creative sector its clout. If a more dirigiste Europe is inevitable, then the eu should at least focus its efforts on industries with a bright future, rather than helping older ones cling on. Much like the haphazard launch of “Cyberpunk 2077”, Europe’s video-game sector is still a success, but it has the potential to be a lot better. Unfortunately, in the minds of Europe’s lawmakers, 20th-century industries on which the continent built its wealth—cars, chemicals, banks—are still king. Unless that changes, come 2077, there may be no eddies to go around. 
On january 16th 1,001 parliamentarians, party functionaries and small-town mayors will open their laptops, log into a virtual congress of Germany’s ruling centre-right Christian Democratic Union (cdu) and elect their party’s new leader. The winner will instantly become the favourite to succeed Angela Merkel as chancellor once she steps down after an election in September. Yet on the face of it the delegates do not have much of a choice. The three candidates—Armin Laschet, Norbert Röttgen and Friedrich Merz—are all Catholic trained lawyers aged between 55 and 65. Each has struggled to find a distinct message during an interminable campaign drawn out over almost a year by the pandemic. And all three come from the same state: North Rhine-Westphalia (nrw), the most populous of Germany’s 16 Länder.


nrw’s 18m inhabitants—over one-fifth of Germany’s total—would make it the seventh-largest country in the European Union. Its 34,000 square km (13,000 square miles) span the urbanised Rhine-Ruhr region, rural Münsterland, the mountainous Eifel and much more. Walloped by deindustrialisation, its rustbelt cities have reinvented themselves as hubs for retail, logistics and other services. Farther east, the small and medium-sized firms of the Mittelstand in Westphalia rival anything in Bavaria or Baden-Württemberg for technical specialisation and export prowess. The traditional gulf between carnivalesque Rhinelanders and dour Westphalians has been complicated by high immigration that has turned nrw into one of Germany’s most cosmopolitan states. “nrw is a miniature Germany,” says Dennis Radtke, a cdu member of the European Parliament from the Ruhr. “If you can run the state, you can run the country.”


For decades nrw was a stronghold of the Social Democrats (spd), thanks in part to the large coal-and-steel workforce in Ruhr conurbations like Dortmund. But it has mattered at least as much to the cdu. It was partly in what was to become this multi-denominational state that its founding fathers agreed that post-war Germany needed a big-tent Christian Volkspartei (people’s party) that could overcome the class and religious differences that had bedevilled Weimar-era politics.


Early meetings in Cologne and Bad Godesberg, near Bonn, set the party’s path and determined its name. The “Düsseldorf guidelines”, laid out in 1949, shaped the principles of West Germany’s “social market” economy. This blend of market capitalism, social protection and labour rights underpinned the Wirtschaftswunder (economic miracle) that followed—largely under the leadership of the cdu’s Konrad Adenauer, a former mayor of Cologne elected in 1949 as the country’s first post-war chancellor, and of Ludwig Erhard, his finance minister and successor as chancellor.


In the 2000s the spd’s grip loosened and nrw started to swing. State elections took on an outsized importance. A crushing loss in 2012 shattered the cdu’s morale; a narrow win in 2017 restored it. These results resonate today among the nrw delegates—almost a third of the total—tasked with choosing their party’s new leader. For it was Mr Röttgen who led the cdu to that 2012 defeat, an ignominy that poisoned his reputation among party colleagues in nrw and saw Mrs Merkel fire him from her cabinet as environment minister. “These are emotions you don’t forget quickly,” says Florian Braun, a cdu member of the nrw state parliament.


After that loss Mr Laschet, a moderate in the Merkel vein, slowly revived the demoralised party and led it to victory five years later, building a national reputation in the process. Today he leads a broadly successful coalition in nrw with the Free Democrats, a small liberal party. Soon after the cdu leadership was vacated last February Mr Laschet recruited to his campaign Jens Spahn, Germany’s popular health minister, yet another North Rhine-Westphalian. As for Mr Merz, he is from the Sauerland, a largely rural part of Westphalia, but has no history in state politics. The most conservative of the three candidates, he draws much of his support from states like Hesse and Baden-Württemberg.


All this helps explain why Mr Laschet ends the cdu campaign as the narrow favourite, ahead of Mr Merz. After a wobbly performance during the covid crisis he polls poorly with voters, but the delegates are a different bunch, often elected officials who want a leader they think will help them keep their jobs. His is a pragmatic conservatism, shaped by the needs of a complex state, focused on bread-and-butter concerns, and with an ear—too acute, say some—for the concerns of industry.


Mr Laschet’s backers praise his ability to build bridges and meld opposing points of view, while rivals acknowledge his skill in working across party lines. His jocular, modest Rhenish bearing contrasts with the silky erudition of Mr Röttgen or the flinty arrogance of Mr Merz. If it is hard to spot any fundamental beliefs in Mr Laschet beyond a staunchly Catholic pro-life attitude, that may be no great sin. After all, Mrs Merkel has run Germany successfully for 15 years and no one is quite sure what she stands for either. 
Sebnem korur fincanci, a forensic physician, and many other doctors had long insisted there was something dodgy about Turkey’s covid-19 figures. Excess deaths across the country far surpassed officially reported deaths from the virus. Case numbers seemed suspiciously low. Vindication came at the end of November, when the government revealed it had stopped reporting asymptomatic infections months earlier. Once it resumed doing so, the case-count rocketed from about 7,000 to over 30,000 a day. (The numbers later dropped, after new lockdowns were imposed.) For her troubles Dr Fincanci, who turned 61 last year, was labelled a terrorist by none other than Turkey’s president, Recep Tayyip Erdogan. The head of the Nationalist Movement Party, the president’s coalition partner, called for the group she heads, the Turkish Medical Association, to be disbanded.


Mr Erdogan and his nationalist allies now have a convenient weapon against pesky doctors and other such subversives. Under a law passed by parliament on December 27th, the government will have the power to overhaul or shut down civil-society organisations, including local branches of foreign groups like Human Rights Watch or Amnesty International. The law allows the interior ministry to remove board members who face terrorism charges, freeze their assets, replace them with its own appointees and carry out inspections, all in the name of “combating terror financing”. In case that is not enough, the government can ask the courts to ban the organisations altogether.


Few countries have suffered as many terrorist attacks as Turkey in the past five years. But few governments have invented as many terrorists as Mr Erdogan’s. Tens of thousands of people, including Kurdish politicians, teachers, journalists and senior members of Amnesty have been arrested on spurious charges since an abortive coup in 2016. More than 600,000 have been placed under investigation for alleged links to a movement led by Fethullah Gulen, an exiled Islamist preacher, that spearheaded the coup. Hundreds of academics were sacked from their jobs and charged with spreading “terrorist propaganda” for signing a petition urging the government to suspend security operations against Kurdish insurgents in Turkey’s south-east. Most recently, Mr Erdogan has accused students at one of the country’s best-regarded universities of links to terrorist groups, after they had the nerve to protest against the president’s appointment of one of his loyalists as their rector. Police have detained at least 45 of the protesters. Some of them say they were beaten and threatened with rape while they were in custody.


Dr Fincanci, who has also faced terrorism charges over the Kurdish peace petition (she was sentenced to 30 months in prison, pending appeal, and has been forced to retire from academia), says the government needs the new law to continue ruling by fear and to act with impunity. “Civil-society groups are supposed to be a check on state power,” she says, speaking after a vigil for the roughly 300 Turkish doctors who have died of covid-19. “Now the state has become a check on civil society. The state is no longer accountable.”


The doctor seems undeterred, and continues to be a thorn in Mr Erdogan’s side. His government, she says, is still covering up the scale of the pandemic. According to the health ministry, the virus has killed just over 23,000 people in Turkey, including over 1,319 in the week ending on January 10th. She believes the true number may be at least twice as high.
AS GERMANY GEARS up for an election year that will bring an end to Angela Merkel’s long reign as chancellor, her centre-right Christian Democratic Union (CDU) has committed itself to maintaining her centrist course. At a party vote among 1,001 delegates on January 16th Armin Laschet, the moderate premier of the state of North Rhine-Westphalia (NRW), narrowly defeated Friedrich Merz, a conservative former head of the CDU’s parliamentary group. Norbert Röttgen, a foreign-affairs specialist, came third.


The vote brings to an end a campaign greatly extended by the pandemic, which delayed two planned party congresses and forced the eventual vote to take place digitally. But it marks only the first of several milestones in the run-up to the general election, due on September 26th. In the spring the CDU, together with the Christian Social Union (CSU), its Bavarian sister party, must nominate a joint candidate to lead the election campaign as putative chancellor. This decision, says Marian Wendt, a CDU MP, is “still open”.


As head of the larger party Mr Laschet has the strongest claim, but Markus Söder, the CSU’s charismatic leader and the premier of Bavaria, is far more popular among CDU/CSU supporters, and among German voters at large. The two men enjoy good relations, but few take at face value Mr Söder’s claim to have no ambitions beyond his own state. Jens Spahn, the popular health minister, who backed Mr Laschet’s leadership bid, has been discreetly taking his own soundings about securing the nomination, though his standing has suffered after Germany’s slow rollout of covid-19 vaccines.


The effect of Mr Laschet’s win on the CDU/CSU’s standing in opinion polls will be an early test. Another will be two state elections in mid-March. In Rhineland-Palatinate, in the west, the CDU has high hopes of snatching power from the current leftist coalition. The more important is in Baden-Württemberg, an industrial powerhouse, and former CDU stronghold, in the south-west. After losing an election there in 2016 the CDU was forced to serve as junior coalition partner to the Greens. The two parties are running neck-and-neck in polls. Victory in Baden-Württemberg would bolster Mr Laschet’s claim to be a proven election-winner—and give him a strong hand should he find himself leading the CDU/CSU in coalition talks with the Greens after September’s election.


More immediately, Mr Laschet faces the tricky task of uniting his own party. Annegret Kramp-Karrenbauer, his predecessor as leader, failed to do so after defeating Mr Merz herself in 2018, and announced her resignation almost a year ago. Mr Laschet's slim margin over Mr Merz—52.8% to 47.2%—was closer than he and other party grandees would have liked. The result proved, again, that a large number of the CDU’s rank-and-file crave a rightward shift after Mrs Merkel’s 15 years in office. The CDU, which has governed Germany for all but 20 of the last 72 years, likes to see itself as a party of power and unity rather than debilitating splits. That notion will now be tested, especially if Mr Merz fails to accept his second defeat with good grace.


Mr Laschet, an affable, modest sort, grew up in Aachen, near the Dutch and Belgian borders. After dabbling in law and journalism he spent a decade in the German and European parliaments, before returning to NRW, his home state (and Germany’s most populous) in 2005. In 2017 he led the CDU to election victory there, acquiring national stature as a result. Since then he has run a broadly harmonious coalition with the Free Democrats, a small liberal outfit.


As befits the head of a large, complex state Mr Laschet has steered a pragmatic course in government, balancing the demands of industry with Germany’s climate-protection requirements. His early support for NRW’s large migrant population—in 2005 he became the first integration minister of any German state—earned him the nickname “Turkish Armin” on the far right. Friendly with Emmanuel Macron, France’s president, and close to other European leaders, Mr Laschet backs the EU’s debt-financed recovery plan, but wants Germany’s own budget to return to balance by 2024. German state premiers have few foreign-policy responsibilities beyond Europe, but some of Mr Laschet’s past statements hint at dovishness on Russia and China.


Yet his political appeal rests less on any ideological propositions than on an ability to win elections, govern competently and build bridges to political opponents, many of whom he appointed to his cabinet in NRW. His final pitch to the CDU delegates held up the violent scenes on Capitol Hill as an example of the dangers of polarisation he said Germany must strive to avoid. More than his rivals for the CDU job, Mr Laschet pledged to follow the moderate course of Mrs Merkel, who stood down as party leader in 2018; she in turn was said to favour Mr Laschet’s bid. Germany’s chancellor remains the country’s most popular politician. But her influence will start to fade as Germans turn their attention towards the political drama that lies ahead.
When growing up in La Courneuve, on the unfashionable fringes of Paris, Rokhaya Diallo says she “didn’t feel black”. The daughter of parents from Senegal and the Gambia, she recalls that “being black was just not an issue, because there were so many of us.” It was only as a young adult in Paris, when people began to ask where she came from, that Ms Diallo realised “that they didn’t mean La Courneuve. It was really a matter of the colour of my skin.”


Today, Ms Diallo belongs to a generation of French writers and activists who are asserting their identity as black in a way that challenges France’s sense of itself as colour-blind. This is prompting a complex and heated debate about how, and whether, to think about race. It is particularly sensitive in France because its universalist model assumes that all citizens have equal rights as individuals, not groups. Partly as a rejection of identification methods used under the wartime Vichy regime, it is illegal in France to collect data on ethnic, racial or religious origin. Officialdom neither counts nor recognises racial minorities. Identity is assumed to be simply French.


Yet the reality of racial discrimination has for years meant that France fails to match up to this ideal. Studies that use proxy measures for race, such as parents’ national origin, show that French people with links to the Maghreb or sub-Saharan Africa find it harder to rent housing or get jobs. They are also disproportionately absent from French television studios, boardrooms and government. In the 1980s, which saw the growth of groups such as sos Racisme, anti-racism movements often ended up more concerned about social equality than racial identity. Now a new generation is pressing a different sort of racial awakening. This has pushed President Emmanuel Macron to respond—but also to question the way the problem is discussed.


Last month Mr Macron stirred indignation in some quarters of the police force when he acknowledged that people “with non-white skin colour” are more likely to be stopped by the police in France. He also conceded that “being a white man can be an experience of privilege.” Commonplace in America, the use of such terms is highly unusual in France. Mr Macron has now promised to launch a “citizens’ consultation” on discrimination. In February he will also set up a permanent anti-discrimination platform—online and via telephone and chat—to register and respond to complaints. The idea is to raise awareness of discrimination, and supply tools to fight it.


If Mr Macron has decided to do more about racial discrimination, though, this does not mean that he shares the way that some activists in France seek to steer the debate. A row currently pits “universalists”, who prefer to combat discrimination by reinforcing the existing colour-blind model, against those who argue that deep structures of racism can be erased only by “racialising” French society. “France has a theoretical universalist philosophy which is hermetic to the experience of a large number of French people,” says Ms Diallo. “We refuse to talk about race, so we don’t have the words to discuss it. This is denial: a refusal to put words on things that we don’t want to recognise.”


Much of this push comes from students and those familiar with the American campus debate. Often even the vocabulary is missing in French. Being black at Sciences Po, a group at a Paris university, for instance, calls for classes on “la critical race theory”, as well as “intersectionality” and “decolonial studies”. When you hear talk in France about “white supremacy” or “systemic racism”, says Thomas Chatterton Williams, an American writer on race based in Paris, “these are American ways of thinking, which derive from a society built on slavery and oppression.”


Up to a point, Mr Macron is sympathetic. When campaigning in 2017, he upset conservative French circles by calling colonisation a “crime against humanity”. He agrees that more should be done to teach the full picture of French history, and last year asked Benjamin Stora, a historian, to re-examine the archives on France’s colonial history in Algeria. Mr Macron draws the line, however, not only at the idea of sidelining controversial figures in history. He also rejects the “ethnicisation” of French society in ways that could be divisive—particularly regarding extreme forms of Islamism—and undermine universalism. “We’re not a country like the United States that has lived through segregation,” he told Brut, an online platform.


The challenge for France is whether it can accommodate more explicit racial identities within its existing model, in ways that neither crush genuinely felt differences nor abandon the colour-blind ideal. James Baldwin, an American writer, once commented that in France “I was freed of…the crutches of race.” Mr Williams echoes that thought today. “I’m a mixed-race black man,” he says, “but in France my identity is primarily my nationality. I’m not the first American to feel liberated by stepping out of the black-white binary.”


Some, such as Sibeth Ndiaye, Mr Macron’s former government spokesperson, suggest that France should at least debate the question of collecting statistics based on ethnic background. It is harder to measure diversity, let alone prove discrimination, when there is no official recognition of racial groups. The legal case for discrimination currently rests on a plaintiff belonging to a “real or supposed” race and on the perception of racism. For universalism to prosper, wrote Ms Ndiaye in Le Monde last year, “we shouldn’t hesitate to name things, to say that skin colour isn’t neutral.”


Part of the difficulty of the debate, says Hakim El Karoui of the Institut Montaigne, a think-tank, is that inflexible defenders of the French model consider that the mere “recognition of difference is a way of contesting that model”. It may be that French universalism is more elastic than its rigid guardians believe. “Until the mid-20th century”, says Pap Ndiaye, a French historian and author of “La Condition Noire”, “we spoke very freely about race, even within the universalist idea.” It was only after the second world war and decolonisation that talking about race became illegitimate.


Mr Macron’s vision of universalism may be more nuanced than his critics allow. He has often talked about France’s plural identities. Recently he said: “We should be able to be fully French and to cultivate another belonging.” The challenge will be to get this balance right, while ensuring that those who do not feel fully recognised in France can genuinely prosper in it. 
Most people sniggered when Donald Trump proposed buying Greenland in 2019, but he had a point. The world’s biggest island has a rich helping of rare-earth minerals, and the superpowers want them.


These 17 elements, ranging from scandium to lutetium, lurk in the depths of the periodic table and turn up in all things electronic. The renewable-energy revolution will also rely on them for power storage and transmission. On the darker side, weapons—including nuclear ones—need them too.


A new open-pit mine at the top of Kuannersuit, a cloud-rimmed mountain near the settlement of Narsaq in the south of the island, may provide a goodly chunk of the rare earths needed to ditch fossil fuels. So believes Greenland Minerals, actually an Australia-based company, which has been angling for the excavation rights for the past decade.


Greenland’s environment ministry has given a tentative go-ahead. A majority of parliamentarians have already declared themselves in favour of digging. In early February the townsfolk of Narsaq will hear representations from the island’s government; though a dependency of Denmark, Greenland enjoys self-government in most areas except defence and foreign relations. A consultation phase is to last, provisionally, until mid-March.


Residents of Narsaq welcome the opportunity to learn more and to have their say. Urani Naamik (“No to Uranium”), a community lobby, has strong support. Nobody wants (mildly) radioactive dust, an inevitable by-product, drifting down to settle on their town and pastures. Many worry about the lake of waste—a sludge of chemicals and discarded rock fragments—that mining would leave on top of the mountain.


But Greenland’s politicians are in a quandary. The country’s two largest parties both want full independence from Denmark, which currently provides half the territory’s annual budget. But they would then need to be self-sustaining. Greenland would depend on fish, tourism, fresh-water sales and minerals. The last is by far the most valuable.


Christian Schultz-Lorentzen, editor of Greenland’s Sermitsiaq newspaper, says a bigger long-term issue is who gets the mine’s spoils. Shenghe, a Chinese conglomerate, is the largest shareholder in Greenland Minerals. The Danish government, in a frenzy of Atlanticism, earlier managed to stop Chinese companies from investing in the expansion of two airports on the island. Will it preserve Greenland’s rare earths for nato?
